      "identifier" : [
         "8_06911_408"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "XVL No. 16 OL XL No 16September 19th, 1914 nhi N ATI AT VALCARTIER CAMp-sCAtNN1NG B EDITED DT .TC JLLETINS FR lIN A. Co -SEAT 0F WAR Op E R d ORONTO Price 10 Cents",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. 7iE Rotunda of Larocque HoItel, Valleyfield, Lined with Linabestos. For Walls and Ceilings of Public Buildings- Hotels, Theatres, Town Halls, Schools and Çhurches-leadiflg architeets are specifying LINABESTOS \"The OnIy Wallboard That is Fireproof'\", ,Lunabestos is miade of Portland ýCernent and Asbestos, In sheets 3-16 inches thicir, 42 Inches wide, and 4 or 8 feet long. It is nailed direct to studding or ceiluflg Joists, and the joints are either pan- eled Lor fllled with cernent. It can be left Ini its attractive natural tone of puul\u003cish grey, or tinted or paînted any color. 'Walls and Cellings of Llnabestos are sanitary, fireproof, and will never crack or Sali. They are Just as satisfacetory Ini private bouses, offices and first-class garages or coach bouses, as In big Public Buildings. Write for sample of LInabestos and descriptive Solder to Dept. 7. Abestos Manufacturiig Company, Limited Adâdress E. T. Bank Building, 263 St. James St., Montreal. Factory at Lachxine, P.Q., near MontreaL Ml;el4fflLet metalktOyOU aboutbe11g I \"iinuDOWfl _e P When your system is undermined by worry or overwork-whefl your vitality is lowered e -whIen you feel cianyhow \"1-when your id nerves are 'on edge\" when the Ieast exertion tires you-you are in a \"run-down\" condition. You systemn is like a fiower drooping for want of water. And just as water revives a drooping ýflower - so 'Wincarnis' gives new life to a\"run-down\u003et Constitutionl. Fromn even the first wineglîss- ,fui you can feel it stimnulating and ini- «vigoratiflg you, and as you continue, you can feel it surchargiiig your whoie systemn with new health-lew strength-tew vigo)ur anxd new life. The resuit wîil delight you. Begin to get well FREE Send for a liberal free trial bottle of 'Wincarnns.' Enclose six cents starnps for postage. CoLEFmÂN \u0026 Co., Ltd., Wincarnis Works, Norwich, England. You cas obtain regular supplies frorn ail leding Stores, Chernists and Wine Merchants. q I ~ The Win* et lAIe =Reconmelded by over 10,000 Doctors J Tpreêfttive for the Dominion of Canada: Mr. Frank S. Baill P. 0 Box 577, Toronto. Phone No. Main 2875. Telegramfs, 'O)nit,, To- ronto. IN ANSWERING ADVERTISEMENTS MENTION \"THE CANATIAN COURIEIL- L The Best Way to Muskolea Boat side Stations at Lake joseph and Bala Park giequick connections for alPoints. The besi way to the Maganeiawan New Resorts at Bolger and South Maganetawafl. The besi way to the Rideau Lakes Direct Access to Principal Points is via CA7m NA DIA N NOR THERN RAIL WA Y Through Tourisi and Excursion ,Rates Now in Effeci. For literature ad information apply to Gmn. Pas\u0026. Dept., 68 King St., E., Toronto, Ont. THE CANADIAN BA 0F -COCMMERCE SIR EDMUND WALKER, C.V.O.,LL.D.,D.C.L., President AL.EXANDELR LAIRD, Generai Manager JOHN AIRD, AWat Gener RESERVE FURO, $13, SAVINGS BANK ACCO-0UN' upwards. Carefuliattention isgiven to every account. Smna are welcomed. Accounts may be opened and oçerated by r Accounts may, be opened in the names of two or more per drawals to be made by any one oF themn or by the survivor. INDEPENDENT ORDER 0F FRES%% FMRNISHES A COMPLUTE SYSTEM 0F INSUI Poficies îssud by the SocietY are for thxe protection Of yo Furndy and cannt be bougbt, sold or pledged. Bu\"e1t are payable ta the Benefciary in case of death, ta the member in cas of bis total disability, or to the miet ber on attaing seventy years of qge. Polide ismed from $500ý t. $500 TOTAL DENEMiS IcMD, 42 MILLION DOLLARS Fer fh\" Iufaha Mad ltatuve apsf te FMI J. DAICH, S.S. 1. G. STEVEISON, 8.C. CAPITAL, $151OOOOO0",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. GONQUIN PROVINCIAL Datario) PARK Canada Thoroughly Univerel Vaca- Ion Territory, reached only by the 'àRnA ND TRUNK \u0026JLWAY SYSTEMd rHE NEW CAMP MOTEL \"CAMP NOMINIGAN\"y I Canoe Tripe--a Paradise for Campera. miles west of Montreal 170 files west of Ottawa, 200 iles north o! Toronto, 2,000 feet above sea, level. '1le Park covers an area o! 0,000 acres. Over 1,500 Iakes \u003erlVera in ita boundaries. est fishlng i the \"Highlands On\"tarjo.\" Speckied Trout. Min Trout and small-mouthed 11k Bass. THE HIGHLAND INN Ililahes* splendid botel accom- 10Odation. Rates $2.50 to $3.00 per day; $16.00 to $18.00 per week. 1 addition Camps Nominigan * )illnesing offer novel and 1!Ortable accommodation at lerate rates. 'rite for full particulars, Il- rated description atrec. eJ.Moffatt, cor. King and Lge Streets, Toronto. TBELL, paseenger Traf! Uc Manager, Montreal, Que. nenerai Passenger Agent, Montreal, Que. XEER PRISMS. b aeear white out-of-dolors Iight , eure intejJrs of stores, offices. ena-etc maIngthem neot oniy tlyliht utdry and sanitary. eta aterIai saving In the fl~~Ifcaight. Let us soive of\u0026titflg1.Pro,be~ L4 rPriam Comipany, LimItsd G kIng St. W., Toronto, ont. The Canadian Courier A National Weekly Published ai 12 Welington Si. Eau, hg the Courier Pren, Limlcd VOL. XVI TORONTO NO. 16 Editor 's Talk NOW that the war lias settled down to a fairly regular routine, it is opportune to review the events which have turned the world upside down. Hence the feature of this issue is a general review of the struggle to date. Our staff writer lias attempted to put events in their proper rela- tion to ecd other and to paint a picture in whicli ail the leading figures and important happenings are placed in the proper perspective. Canada is settlillg down to business as usual, following the example set by the leading merciants and financiers of Great I3rîtain. The panic is lover. The foolisli rush to store up un- necessary provisions has eeased. Foodstuifs have dropped to a normal level. The mistress lias ceased to behieve that she must dîscliarge lier maids. The business man who put has staff on haif time lias restored them to full time. The people of Ontario attended tlie Toronto Exhibition as freely almost as in peace years. Patriotism was thouglit, during thc samne days, to consist in raising money for charitable purposes. Now it is seen that cliarity is not more necess8-ry than in other years. What is needed is simply and solely a national policy of \"Business as Usual.\" When industry and commerce pursue the even tenor of their way, there is little need of alms. Bankers, capitalists and manufacturera have a clearer grasp of what is demanded of themt and are trying honestly to ineet the situation. In this revival of business, every one can lielp. The financial articles in last week's issue indicated some of the needs of the moment, and others are dealt witli in tus issue. The press of Canada deserves some credit for having helped to steady the nation in the unusual circumstaflces of the period. The story by iRobert Barr, whieh was promised for this week, lias been lield over for one week, in order to leave room for * material of greater current importance. This novelette is ex- tremely interesting and lias been appropriately illustrated by Mr.,Lismer. .. 0 TOURIST SEASON IN FULL SWING to the \"Summer Provinces by the Boa.\" Rouerve berthe eariy for trains ieaving Bonaventure Union Depot. Montreal. OCEAN LIMIrED-7.3O p.m. diaily. MARITIME EXPRESS--8.40 a.m. dally, except Saturday, for Quebec, St. John Halifex. the Sydneys. Prince Bdwzrd Island, Newfoundland. ST. LAWRENCE SPECIAL--8.50 p.m. Monda\u003e', Wednesday, Prida\u003e'. for Mur- ray Bay, Cacouna, Metts Beach, Matane, etc. SoUid Train of Vestibule Sleeping Cars. I. TIFFIN, Generai Western Agent, King Bdward Hotel Block, Toronto. $9.000 effered for eerwan nventlons. Book*Howtoobtelik a Patent\" and \"What to Iaventý ment free. send rougi' sketch for tre report as tel patentabll]tY. Patents ad- vertiaed for sale at our expense lu MAr- ufacturers' Journale. CIIMLE\u0026 ClIWDLEE P~te Att?, en. 16Ts - . st Waahhigts, IL C. *iI t i.- - -*-- '1 'AO O * .** * *4~ FAST EXPRESS lgan 4uentral Tw.n ruse va vv#noor The tà,Cadia W in P.ifoct \u0026aIiY. No.22--'£\"e IrnaIln Win'.. St-) 8.456 a1.m.l (.T.) L.v. ChiCago \u003cCUlrt *ta.) 9-Wo\u0026.M. (C.Tr.) .5...._ 40 p.M. \u003cE.T.) Ar. Detroit \u003cMicht. Cen.) SM5 p.m. \u003cC.T.\u003e) ....... .10 P.m. \u003cL.T.\u003e Lv. Detroit \u003cMioli. Con.) 5.05 P.M. (E.T\u003e ..... ...8 p.m. \u003cE.T.) Lv. London ............8.03 p.M. L. I0h. Con.) 12.86 a.m. (E.T. Ar. Toronto.. . ... .11.20 p.nit \u003cE.T.) e1h. Cen.\u003e 11.5 p.m. (C \u002b:) E;; Toronto......:..... 1140 p.m. \u003cL-T-\u003e 'nt- 8ta.\u003e. 7.46 a.m. \u003cC.T.\u003e Ar. Mental \u003cWifl'r St.\u003e 8.56 a.m. 1 8T) IIY Ont N!ght on tii. Road in EacL Dirction :Pic-li;hteG Trains with ]Buffet-Library-Compartmeant-Ob5er-vatU 'd and Tourist Bleepers and First-cLaaa Coaches between Montresl Ini eaech direction. S1leePing Cure wll alzo bé operated between 3ontreal. Toronto, Chica.go via CaInadi« ac sifie and Michigan Centrai1 Railrfldà Igan Central Tunnel via Windsor oD Trains No. 31 WentbmUd Ito 8-00 -.m Gair.' and No. 20 liaatbound lewavIns Chicago 6.4 Ifrom Conadian Paciflc Ticket Agents, or write M. 0. MURPHY, inger Agent, Cor. King and Vonge Sts., TorontO. -- days it was - -ysfeIuy the II four-in- hand,\" now it is the \"four-in-car.n Where men used to seek Ilblood \" in horses, they now seek \" class ' in tires. Hence, Dunlop Traction Tread is the choice of the many. cý T. 103",
         "C A NAD11A N ('O UR1E R. In Lighter V ein Golden Tears.-A number of married nien were recently dining togethe r at their club . The question was asked: \"What trait in your wife do you consider the most expensive one?\" The answers were as numerous as the men in the party. With one it was vanhty, another religion, or charity, or love of dress. The last man ,to whom the question was put answered oracularly: \"Her tears.\" There .was a sudden burst of assent from every man ln the party. Quite as Bad.-\"D'ye ken Mac fell in the river on bis way home last nicbt?\" \"You don't mean to say be was drowned?\" \"Not drowned, mon, but badly dlluted\"- -London opinion. Safety First.-Fnltlestein-\"Vy do you wear ail your jewelry wbenever 1 takes you sailing?\"' Mrs. F.-' Veli, If der boat should cap- size 1 want to be sure of being saved.\" -Lif e. Too Weil Prepared.-\"My dear old fei- 10w! What's the maitter? The se's like a duck-pond!\" \"I know. oid boy-but I've taken six- different-remedies. \"-Punlch. A Good Start.-Proprietor of a Concert Party (engaging a soprano)-' Now 1 want you to understand, Miss Deerly, that 1 like muy boys and girls to be like one big family-no quarreling, no jeal- ousy.\". Miss Deerly-' Oh, that's quite aIl rigbt. I've neyer beard anything in the~ w,ýork of any other singer to, give me, the sllghtest cause for jealousy.\"-Musical America. What Next. WVhat of the styles for next seae- n 2 Wbat sort of bats shall we wfE a r 2. What modes will show signa of reason? Wbat shall we do with our hair? What startling dance wiil entbrall us? What game of cards shail we play? Wýhat new disease must befall us? What sort of clubs will hold sway? What brand-new microbes wiil hurt us? Wbat former faitha go adrift? What new reforma will divert us? What shall we try to uplîft? -The Club-Fellow. A Matter of Eyeslght.-Uplifter-\"Il van see good ln an things.- Pat-\"ýC\u0026n You See good in a fog?\"- Judge. Paraliel Case.-' 'Oh, doctor, 1 bave sent for you, certainly; Stil, I mnust confess that 1 bave neot thea ,Iiglitest falth in modern medical science,\" \",Weil, said tbe doctor, \"that doesn't. matter ln the ieast. You see, a mule bias no0 faitb inthe veterInary surgeon, and yet be cure$ bim ahl the mame.\"- Sacred Hleart Itevi.ew. Worked Both Ways.-Many years ago, when the late Chief Justice Beatty was a Young lawyer in Sacramento, a client camne in for advîce. H-e said lie had hired a horse to go ta a nelghbouring town, for a dollar, but wben lie had re- turned the liverymian asked for a dollar more. -Wliat for?\" thse client had asked. \"For the ride baclc.- Thse young iawyer gave somne instructions, whieh the client f oilowed. A littie later lie went ta, the. liverynian and aEked bow much i t would cen-t Wo hire a horse ta go to Woodland, \"D've dollars,\" was thse reply. The client hired the, teamn and went ta W codland. When lie r'eturned lie rode home with a friand . Jle went to tbe stable and pald thse keeper fIve dollars. -Where la my hor£ e and carniage ?\" a ked thse owner. \"Tu WVoudiand,- was the unconcerned Such Luck.-Mrs. Golightly-\"Wbat do you think, my dear? Sncb luck! We leavc for paris In an hour.\" Cliapple-'¶Eealiy?\" Mrs. Colightly-\"1Yes, we're going ta Pasteur's. My' husband lias Just beelh bftn bY a mad dog.\"-The Club-Fellow. Easy ta Answr.--i wonder how mnany n'en will ha made unliappy wlien I miarry?\" sad thie flirt, -\"How many do Yen axPeet ta marry?\" answered lier *..xast friend.-Man Laclit. Billiards Both Thnrilling and Healthf ul Lt is really unfortunate that English Billiards is not played more. generally bywomen. It is such a splendid, invigorating game, bring- ing s0 many muscles of the back, neck, chest, arms, hands ahd lIimbs into use. Lt increases the circula- tion, aids digestion, mnakes' the eye nmore accurate. It* makes a woman forget her household worries; makes her feel lively and cheerful. It's the most healthful and thrilling indoor game in the world. You really ought to have a Burrouglies \u0026 Watts' Billiard Table in your home, madam. We say Burroughes \u0026 Watts' because this is the make of table the King uses, that princes, dukes, rajahs, million- aires, champion players and famous clubs use. BURRUGHE \u0026 ATTS' BILLIARD TABLES Don't *think these 'superb tables are beyond your pocket-book. Aithougli they are equipped with mathematically level siate beds, best West of England billiard cloth, and the famous. fast, noise- l1ess, wear-resisting Steel Vacuum Cushions, Burroughes \u0026Watts' Bil- liard Tables are rnoderately prieeéd, unless you desire some elaborately orna- mented or inlaid tables. But every table is of the Burroughes \u0026 WattÉ\" kingly qualîty, no matter what style or'size you select. ~ Also makers of Dominion Pool Tables and Combination Billiard and Dining Tables. Write for fuît information anid prices. - illard Table Manufactu'r«s to H.M the. Kingr Burroughes \u0026 . Watts,. Limited, 34, Church S5trelet, Toronto Hea 'd Office, London, ýngIafld. Montreal Agents, James Hntton \u0026 Co., Shaughnessy Building Winnipeg Agents, J. D. Clark \u0026 Ca., 280 Main St. Vancouver Agents, R. H. Oliburn, 312 Water St. ChoiceatRr Bulbs that ever came .1','\u003efrom Euroe Ai European markets being destroy- ed, our experts in the bulb fields of Hotland were able to, obtain their choice, of the finest varieties grown. Shipments have now reached us and are rcady for immediate delivery. Write at once' for the Canadian Edition, of our,-,handsome catalog of CARTER'S TE STED SEEDS, Inc. 133B King Street, Fast Toronto. So!d bu .11 progreu.ie Canadion .Siaietlfl. lie",
         "Vol XVL September 19, 1914 No. 16 Story of the War from the Bcginning W'i h the Tables Turned and Some of the Secrets Ouf, We are flou Be lier A ble Io Conneci Up the Events iEINEVER any old Kaspar o! the future Picks up s, skull In Belgium and begins to tell bis grandchiîdren \"what tbey fOuglit eacli other for,\" lie will probably I mat bow to begin andj where to leave off. Mnfember that on the 28th o! June, 1914, a b in Boania shot the Arcliduke Ferdinand, ent to the tbrone o! Austria and bis wife at S0 Gabril Prinzip, Higb School studefit and 8lav conspiracy, started the world at war; [le kneW about it was-Slav vs. Teuton. remlembered that In 1903 Servians shot ýasnder and Queen Draga in bed and put the throne; and 912 she plunged '[5fl war against Mýore Pan-Slav- dinand was the engineered the 1 Of Bos-nia and 'le, by Austria in .,as the Most ail o! ail Euro- 's, Somne say the 8 Jealous o! bim; he waa a Pro- ers that lie was lv. But the Ser- za.r O! Rusia kn wliwat it tie Balkan States c\u003ef Siava. Rusasa 1be Midst of a uPheaval that 1. to become a 'evOlfition Ger- 8 susPected o! that revolution. \"Peror of Ger- ,rd about it. H-e ',,at It meant. Is havîng trouble se Slava. Ger- ýd the Slava. So Gl\"V5'..Germany. est W1ar machine '1n \"las designed, 'eelle agsînst a Invasion !rom eOxn, as an en-qu, tt3.ck on1 Ruasia Mther Part of the t lflight come in beat suit the htoefteGrm days the'e- Tu e.day, Auguat 25th. dflot a Word o! King Albert had remove a'8l Wlhelm, soldiers. The Jeror of the Ger- ht be writing or telegraphing to the Kaiser et, ',','hobid been given suclu a body blow SBut whenever tbat correspondence liblic the world will lcnow wbo ca.used the 3Otited between the Pan-Slav and the Pan- ýnd dragged the world la after it. )eo\" Sevs flung the fat into the fire, Isl nilitary writers had been predicting a Mra wlth Germany as the aggressol'. 011 Bernhxard, la his book, \"Germany and sald witb charming candour words 'c \"When we go to war with France it 1 ea to the knife. We must not rnerely W ns stamp ber into the duat, neyer 8.a gre3.t power.- t irne another writer's 'booki on war rnOe PoInted. This waa the book that 11Cwnprince praised so bigbly; Lieut.- \"'Fateful Hour o! the German Em- By AUGUSTUS BRLDLE pire.\" The writer reckoned fhat a great war was inevitable because France, Russia and England al hated Germany. Hle predicted that the German fieet would stay under cover as tbey have been doing; that a British expeditionary force would land in France or Belgium, flot to figlit German troops on land, but to get bebind the fortifications o! the Ger- man naval base and try to drive the 2eet out to th~e open ses, wbere the British fleet would be In waitlng -as they are now. He expected that wben It came to the world crisîs of *a- England would recognize n bomba from a nocturnial Zeppellin dld to a street in Be Thsse bombe were dropped in ordet' to hit the provisiona ~d from Bruasels. ,Onle of themn hit a hospital in which wrecked hous shown hore was a hundred yards fromr Se that. Russia was a greatez' menace than Germany, and that the only way to keep Russia ia check would be to keep the Germian army as PowerfuI as5 Possible; in brie!, that England would concliide a, separate peace with Germany in order to safeguard Europe and Great Britain agaiflst Ria. The recent aign- ing o! the tbree-power protocol has already given the lie to that expectatiofi. The President ofFrance heard about the fire- brand chucked by ervia into the powder magazine o! p)an-Germaflial. So did Gen. Joffre and the Min- ister o! War. Juat before that event Mous. Humbert, ln the French Senate, bad ruade what lookeçi like a sensational exposure o! the !act that the French army in the event o! a war waa baly off for b~oots, as it had been in 1870. This was copied inito the~ Germari newspapers, which were under the thumb o! thxe KaiFer. It caused cJniCklings lu Berlin. Again there were those wbo sa.id this was a subterfuge on the part o! the French to egg on Gernxany. Dlid the French goverfiment expect a war? Perhaps. There had been much talk of it; and too often had, Germany trod upon the corns of France during the past ten years. It was Germany wbo demanded the dismissaI of Delcasse, Frenchi MInister o! Foreign Affairs, In 1905, when the foreign poicy o! France began to, interfere with Germany in Morocco. It was Germany wbho bad fleeced France out o! 1,000,000,000 dollars as the cash Pries o! peace alter the Siege o! Paris In 1870, and bad taken also Alsace4Lorraine, origInally German provinces until 1648. It was Germany who bad stood bebind Austria, in 1908, when she annexed Bosnia and Herzegovina. A great part of the thon- sand million dollars in French coins was still in the vasýt war cbest o! Ger- many In the Jullus Tburm tower. France knew that. And France, wbo was an ally o! Russia, had good reason for suspecting that Germany migbt soon be at the head o! a world war. For the Kaiser had, once genially sain, \"On our armaments, alone dosa peace rest.\" That being Interpreted. - as mucli peace as 18 necessary to prepare for war. bGAN eard about Eh c~Aha~llenge trw down by Servia to the German powers. Sir Edward Grey knew as well as anybody what It mlght mean. So dId Wins- ton Churchill, who bad more than once asked Ger- many to proclaim a \"naval holiday\" in the mad race for a world-conquering navy. But at that time the biggest obvlous Issue In the British Parliament was whetber or not Ire- land sbould be given Home Rule. Ulster was arming for a possible civil war. And ail the powers o! Europe knew It. On July lStb there was a tre- mendous naval re'riew off SpIthead. The King, on lgium on the might of the Royal yacht, passed 1 Royal palace, to which 493 sbips of ail kinds bulît were wounded German for purposes of naval war. ethe Palace. page bia thxe greatest assem.- seen In the world. It was flot a pageant. It was a musterIng at war strengtb. Every ship In that aggregation was manned and equipped at ful1 figbting caPacity. The King «! Eng- land kn.ew it juskt as well as did the Firet Lord of the AdnIlralty. It bas been said that when the review was over the Firat Lord advised the British Cabinet to declare war upon Germany at ses, but that the Cabinet voted bi down. He had been talkIng to, the Premier o! Canada about an emergency; and the Premier knew more about It than lie was able to tell thue House o! Commons. The emergency was arriving. But it was flot yet time for Englsnd to strike. England had no desire for war. She would flot provokze war. OnIy one country could. That was G'ernxany. And for ten years the news- Papers and magazines ban been full Of articles by writers wbo talkeq about an Anglo'Gernxan war as thougli it were due to happen, to-morrow. On July 21, when the Home Rule criais bad reacbed a deadlock and civil warseemed to be inevitable, the",
         "6 King, on the advice of Premier Asquith, called a conference o! botb parties, wblch, so far as the world knew, was for the purpose of .obtainiflg a compromise. in the iigbt of words then used by the King and afterwards commented upon by the press, it looks as though the King and the Premier both knew that during the sulent tbree weeks between the 29th of June and the 23rd of July, a German monarcb was framing up a world-war that should stagger Europe. It was rumoured that the King of Engiand placed this matter before the Home Rule conlerence, and that the failure to arrive at any solution of tbe deadlock was really the temporary CANADJAN COURIER. a joint conference of mediation bad been accepted by ail but Germany, whose sublime autocrat suaveiy said that there was still hope of Austria and Russia having \"direct conversations.\" on July 28tb Eng- land still believed the Kaiser sincere. That day AustrIa declared war on Servis. On July 30tb the Britisb ambassador at Vienna stated to, Sir Edward Grey bis private informaticli ibat the German am- bassador understood, endorsed and teiegraphed the Austrian ultimatum to Kaiser Wilhelm before lt was forwarded to Servia. And for severai days longer, while Germany kept the Triple Alliance guessiag as burial of the batchet for otner purpuses. Stili tbere was not a syllable of what migbt be passing betweeIi the autocrat ai Potsdam and tbe poor old man ai Viena. A LL tbis wbule, as the world waited t~on the verge of a war too vast for eve n a Sphinx to forecasi, uItile BeIgIumr, the back door Into France, vas supposod to be neutral and Independont, her neutrality and independenco guar- anteed by tbe signatory povers at The Hague Convention, ln 1907. But tbat Belgium alsa was ln the mysterlous zone of expectancy over a grest war ls proved by tbe fact that ln the -session of 1913 Belgium passed a Militia and Doefence Act wbicb calledl for a standing army almost equIvaient ta a war footing, a vote of a buge increase in tbe war budget, and outllaned tbe possibillty o! what miglit happen I! GermaIiy la any possible Invasion of France sbould de- cide ta, Ignore The ,Hague Convention affectIag neutrality and Independelice. Sc tbat ln the courts and counsels of ail tbe nations nov actively ait war, wltb tbe exception 0f Japan, It vas diplomati- cally uxiderstood by signe withaut wards, thai the groat war sa long looked forward to by Germany and antlclpaied by rtbe otber powers was semehoW about as certain ta, came about as 1'that far-oif divine eveni ta whlch, tbe wbole Showing hov creation moves\"-and 'was probably waî i scheduled la tbe braIne of the war lards ta, begla bofore vory long. Perbaps ibai shudderlngly silent tbroe veeks be- tween tbe murder of the Arcédiike and his wif e and tbe ultimatum of Auistria ta Servia vas tbe very tuime when tbe schedule wass being made. The brain o! nlo man vas able ta, say so. No peu was dipped la ink ready te sign the order releasing the dogs of war. Not even Kaiser Wilbelm was as yet ready to write the necessary \"'aloben bucbstabell,» bis own sevon- letterod namo, to tbe declaration of war. Had there been some omniscience on tbe planet Mars equipped with virelessa and a suporhumsii telescope, lie migbt bave decided ihat tbe cesii sbuff le of evenis had produced the \"psycbologlcal moment.\" As bas beon noted, Germany bad ber war mnacbine on land almast absolutely ready. It vas not possible toa squeeze any more froin the Germail people for a var machine that vas merely a magnificent creator o! manoeuvres, vithout precipitatiiig a revolutioli. Germnan writers had freely ýpredicted a great var and predded the German press and peeple Up ta a peint o! expectancy. The Kiel Canal bad been enlarged and finished as a stratogic base capable of barbouriiig the entire German navy under the guns of Wilhelms- hayon and Heligoland. Germany had put a crimp liet the outflev o! gold and had Importod $200,000,000 o! gold Into the country largely for the augmentation of tbe war chest In the Jullus Thurin. LeavIng Eng- land eut of count, dealing only wih France and Ruasia, perbaps Germany vas ready for war. Witb France unequIpped and menacd by Rouge Socialiste, withRussia la tbe midst o! a labour revolution, with England an the verge o! civil var, and the army aaid ta be disaffected, the time seemed ta be now. Twenty-three days o! silence liecame twonty-fsilT. Thon the venld got the neye that Austl'ia had sent ber 24-heur ultimatumu te Servia. The world would like ta knev vbose peu made the final Interllnear change ln ihat document. Was It Germali Ink? Rusia asked Austia ta give Servis more time. Austria refused. Servis got ber reply ta Vienna on Urne. I conceded ail but tvo pointe. i was de- clared by AustnIa ta De evasive. The ÂusiriaiI ambassador lef't Belgrade. Servia mobilized. The seat of goverrameiii was sblfied from Belgrade acrass the Danube from Austria te Nieli further inland. At this time the Kaiser vas sald te be yachting ln the North Sea and the Czar cruising ln Finnînli waters. Both vere said ta bave burrled home, com'pletely taken by surprise; one ta the palace ai Potsdamx, the other at St. Petersburig. FROM the evening of July 25tb, a sta'te ef war with- F out formal declaration existed between uta and Servia. Thon began the almost hei-oic efforts of Sir Edward Grey ta keep the peace. He varned the Austrian ambassador that If four great powers lu Europe vent ta war, Fluropean credit aud lnduztry would be smasbed. H~e scarcely realized thai the Germas motta just thon was-\"Busness I\u003ee dainned.\" O~n July 27th lie stated te the Hou.. e! Commons that hie suggestion ta the povers te hold Czar giving bis word as a soldier that if Russa cease mobllizinig, Germany ýwould,. AgaiIU advice of his ministers, tbe Czar gave orders t For eighit hours no0 Russian troops were movec that same eigbt hours Germany was, buey to buttons from Potsdam. The trick was reveaed Kaiser's word o! a soldier was found to be th4 of a brigand. Russia mobiiized again. On tl day of Augus:t Germany formaliy declared N Russia. At almost the same bour Germau were flung into Luxembourg on tbe border\u0026 gium. This was a two-banded stroke tbat ga world a dazzling reminder of Na] British naval reservesi were calE Sir Edward Gosehen badl inforil Edward Grey of the offer made Gernian Chancellor that If EngIý mained neutral, ýGermany woul carve up French territory at b0U14 ever bappened to, French colon È the event of Germany being viol Sir Edward Grey continued bis 4 sations, to no0 avail. On August stated to the House of Coiflfl he bad assured France of Englar termination to block the GernUS froni any exit out o! the North into the Channel for the purposE tacking France. T HE third day of August tbere Tnaval. skjrmisb ln the Bal tween German and Russiail and some talk of a bombardTi' Sveaborg, with a probable attRclý Petersburg, whicb seerns to, hUv postponed. But as yet Englaiid1 declared. war. England was tr3 tiever ln tbe world sbe had trie4 out of It. That sanie day the fiat rapped on the gates of Belgl demanded permission to, move troops tbrougli Belgium ia t because it would be a great deal route tban to break througb tl line of Frenchi forts along the es n brckGerman border. o n a brc King Albert sad e toug t l out of order. BelgIum was a state and ber neutrality bad bee anteed by Germany at The Bague. Hie did4 derstsnd tbat tbe Kaiser bad arranged to Paris,\" on August l5tb. For -tbe Kaiser e that by using the back dor o! Belgiuf l b crusb France in two weelta and swing bis grO, across to tbe Russian borders, wbhere b Austris and five German army corps ta e the \"steam roller\" whicb. ho expectod woiild least tbirty days to get into effective 1t speed ahead. Here was the first kink ln tbe progranXUe nmacbine. Russa was mobiliziiig abead Kaiser's schedule; and Belgium tbrust Liege Kaisor's face. S0 Belgium being obstrePerý cause sbe was fore-armed and the Kaiser dIdIl it-Germany declared war on Belgiuml, h a su.mmary way of gettIng tbe machine thr1 tume. Lioge held out against tbe Germa5\"5 Kaiser decided ta smnasb Liege, not supPPs Bingland would take any particular notice. land had already named the navy as ber re sell Gernany ber support of France. Beli' niext. (Coidtnued on page 19.) WEhave become pretty' wîl nfrmed nov se ta tle relative efficiexney on bath sides o! the ibre. land arms e! var-nfantry, cavai-y and artllory. We stITl wai for nova of the foui-ti gi-est ai-n, the aavy, vbich by saine vas expectod ta prove is efficioncy muchi earller lu the game. And vs have lad spasmodic tldinigs of vînt las been dose by the modern fifili ai-m nover used lnan~y greai var before-the air- craft. On the battle-field, air-crafi have been freely used by bath aides ln ecoutlng, for vhich purpose thoy ai-e immensely superlor ta cavaI-y. Fi-rn a beight of 5,000 foot an alr-mxan ie able te give not only neye e! hov thje enemay's ferces are dtsposed, and mave- mente o! troops, but aise ta direct the fi-e of ari-f lei'y by a system of aiguaie. Ail tle ai-mies ai-e supplemented by aviation corps. The Frenah are pçypula-ly supposed te' have tbe flneet aerial navy. The Bitish fleot o! aroplanos crossed the Clanne' and tok part In the engagements. Dui-ing tle earllei pari of the German pr-elonged aseauli on the allies left wlng, the Gemman air fooet vas numerieally gi-ester tsa that of the allies, vhieb vere later aug- mented by fresh arrivals. General French, lu lis report of~ Sept. 10, higbly pralsed the Britishi aviators vieo vent aloft ln all k\u003clxîs of weather. Ho said- \"Their skiil, energy, and perseveranco have boen be-_ yond all pralse. They have furnised mne vlth most, BOMB3S PROM THE B3L1t jus t nou; th e Ze'bpelin Look\u0026. about as Dangerous as \"The Flying 1l of incalculable value mn the conduci They ver. fIred on constanily, both fo. By actual fightiag they dest-oT enemny's machines.\" From what bas been said about t fleet of German air-craftin lahe shape plng Zeppelins and buge airships, ht ibat by ibis time, especialiy vben il-oc land arma af batile and with -f- hý. thp, Kaiser would bave Mne 0amY UILy That vas fi] bombe vi-ecl p-u van aîr-flung bomnbo when t -burat In Antwerp, blew hol over a foot thlck, ton yards f rom the point of explosi to ber rosliIntentions, she was secreily gotting the buttons ahl ready ta taucb for var. Russla began ta mobilize in the soutb and soutb- west near the lino fence o! Austria. Sanie bat- beaded French cavaîrymen skirmlsbed across the border. Belgrade vas bombarded. K~aiser Wilbelm held an allknight conforenco witb bis ministors and general staff. France vas beginnlng ta mobilize. On July 30th the Kaiser gave Russia and France each tventy-four heure ta explain vby tbey vere moblhizing or quit. Martial law vas proclaimed la Germany; vbich meant that the world's bIggest war machine took full possýession of the State, railvays, telephanes, telegraplis, aIl public vai-ks and as mach as necossary o! private property. For It must be remem'bered that Germany vas ln a state o! perfect and constant mobllizaiau la tumes of poace. All the Kaiser aoeded te da vas ta pi-osa the button and start the macehine. During oneo0f tbe very brie! intervals la the chaiu. o! mobilizatione, acco0ing te Mr-. Barclay Warburton, of Philadelphia, who tas la St. Petersburg when the war broke eut, tbe Kaiser sent a personal note ta the",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. NOT HAVING SEEN HIS S FIAD 0W T HE BEAR STAYS The terrifying Cossacks are now on German sil. They exPect te piCKeT ineir norses on %ne unzer aer L.inuen, in tseriin; ana iney seem more iiKeiy te do it than the Kaiser's Uhlans are te Jet their ateeds graze on the baulevaras of Parts. Russia has 60,000 of thoeo terrible cavairymen. Part of the Russian \"dsteam relier\" flOW pushlfrlg on to Berlin. Russlan Infaritry always march wlth their bayonets fixeci. OFFICERS 0F THE COMPOSITE UNIT-THE 1ST MONTREALS \u003e orteous, Captaina Barre, McCoombe, Stacie and ShaW. Adams. Lt.-Col. W. W. Burland, -t.-Col. Hamilton. OU T",
         "CANA-DIAN COURIER. children. Ia thbe name o! civilization jet America proteet. This wns only assassinaftion.\" Thons was corne rumeur that Seanian would ho dlsclplinod for this non-neutral message. But on ýseptembor 2nd there was another Zepp raid on Ant- werp and again ho cabled the Heralti: \"The. second Zeppelin attempt yesterdny morning was more ciearly than ever almeti at the murder o! buman beinge. Fortunately the shrapnel o! the assassine !alled la that, tbougb ton were woiindeti. Officiai photographe prepared for American officiais calcullate the. welgbt o! eacb bomb dropped at 800 kilos (660 pountis) .\" Ia the ligbt o! tiiese attacks wbat are thbe chances that the Zeppe wlll do mucb damnage to London or lParis or to the British navy la the North Sea? Ac- cording to somne writors of the Jules Verne variety, once the Zepps are lot 1005e !rom their sheds at Cologne, Metz, Cuxhaven and Freidricbshaven and Potsdami, London anti Paris mlgbt as well take to the cfaveban te etis out o!dager. IThis no arth-e oavsbane the tis oaut cofner.tsl lTi arfee quaklng prospect le baseti somewbat on the \"tour de force\" o! the LIII., wbich before the. war made a diabolicai eaveloping tnIp over the whole o! Cer- many from Metz to H1eligolenti, !rom Potsdam to tbe Baltic la 35 hoursý a~t an average speed o! 62 miles an bour, wltb enough fuel left ln ber tanks for 16 boure more. Sho carrieti tons o! explosives anti was equippeti wIth a wireless coverlng a range o! 469 mlles, and an electnie eearcblîgbt o! 40,000 c. p. effective at an altitude o! 4,500 feet. Another o! these trips was madie acrose the Channel anti gave London a scaro, mensly by way of paylng coinpi- mente. Germany la sali to have several o! these air- demoas la ber sheds at varions points over a wlde area. The nearest to France le at Cologne, where It will b. remembenod machine gune have been mount- eti on the cathetiral.roof-f4or the main purposo o! guartilng the Zepp sheds. On. of these Zeppa may carry ordlnary bombe sncb as were dropped Into Aatwerp and mlght be droppeti lnto Loabon. Another may carry a lannclhlng tube and torpedo for the destruction o! battIeshIpe. Each bas boon tested la timos o! pence, Ia dropping explosives, la lnnnching torpedos, la firing vertically anti at an angle o! 45 degrees, ln firing at an object euepended from anchoreti balloons;' according to reports, witb deadly accuracy. The difficulty o! hitting an object as emaîl as a battleshi\u003e must look at a belgbt o! one mile, wben the Zeppelin le in motion, le sald to bave been overcome by eteer- ing the dirigible la a circle and dropping from. a point calculated as the mean average centre. Each Zepp of the tubo-launcblng variety carnies four tubes, eacb six test four lncbes long; and eacb bomb weighs 85 pounde. The bomb le eteel-capped. It penetrates armour plate and explodes n!ter It entera. It le fired from a cabin amidebips furnisbed witb two tels- scopes la opposite directions, Il le estlmated tbat a Zepp scbeduled to strike London would natnrally leave Ostond, where the Germans expected to bring up a few of these pets. Great expectatiofle. So far it le not proved that any Zepp cannot be bit by an air-guxi from below. Alrendy tbe French and Belgian gunnere have playeti bob witb a few bomb-fiingers from the bine. And the Alles have not yet bogun to\"bring into play tbeir actual air figbting navy. Sir Edward Grey, Devil? or Perhaps too, Clever a Diploinat AMR. ROBINS, lecturer Ia German at Victoria University, Toronto, 'was at Marnurg, Ger- many, whea the wi.r broke. 'He bas reached home, via llland, and states that: \"Tbe prejudîce against Sir Edward Grey le the only exhibition of racial feeling againet the Eagllsh tbat the Germans make. Indlvldually tbey bave the same regard for us that they alwaye hati. I eaw oas cartoon la a newspaper that Illustrateti the German regard for Sir Edwarti Grey very well. He was showa witb borne, a forked tongue anti talI wlth Hie Satanic Majosty standing bebînti hlm. siappIng hlm on the back. The devil was representeti as saylng, 'Good Boy, Good Boy, yon can go one better than even I.1 10 le Sir Edward Grey a devil? Has ho mlsioti the Much ha. been heard of armies crossing and recrossirig rivera after bridges have been blowfl up. This picture of the Qerman soldiers crossiflg a pontoon bridge'over the Elbe was taken not far from where Napoleon crossed on hie mad march to Moacow. the 7th Militia Regimient of Londonl, Ont., marchlng to the station on their way te Valcartier. British people, Or was he keen enougli to see througb the Germari plans and quick enough to frustrate them? These are questions wbich cannot be answered finallv for y ears to carne. The historiafi of to-Ifor- row will write the iast word on the subjeet. Mr. A. G. Gardner, the weli-klowf English journal- ist, once wrote a sketch of Sir. Edward wbich bas Dqa'-.sed into permanent form in a volume entitled 'Trophets, Priests and Klnge.' Curlously enougli Gardner does nlot represent bimn as a man working for the cause of peace. To the outside wrorld, he iS essentialily a man wbo bas no otber tbought than to perpetuate the era in whicb human liberty bas de- veloped so fast and so speedily. Gardner pictures hlma a student of nature, a cuitivator of tbe rose, a student of the garden and the stars, a lover of retire- ment, and an ardent disciple of the \"Compleat Angler.\" Yet in bis diplomacy, Gardner seems to bave noted a dangerous streak. To quote: \"The unrlvalled confidence wbicb be commanda JIn tbe country is, not wbýolly sbared by tbose who regard England as the banner-bearer in tbe cause of bumaf liberty. For thls cause be bas done lIttie. His police is' governed by a fixed idea-the Idea tbat peace mnust be preserved by baving 'friends' and tbat tbe Concert of Europe is a creed outworn. Under the inspiration of this Idea b. bas committed thie country te the support of the moet, reactionary gov- ernment la Europe, and bas given a tendency te events wblcb le rapldly hardening Anglo.German re- lations Into a condition of permanent antagoniefli. Tbe entente under hlm bad taken a sinister colour, and the lnflexlbility of bis mind, unqualified by large knowledge, swift apprebension of events or urgent passion for humaity, constItuted a peril to the future. Hie aie are higb, bis honour stainless, but tbe slow movement of his mind and bis unquestion- ing faitb In the bonesty of those on wbom be bas to rely render It easy for hlm to drift into, courses whlch a more Imaginative sense and a swifter in- stinct would lead hlm to question and repudiate.\" On the other bend, Gardner's opinions are nlot with- out their weakneses. Wrltlng, la the same volume, of the Kaiser, Gardner describes bîm as a man witb a dove-like cbaracter. \"For twenty yeare he bas had tbe peace of Europe la bis keeping, and for twentY years not a German soldier bas fallen la war.1 lie goes even farther wbon b. says, \"He keepe hie powder dry and bis arxuour brigbht. But he stands for pence-pence Ûrmed to the teetb, It le true, peace with the mailed flet; but peace nevertbeless.\" And yet we now know that the Kaiser plaanod hie attack upon France. The Germa\" officers had defl- nite information as to bow tho armies of the Fatber- land would descend upon France 'and race to the gatos o! Parie. They bail plans of every Belgian fort- ress and roadway. They bad determinOd la advaflce that Belgium neutrallty would not be aliowed ta stand la thelr way. Th e army was ready to move. 'When war wae declared, there was no bositation and no dolay. \"The day\" had corne and every man kneW9 wbat that moant. Tbe terrible swiftnese with wblch the armios. movod showed that everytblng was ai'- ranged. Such actions could net follow upon a planl for dêfence-it was a plan o! attack. The German press agents are trying to create the impression that tbe Kaiser was, misled and thaý the German . Chancelier, and the Crown ,Prince woi'e to blame.' Tbey eay that if the Kaiser had beese at homo, Instead of eummerlng In the fiords o! Norway, there would bave been no sucb catastrophe. And Yet we know that wben Bismarck and Caprivi and Hobie' lobe and Von Buelow crossed the royal master they had to go. Von Bethmanni-Hollweg, the prisent chiaf cellor, le the Kalsor's man and bas always eerved hiý master !aîthfully. To pIcture, hlm thrnstlng Ger' many Into war la spite of the Emperor's desire, I asklng too muoh o! the Imagination. At best, the German Emperor hoped to keep BiIt an ont of the flgbt. So far as France, and l1ussUý were concerned, he was ready-and he invited it. This much then, le to bo sald for Sir Ed'ward Greý -he apparently knew the Germian mind bettei' tha' tbe majority of informed Englishmen. PatienltY year after year, he bas drawn the lines dloser af dloser around German dilomacy. He, sphinxike saw ail that was golng on in Germany and ws pr pared. That preparatlon toolc the forni of allianceé wltb France and Russia and Japan. It explaifl th, grent BrItis-h fleet and ail that makes It to-dS.Y th dofender o! the worid's commerce. He prepare, Great Britain for the mad charge o! the. Germa: army through Beliumin nto France. H. ,!oresaW tii great emergency when xnediaevallsm ahould roak its last great attack upon democracy. He 15 nl\u003c\u003e devil-he le a cool, calcnlatlng, far-seelng states1ne who perceived what was inevitable, a.nd created tlb ws and mens to mneot it. This at ieast is the popuiar vlew, and the card are ail on the table. The Kaiser talked peaOe, bi planned war, Sir Edward Grey knew of the. planifl] and hc was ready with bis counter rnove. Whethl he was rlght in hie estimate of the Kaiser, whithE he toolç the proper steps to mueet the greateSt 0 casion la the hietory of the world, and wbetb0r 1 left anythlug unton. whlch mlght have rvlt this useless slaughter of a m~illion mon and vii fierce destruction o! thousande of happy homes, 1 question ta whlch the. biograpiier and historiiB the- fuiture aIoe may anewer.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. A ROYAL REVIEW IN THE RAIN AT VALCARTIER On Sunday, September Gth, more than twenty thousand Canadian troops were reviewed at Valcartier Camp by H. R. H. the Duke of Connaught, first figure On right, and Col. Hon. Sam Hughes, second figure from right. Colonel Williams, camp commandant, Us the second figure from left. Sir Robert Borden and SUr Wilfrid Laurier witnessed the spectacle. Trhe Royal Canadian Horse Artlllery, In quarter column, pasIng the saluting point. These are the regular elghteen-pounders, with six horses each. In ail there were about 400 guns. A Double Company of lnfantry, pasaing the salutlna Point. The Duke la shown, mounted, on the left ln front of the automobile. lhe First British Battie NERAL FRENCH'S officiai report of the first battie between the Germans and the British Was issued last weeJ{. The British had barely Ito position lu uorthern France, nea.r the Belgian lary, berore the Germans descended upon theni )0 strong. As the French ou the British right 'etired, and as there was no support on their West), the British were forced to retire. The ans Pursued themn relentlessly and for four days Portion o! the army was always fighting. They hopelessly outnurnbered lu cavalry, artlllery D.t\u0026try, and an attempt was made to crowd the hl itito the Freuch fortress of Maubeuge and e tbern there, as the Gerrusns isolated a French Of 120,000 at Metz aud another army of 104,00 lan in 1870. The British refused to be put into aich trap and fought their way back until they got reinýforcemients of their owu troope aud support fromi the French. Flnally, at the end of six days, they found they had shaken off the enexny. The detals, as given by General French, May be summarized as follOws: Auguat 215t-British aI'xy conceutrated ou Uine fromn Coude through Mons and Bluche. Auguat 22nd.-S otig. August 23rd.-Cavaly driven out of Biuche, which was occupied bY Germns. Uard flghting at Mons, Auguat 24th.-At daYbreak British second division retired to Valencieunnes hune ani later the first divi- sion retlred to Bsvay anld Maubeuge easterly froin second division.~ Four German corps attaoking theni iu front and oue ou the west flank. August 25th.-Genieral Freuch decided that Ger- mans were trying to get around his west flauk and hemn hlm ln around the !ortress o! Maubeuge. Hence he decided to retire further to a line through Cambrai and Le Cabeau. Here he was reinforced by the fourth division. Flrst corps reached Landrecies. August 26th.-Further retirement to general Uine of Vermand, St.» Quentin and Ribemont. GermanB made heavy attack on second corps and severest fîghtlug of the period occurred. About 3.30 ln after- noon, second corps succeeded ln retlring under cover of artillery aud cavalry. The retreat continued into the uight of the 26th and the following days. Auguet -27th.-Retreat continued. Auguet 28th.-Retreat coutiuued and finally rested on Uine from Nayon, Chauny and Lafere. The enemy was throwu off. French cavýalry and Infantry asslsted the British ou this date effectively for first Urne. The big German war machine was Well organlzed enough to force its own style of fightiug on the Alles. It was a kind of fighting which the Brltlsh had learned to discard lu the Boer War. But they took ît and made the best of it. The Germans aimed at the total extinction or. surrender of the British force.' But the British decliued the honour.",
         "CANADIAN COLJRIER. PROM THE ATLANTIC TO THE PACIFICI IT IS THE SAME STORY Hralifax and Luneilburg Hosptal Carps entralnlng at Halifax for Valcartier. Halifax haseson much of the panoply of war and la always Imperialletic. Similar enthusiasm at, Victoria, B.C., when the 50th Gardon Highlanders, BSth Fusillera and sorne artillery left for Vancouver en route ta Valcartier. Photo by Yaunlg. I Through a ,Monocle Give Us a Real Army THIS war ia malting one thing very, very clear; and that is that sea-power Io flot enougb ta defend such an Empire as we possess. Of course, sea-power Is a great factor in even a land war. The Ailles would 'be 'beaten 110W without it. Only our almost undisputed command of the sea bas given us. the chance we have got. Consider for a. moment where we wuld have beeu wlthout commnand of the sea. First, we would almost iu- fallib ' y have seen Italy compelled ta figlit with the Triple Aliance, We would have had no sea power to menace ber coast and ber connections witb her armny in Tripoli, while Austria wouýld have had land pawer ta threaten Venetia. Secondly, France could not have brought up her North African traaps. It required a safe Mediterrafleafi for that. Tbirdly, Britain cauld flot have sent ber most valuable army to the onutinent. Yourth, there could have been na talk of contingents froxa the Overseas Dominions andi India. Fiftb1 there might have been grave in- terruptions ta the shipping of food supplies ta the British islea-an absalutely fatal blow ta us. 1 have been assumina, cd course, that, even if wNe did not 1possess the command of the sea. neither did the enemy. It would have been simply in dispute. B Tsea-power, we are discaveriflg. ls nlot enaugh. BI am writing considerably before the day of publication, and you xnsy know mare of how this war is going as you read than I possibly can even surmise now; but enough bas happened up ta date ta affard the most uncaxafortable proof that aur power ta hold an Empire mlght be hopelessly lost on a Continental battla-fleld, even while aur battie- ships patrolied the sea witb a serene superlority \u002b l.~ (1ormniqnvv did not dare ta challenge. WE should not farget that we were able ta enter VVthis war under especlally favaurable condi- tions upon wbicb we coubd nat and sbould not have calculated. Our diplomacy had done excellent wark-tbe German diplamacy was anythling but Bis- marcklan. For exainple, Italy was detached from the Triple Alliance. Tbat was a master-stroke; and, in spite a! the friendly feeling o! the otllan people for us-something we ahl value very bighly-we should neyer lose slgb.t of the fact tirat Bismarckian dipla- macy succeeded in getting Italy into the Triple Alli- ance not by love, but tbraugh fear. Bismarck neyer trusted lave; ha always exnployed fear-and gelf- interest. A\u0026t that ime, it was fear of France. Weil, somebody's diplomacy removed that fear-a migbty clever piece of business. Somebady's diplomady again turned the Âdrlatlc into a boue of contention betweefl Italy and Austria; and there was no ]Bis- marck ta sooth Itallan apprehensiana. The Italans bated the Austriatis as much wben Vbey joined them as they do ta-day; but tbey loved Italy mare. No langer aga than the quarreI aver Scutari, Italy was with Austria in a comman fear of a Sbav wlndow on the Adriatic. Are you quite certain tbat a BismarckL mligbt not have managed ta brlng an this war at a timne when Italian self-preservation would bave com- pelled that nation ta stay In the Triplice, though full of regrets that she must seem ta flght ber historic friand, England? THEN we are fghting this war at a time whel TBelgium preferred ta defend her neutralitY ta seeing the Germans mardi over ber roads. This Wa, nlot always so under the bats King Leopold. Again, every ane of the tbree big Allies Is beartilY in earnest. Stili again, Sweden and Narway, witb their suspicions of Russia, are quiet. Once more, Amerîcan sympatby Is with us, and was nlot alarmed by the activity of Japan. Take it ail the way round, we have every diplomatie advantage we could POB' sibly hope, for, and Germany every disadvafltage. She bas but one Ally-tbe Ally that got ber into this mess, Now, it would be fatuaus for us ta calculate that we shall always be able ta defend aur Empire under such favourable circunlstances. And yet, 111 spite of these favourable cIrcumstances, it bas becfl, and is golng stili ta be. a ard struggle. ObvlauslY, If the goda had nat siiled on us, we should have needeil a real army very much more-indeed, the laci\u003c of it might easlly bave been -fatal. BRIEFLY, It seems ta me tat we must either Bprovide ourselves wlth a real army, or abandonl the idea o! keeping a real Empire. If we ,,;ll give up aur Empire, then we saal bave notblng te stir the cupidity of the powerful, But if we are ta keep an Empira, whlch bas been \"hand-plclted\" tbrough the centuries and contalua the chaiceat jewels set in Vie beit of the world, we must be ready ta defend it In an age when national marauders psy about as much attention ta undefended \"meumn\" a11d \"tuum\" as s0 many blghwaymen. TH-E MONOCLE MAN. France' s Military Dicta tor CENERAL JOFFRE may not be a Dvinie-Right Gautocrat like the Kaiser; but since tbe war 'began and for soe time bafore that ha bas been the virtual dictator o! France. This alderly chie! tain o! the Latin ariuy of,tba Re- public was not caught napping wben the great war broe out. Ha had taken a few.tleaves from the book o! the laVe Von Moltke, who alwaYs won bis, battles first ou the parade ground. Ha knaw that wbsnever the Kaiser decided ta fling bis legilns inta France iV would be witb a cut-and-drled programmule re- bearsed iu manoeuvres and candltianed upan the certain lass o! bundreds ofr tbousan'ds o! men. Se while thie Germaus were fighting sbamn battlaa in the vicinity of Potsdam n d Vhs Kaiser was dlsmlsslng - - - ~ ~ ~Tnffrdp ýs tbey w le respeci put on men M worse ry an- le ton So! a k and littie ni thp~ L\"\"~ LnAUU.. b -n :)scurlty. Joffra il the serles o! rmny effected be- aria, Gen. Joffre 3pect for. a maere tt the emotlon.b ta become spec- And Vie chan~ces are tbat when -the war la over, French army wilb be immensely lmprovad thraugh associations o! Joffre, French, Smith-Dorrlefi and with Kitchener o! Kbartum as the man bebhifd. The Mad Ghurkas KIPLING, in is story, \"Drums of the Fora K A!t,\" gives some ides o! bow the mdGu fou,ýbh wltb the Highlanders sud the \") aud Fit\" against the Afghans. When the black C front India get ta the front these men af tbe k will be wlVb tbem. They are totally unlike any 0 fighters in the world. They are borfi ta the fray Wolf is. Simca England conquered these mnentaIs, lu 1814, they bave been amang the 1 loyal a! the native troops lu India, whlch ailE fromt ail races and castes and religions about 17( men. 0f ahl these, the Giurlcas are thea faraclous. They bave na use for borses excel bamstrlng them for the eaemy. Tbay fight aon as wildeats do. They use the rifle as a prelinlI' The weapon on whIcb. they depend ta show wb Gburlta resbly la diffars altogethar from any c kuown lu war. It la the kukri, a crescent-sh blade whlcb is more deadly than ths sabra C\u003ef Cossack or the dlrk of the Itallano. When the out on foot to meet a cavabry charge the Ght grin. When the horses are fair on Vo therfl grin 54\u003eme more sud fire once wltb their rifles. they drop, rifles and ail. They are suppasati 1 dead. The cavalry aswep over tbsm. Midt \u003c,",
         "CANADlAN COURIER. the On the Fron tiers With a Mysterjous Baby, a Pock of Wild Indi TAnI8 drew er ands out of the doug, waIked over to the window and lookeil out, a snllen frown on her brow; just as she h ex'pected, It was young Mrs. Wilson. Tannis ber\"' te llttle English woman, who had corne with e ugband to the ranch next to theirs, for Mrs. Biso toc for all that Tannîs was flot, but longed to be. Trhe feeling was evidently not shared by Mrs. Wl's0i, for she ran over 'to see Tannis on any excuse Or' 110 exel5s at ail; Tannis returned to ber bread 411d ýbegan illenly kneading the dough. '5Wlson rode round the bouse tilI she reacbed laie ktcjef endow. She drew up lu frn o! it. ood morning,\" she \u003c\u003efll a ~in yOur bread now? Wly, h0ae been reposing In baked h On theelUtcben table tbese two, T Go IliOrnlng, Mrs. Wilson.\" a\"\"\"'e ai~ckd Up a large carvîng 'MilDot.shed the dougb Inte SPtIons, uslng tbe knlfe in a donhne Mha sent cold sbivers Up and dO W i b! S n s p n WC ut your dougb In tbat djýire iids me of those dreadful Ta]n\"On~t soalPîng people.\" dei, d 5',, eyes glowed wlth a sud- eeP aigry fire. \"The Indians di dfu People, at least they orB mOre dreadful than the Eng- -ai in iter nation; tbey were Ca5 e Iig ePeole tlll you Englisb eo and s ole blat was theira. Can tbeiuiy trying to get It b 1ack oul a tbey know?\" ere, il «you'd tblnk you aJ eJnfl woman yourself Zia! Elob, I arný-I arn a B le a i lished, sullenly. e 8 mepans of bread, ite 0 a avrt enso and sboved Mr ortney is Englisb,\" elMia. Wisn; \"bu don'! Iet's 0Vi h Indlans. Do corne tegarden. It's too lovely to, frt h (use.\" She dlsmounted er herse, led hlm round to the DUt\"lti\u003cdilmto a pst. Tannis C06erest Of her baves In the oven, 01 tdeor then golng ta the 'Mre 4 alrs called up tbemf 44X ld ilan woman sbuffled an te tars In answer to the tet \u0026]. re ad, Marie,\" she sald 'wItil goingInto ithe gar- 1qat' a gh1it the aid wornan Of the o,,y n the floor lu front .% e .n Tach nns walkcd out bbrr eninto the garden; If etging beds wlth afew wld Saine tam flowers grow- a -, Orne~ ,,tnteAsrb aPle trec, 'could be Sorne chairs made E bent bougbis of pins Lbout. TanuIs drew Up tree. few moments silence, when you corne ta thin these enidless prairies, on with fia beglnnIug ai distance, and the silen 'rible whispermng silence vhispers, whlspers ta in Over and grIpped Ma laven't y«ou been biers Io arshly. «'to know tliat -taIk thait way; If yeu di cewed back j 1 try, but 1 cs. ilone. Jack'i 'p a Al By MARGARET ERSKINE one near here. Think of having to drive ail those miles -and miles and perhaps be too late. What do you do when you are 111?\" \"I'm neyer 111,'\" answered Tannis, \"and if I were, the Indians are very good doctors, and nurses, too.\" \"Indians!\" exclaimed Marlýan, In tones of deep disgust. \"Oh, I neyer could bear to have an Indian doctor or nurse. I'd rather die. Paney owing your life perhaps to an Indian.\" Tannis glanced obliquely at ber. \"You may owe \"Haven't You been here long enough,\" uhO said, harshly, \"1to know tl mlot talk that way?\" two of these your life ta an Indian saine day-\" Again silence reigned. MariaI' thauglit 1!was mare theu Marlan uphili work than usual nakiig conversation. She asked herseif for the tbousafldth tirne wby she carne. Lk of 1!, this Tbe Deutous were as near neiglibaura, and Min. Den- that seemed tan was a fellow country-woman, and by ail the laws id na endlng o! civilization sbould be ber frlend. Thay thauglit ce of tbern, alike, spoka a.llke, dld allke: whule Tannis Courtnay's ~; don'! you thouglits, speech, doings, *ware as different as day e the whole from niglit ta bers. She was a mYstery and Merian Wilson was an lntensey curions womnia. It hurt ber, actually hburt lier nat te kxiow ail about every- ~rian's arm one; and therein lay, if se bl kiiewn it, lier desire ng enougli,\" for Tannis's company. on first meeting, alie had You mustn't told Tannis ail about herself, ber People, lier Ilfe, 0, you kaow and Tannis bad toId lier notifg Ini return as ta wlio and what ber parents wore; she loeked like a eat, a white, Scottisb woman, wltjj4lr bead ef red liair, yet denied~ IL. I cen't; being one; said abe was a Ca i, which Marlan i the ranch lnterpreted ta mean that sha Was not ta ba bouse, and enllghtened. In Marlaii's schOOIbbook, Canadian ail me and spaîýt Indlan. Marlan fol! se mu~1st solve the mystery loue: that's if she was ever ta kne'w a neblt'a peace, I'm lIn your \"Wbat a curionis naine yourls is,\" alie said. \"«Is ît an Egyptian oee?\" kigraciously. \"No, Indien.\" Lrian asked, \"Iadian!\" cried Marlixi, ln amazement, \"How strenge o! yeiir parents te, giVe You an nd Ian inlx casa of name.Y gh! te have \"My parents didn't giva 1! te me. Tliey called me A M 1_ ATE summer and short autuiun L qucly gave place ta early win- ter; for winter cornes early and stays late In that prairie country. For two days the snow bad fallen with a steady persisteucy, covering forest and prairies wltb a white blanket. On the third day it stopped as suddenly as It liait commenced. At a wlndow In tbe front of -the house Tannis stood, bier eyes fixed on the printa of a horse's hoofs; Irrégular prints, as If the rider had flot beau sure of bis golng. The heorse prints traveled onwards and onwards, al- ways goiug forward, neyer turning back, till tbey lost themselves la the distance. So 1! badl corne st last, the dreaded thlug tba.t bad stalked bier steps ever since shé had mar- rled, and bad avertaken ber at last. There was now nothlng more ta fear. She knew the worst and life was over, for bier at least. Suddeniy a shadow fell acrose the prints, blot- ting tbema ou! for the moment. TannIs iooked up, then drew baok frein tbe wiudow; she glanced hastily round, and slgued to the In- dian woman, \"'Marie,\" ohé said, \"ltake ni y son upstairs.\" Marie plcked Up the rude wicker cradie and dlsappeared wIth ItL The ecbo of ber shuffling feet was stili upon the stairs, when tbe saund of a knock made by the butt o! a riding wbip sounded on the door. Taunis iat you mnuat walked over to, It and opened IL. \"He-lw isa-good heavensi\" gasped Mrs. Wilson, I\"you downstairs? Don't yrni think tbat ls rather risky?\" Wbile \u0026lhe was speaking sbe followed Tannis In to the parlour. \"Wby9?\" asked Tannis. \"Wby?\" answered Marlan, \"wliy, because--because -no one ever cernes down for two weeks at tbe very earllest and your baby Is aniy--only-\" \"Tbree days aid. I ceuld have corne down the first day.?' \"The first day!\" Mariaon gazed at ber In arnaze- ment. \"What docter did you bave, and nurse?\" \"Marie nursed mie, and Thunder Bird dootored me; there was no tme -ta send to town amd lie 'was iu the neigbbourhood.\" M ARIAN WILSON gasped. The whole thlng was beyend' ber. For once In lier ilfe ekhe was speecbiess. \"May I see the baby?\" Marlan aoke when the silence was growing painful. \"No, oh no,\" cried Tannis, slirlnking back. 'II couldn't thîik of 1V.\" \"Why, oh I see. But I wouldu't mInd a bit,» 13mlled Mrs. Wilson, lndulgingiy. \"Mimd!\" crled Tanuis, angrlly, \"what do you mean by saylng you wouldn't mmnd? Wliat are my on's, looks ta you?\" \"Nothiug, nothing,\"' replied Mira. Wilson, hastily. She began to be the leas! Uttle bit afraid of lier liostess; for Tannis glared s.! her like soeue untamesl (Continued on page 22.), Flower 0of Prairies ains and a Burninýg House Elizabeth. The Indians gave It ta me; Tannis means Prairie Fiower.\" \"Oh, how lovely! I wlsb the Indians would give me a name lke that. How quaint and appropriate, for you do look like a prairie, flower. You're so little and sligbt, your red hair makes you look like one of those dear, littie scarlet flowers, and your big, dark eyes, their centre. You don't mmnd my calling your hair red, do you?\" \"No,\" answered Tannis, \"for It Is red.\" Marian iaughed. \"Are you abways s-a solemun, you s0 seldom smile?\" Tannis looked acrosa the prairies, a curious wistfuiness, starnplng ou! tbe usual suiben glance that had lately grnwn In her eyes. \"'There ls so littie ta sinile a! lu the prairies,\" she said, simply. Marian rose and shoak ou! bar skirts. \"I'd better ba gettIng à, home. I thiuk Jack wilb be lu soon now.\"1 Wben the sauud of Marian's borse's boofs liait dlad eway In the distance, Taunis turned and wabked Ïe inta the bouse. As she entered the kiýtchen a ameli of burnIng met bier. The, Indian waman sill squatted on the floor watchiug the aven door; witb a bapelass gesture, Tennis tbrew open the door. The bread was a black, smoking clip.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. VICTORY must lu the 'end core to the Alied forces, lu ibis greatest of ail international struggles. This becomes clearer day by day. Wben war flrst broke out the world was staggered. Tbere were ouly a few mnen who badl tbougbt It oui lu advance. Lord Kitchener, Sir Edward Grey, aud General Joffre muet bave had a falrly clear Ides of wbat the struggle would mesu to the world, and especially to Great Britain and France. Soxnebody at Petrograd must aise bave hadl a iolerably clear conception o! how the war would affect tbe Russian army, the Russian navy, and the Russian nation. There were ctber imen, publiciste, journaliste, miii- tary experts aud financiers, who badl loolted Into the future and estimated tbe force o! ibis possible shocl\u003c upon tbe world's diplomacy, tbe world's commerce, aud upon ail tbose qualîties aud. clrcumstances wbich are roughly ciassed under tbe beadluýg o! 'Iciviliza- Ater ail, these knowlug and tboughtful men were few In number. The average citizen badl no concep- tion of the effeet whlch such a war would bave upon tbe national luterests o! bis partlcular country or tbe possible effect upon the business lu which. he was engaged. Cousequently, the world of commerce and business was stunned into inaciity the moment the vast armies o! Europe begau to ruove. Even tbe shrewdest financiers of the United States and Canada were bewildered, while tbe amaller men, men who bave deemed themselves'absolute, masters of tbem- selves sud their destIiles, were tbrown lutte a state of mental paralysie. SIX weeks have passedl aud tbe world la fast re- covering froni is shock. Hai! tbe tblngs which men fesred do not exlst and will not materialize. The universal'fear and trem.blIng wbich swepi through the commercial world Is dlsappearlug. The shrewdest men lu each of tbe nations were tbe firsi to get their beariugs, sud their ciear-slghted con- fidence lu tbe ulimate resuit bae gradually wonked down froni grade tu grade untIl It bas permesatedl the whole people. It ls to the credIt o! the British leaders, political, social, aud commercial, tbat they were the first to recover from tbe trip-hsmmer blow wblch the German Kaiser admlnistered to the world. Tbe sublime confidence with wbicb tbe British race bas faced ibis greatest o! confiicts, le maguIficeut. The wonderful adaptive aud constructive capacity of the Briish people was neyer exbibited to greater advantage. Ail tbat cool, non-temperamfentai, British indifference was laid asIde and the beroic qualitles wbicb bave made tbe Briish people tbe leaders oi the world for several centurles were given frese rein. The ne-w conditions were met by new iaws, uew babite, and unprecedented resourcef-ulness. A ueNç set o! clrcumstances ln tbe lite ef the people waE countered..prornptly and thoroughly by new natloua and personal measures. Itle Is ut ibese qualilies lu tbe British people anc their Allies whlch malle for ultirnate success. Tbi German Kaiser and bis advisers tbougbt to defy thý world. They deerned tbemselves demi-gods wb\u003c coutl accornplish every dessire. Tbey declded ti matchtbeir wits, their physical streugtb, and thel bigbly sclentific war machine agaînst tbose O! ai otber nations comblned. The future historien wl uudoubtediy label their attitude and action as '\"rîdi culous.\"1 WMEIN the Germans started to Invade Beiul and France, tbey carrled everytblng befor Wtbem. Tbey carved their way through tb littie Belgiumi arrny wiib oniy slight difflculty. Pei baps tbey were astonlisbed at the resistauce offere by this puny nation, but if so thai was but a rnomei tary flash. It reQuired only a few dsys for the bue German arrnv to crusb and twist the face o! Belglu3i almost beyond recognition. Then tbey wheeled an made a mad rush for Paris. There is litile doubi that tbey expected to sweE the French armies before themn and to repeat tl triumph scored by Bismarck lu 1870. For a time, looked as if they would succeed, but fates wei against them, The French were be-iter prepared ai better led than lu the prevlous wsr. Tbey had il assistance o! a Britishi army which made up lu qual for auy lack o! numbers. Moreover, the Germai badl agalnst thern the publie opinion o! the worl Under such circumstafleel a Geruan triumph w: an ImpossIbility. In a milltary seuse the German war machine seer to have brokeni down lu the first place aloug the lin of communication. The vast quantities of ammni tion for rifles and srtillery, the still vaster quantiti o! supplies consurned every day by au srmy o! mo ibsu one million men, could not be trausported wl that speed or precision which was necessary to ma tain the German war machine st its nest. T farther the Germnan army got frorn its base of supp] and t.he longer Its lunes o! commnincationi, the lE effecti've Its strilcing power. lu the end It becai so enfeebled that the Allied armies were able to hi It in checkL. Lster, the lnevitable happened. A treai began and wiih it came a sad, sad era for the fatuouswar lords of Berlin. yET ibere were other reasoTis than ibose aiready given wby the German defeat was inevitable. The striking power o! the great British Em- pyire bas neyer yet been iested. Iudeed, lu its modern form and streugth that Empire does not know its owu power. Perhaps Lord Kitchener bad esilmaied it, but If se be neyer told what he tbought. Now we fiud the aunouncempflt made that thus non-miitary Empire, wih a standing arrny o! about one hundred and fi!ty thousand men, proposes to put two million men lu the field. The regular army WI be iucreased ,t 1,200,000; the terlcrals to 300,000; the reserves to 214,000; the contingent to be brought from India THE DUKE IN TORONTO H. R. H. the Duke ofConnaught revlewlng boy scouts and veterans at Toré1to Exhibition. With hlm (on left) la Scout Comtmissioflr, Noei Marshall, Esq., Who i. aise head of the Red Croise Society for Canada. will number 70,000, sud yet lesave huge armies ln ibat country; the Canadian contingents wili add 40,000; the Australians are sendiug 20,000; sud New Zeaiand 10,000. This yll malle au army o! 1,854,000 mer availa'bie for the dé ece o! Great Britain sud foi the chastisement o! the exponeuisý o! \"brute force.' Ail tus without endaugering tbe local defeuce o! anl other portion o! the vasi Britisb Empire. B6ilarly, the Rusi!an Empire la calling up i huge, unestimatid rnlitary resources. Althougb lesi efficient lu some respects than the Germaut, Frenc] sud British forces, uhe Russiau anmies are supenio te tbe Ausinian, as aiready bas been proveu. Gîvei urne sud numerical superioriiy, the Russians wil crush thelr way acrosa the Vistula. The rE organization of the last five years bas given the RuE alan army a strikitig power tremeudously superlo, to uhat dlsplayed lu the Russo-JapanesS war. HAD there been no British fleet, the triumph c the Allies over the Germalis would be Inevi able. So long as tbe British fleet rides thi oceau it serves only to accentuate the inevitabli lu Isan essentil part o! British defeuce, but lt ls leE essentill as a stniJtlug force againsi the hieart o! ti German Empire. Just what wiil bappen when tl British fleet proceeds to talcs active measures sud 1 co-operate with the 5atscking armies, one dos ni know. Ail that lu la uecessary to say le that il German war lords will bie defeated even if the Brttii fleet neyer stnikes anot-her blow. THERFOFRE, let Canadiaus tairs hesart sud i of good cheer. Thens neyer was suy daug iL hat the Allies would be defeated. There no possible conibinaion o! forces. kuown or unknow Why the Allies M,.ust Win BRv THE EDITOR The War Chrorjici Monday, Sept. 7th.-The week closedl With' successes at the full but wlth the Allies takin positionis. Rot figbting le reporied ail along Paris to Verdun, 150 miles. Iu tbe Marne Val] Paris, the Allies are making the 1Ir strongest while the Germans were makiug their aiiacks beiweeu Vitry sud Verdun, fartber ei Germans are aise attackiug Nancy. For lrne lu the bistory o! the campaigu the Ger'1 shows signa o! weakening su' d a victory for t] is reponted ai Precy ou the Oise, not far fr0 Tuesday, Sept. 8th.-Tbe offensive move the Allies begins to develop more strouglY, e lu tbe Paris district. The Germali righi wiflg roiled.back from the Oise te the Ourcq. At t the Allies seema to have iurued the retrea Germali right wing almost into a rout. Th,' sud French forces lu ibis district, reiu!orced iroops fromt the garçrison at Paris, are gett revenge for the indignities that had beefl 1 upon them lu previousweeks. Fariher est, Vitry sud Verdun, w'here the Germause are s bard ie break ibroughthe Fýrencb centre, the are more nearly even. Wèdnesday, Sept. 9th.--Further success Is by the French lu the Paria district sud the have been dreven back acrosa the Marne F cousîderable losses. The aitack o! the 1 aloug the hune seems to be reachlug a cliiDsý eutiy ibis la the time wheu the Allies' plait a bot atiack upon the iirlng Germau trool they would have the lowest possible supPP sud ammunition. Ou the other haud, the close 'to their base of supplies sud have beE reiuforced !rom the Paris army, frorn GrfB sud probably from India. Durlng tbe firsi t o! the week the ýrlght wlng o! the Germens pushed back about fty miles. A report !rom Petrograd ays ihat Russ1J is now free o! Ausiriauis, but admits that tbE Sare stil lu tbat .territory. Appareutly the o! the Russian army lu ibis district was il prevent a Junciion o! tbe Germans and lu ibis tbe Russians bave succeeded be5 expectaitions. 'Thursday, Sept. lOth.-In France. tue holding their owu ai every point except Nî Briish captured a baitery o! field artllefl German right wiug. Fi-om Austria cornes the announcelinen armies lu Galicia are under the persona8 o! Arcbduke Francis Frederlck, the Ieir The total Austrian bass lu killed, wouuded lng is placed ai 125,000, Thi seems tO gered the Ausirian nation. Priomler Asquith asked Parliarnent to uew caîl for another bal! million voluntE wlll brng the British army over the 11111 The Admiralty admit thai the \",Pstbfindl sroyed by a Germaxi submarlle, nt bY a Frlday, Sept. llth.-TbS Allies' lefi wi te drive back the German rlght wiug aroul and Compeigne. The Germans are la thema considerable quantities of supplies sud prisoners. The Ailes are growlug ni' confident every day sud unless Somethi1g ' appeus tbe German advance lu France l1s r maneuily checked. Saturday, Sept. 12th.-Fuuhe1' neWs Allies in France indicates that the Ger \u003eevacuated Amiens, occupied on Sept. Z'\" 1-failiug back very rapidiy. The, Germals t' r retreated from lu front o! Paris are nO'w to Rbeimns. Iu the east o! France theO \u003c aise reiiriug and tbe French have reoccul iowus. The ACermaus are evideiitly m\u0026ati effort to rasn Rheims, 1whicb ls the. Ce\" t lnos o! communication. D. Monday, Sp.14th.,-Further neW5s frOl e uhe bands o! the Russîss totals about 2C te le S qa to the Germen succesB g ln ih war o! 1870. That Russa sho-fi ltable to duplicate such a meinorable le spelis the downlfall o! the forces o! tile surtc e. Eh Receni arrivais In New York tond to uews that Russia n irocps laided l travellid by train to the South o!f ýe tbey embarked for France *SiilarWlY er prInts Information to the effeci iliat fa Indian iroops !rom Houg Hong bave cr nI. ou tbeir way to Europe. which eau prevent the destruction Of tbe pOwe the man Wbo bas claimed to rule lu Germly divine rigbt. Germaly itself will flot be cru5lbe\u0026 the mediaeval feudalisin which bas buflg as a stone about Its ueck wll be removed. There ca, no peace untîl the Germn army Is crusbed ud German navy Is transferred to other owflers. means a long, long war. Great Britalin bas mad ber mmid tbat tbe work must be done tboroug'l tbat it will not be uecessary to do i a second 1 Indeed, a long war can be preveuted onuY W' accident or *vent wbich will remove the Kaiser: tbe tbrone o! Prussia and fromn bis leadership Il German confeder-tiolI.",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMENT-CANADIAN COURIER. OF THE KAISER'S HOUSEHOLD. On ieft: The Crown PrIncess Ceclille. Centre: The Prin- cess Victoria Louise- Right: The Empress of Germany. Dreadle naturil prey In the present crisis. F.air Heads That Lie Uneasy By M. J. T. 7HEN daggers had been gripped for the daom Tbe Czar of Russia was, another roy'alty haîled by /of Caesar, it was flot he, but Calpurnia~, the populace of Berlin wben be, toa, attended the !bis wife, wbose dreams had foresbadowed nuptials of tbe Princess. He saluted tbe gay young Mthe tragic occurrence which made tbe daughter of bis cousin. Russla kissed Germany, so \u003eMarcb 0)f that year famous. The whicb In- ta put It , and tbe latter, lu the persan of Victoria ý8 tbe commnon knowledge that she wbo sbares Louise, seemed almost wIllîng ta \"turn tbe other 110w of a manarch must more tban share tbe cheek.\" Tbe osculations are done, unfortunately. Whicb attends it, sînce \"'Uneasy lies tbe bead And now, in the city o! the cbanged namne, tbe Wears a crown.- sad Ozarina and bier bevýy of daugbters must spare a re' are fair heade In Europe at the moment for tbought from theIr standing sorrow, tbe little Czare- the last montb and over the midnlgbts bave been filled wltb fateful barror. And gulît Is bow great must be foreboding! 8 tbe wife of Kaiser Wilhelm treinble as ýter Of Skule, In Ibsen'\u0026 dramna, feared wben rother, the balked pretender, emnbarked his course of devastation? Does, -Sleep no on lips not mortal trouble, rather, an linated woman as It broke the rest of the Wt1fe o! Macbeth? AIns! It is altogether that the KaisernIs beart îs a motber's, ~,Proud and wraciced In the self-saine nlt, that six taîl sons5 a! bers are doing QUJEEN ELENA OF ITALY The rare Olana of the hulis of Montenegro, whom the King of Ut mnarrled for love. She lu the slster-in-law of the Servian Sovereli King Peter. witch's illness, to 'the newer distress of dloyen friendshlp and the 'bitter sea, of hate that \"flows be- tween.\" The Czar's fair wife was a German prin- cess, and naw she must see lier adopted country engage ta the deatb against ber fatberland-ber brothers and cousins fight against ber busband. Alux of Hesse le nigh distraught with terror. Sa mucb for the griefs 0f royal women In tbree of the greatest of European countries, wbose lords, thougb joined by ties of kinsbip, are less like a famlly party at present than the crop whlcb. Is said ta bave sprung from a dragon's teetb. And yeýt there are women in palace chambers who must suifer more by the war than even these do. There ks Belgian's Elizabeth, Albert's consort, and worthy by virtue o! ber herole patriotlsm ta share every tribute paid that monarch. Her palace became a haspital and she a mlnistering angel as soon as calamity tbreatened ber coun- try and need was ta serve tbe sick and wounded. The women af ber court bad, called lier eccentric. True, sbe was a victim o! neurastbenia. Her fatber, a sIster, alsa ber brother, sbe bad lost by deatb In rapid succession-the sIster under tragic circumstances. Small wonder if gayety fell sby of bier and \"melancboly marked ber for ber own.\" It took this war ta endear ber ta Bel- gium. She le crowned^ anew In tbe eyes of ber country.- But there are sbarp thorne in the sbin- ing circlet, for this woman, too, had a German childhood! Italy's beautiful queen Is a Mantenegrin, Hler dIstress bas been acute at ber husband's posi- tion of enforced oscillation 'twlxt rigbt and con- tract. He bas sougbt ta maîntain an imperilled neutrality as mucb for the sake of bis well-loved consort, who Is sister-in-law and friend o! tbe S-ervian monarcli, as for Italy Itself, a land war- weary and confronted wIth the problewr of \"tac- ing sides.\" In bis country of regicides, Francis Joseph bas no wlfe ta be wracked with premonitIons. Tbe Exnpress Elizabeth dled by the assassin, sixteen years ago at Geneva, even as thýe price of tbe crown o! dIstress was exacted 'by violence ail too lately fromn tbe poor fated Ducbess of Hoben- burg.,0 How dread must appear tbe prospect of succession ta tbe wife of tbe Austrian Arcli- duke Francis Joseph! And, sa le the saga o! tbe poet vIndlcated. How uneasy lies tbe bead wbicb wears a crown! \" Unholy Gice \" \\WH EN a'paet toak \"Liberty\"~ for bis subject Hand coupled as tbe foremost champions of It Switzerland and England- \"Two volces are there; one 1s of the sea, One of the mounitains; eacb a mlgbty volce: In bath from age ta age tbon did'st rejoice, Tbey were tby chosen music, IAberty!\" lie p)ointed ont that In the fight agalnst Tyranny, noble zeal was the animatlng passion wbIcb was AS WVrOMEN SEE THE WAR Rein g Our Regular Semi - Monthly Woman 's Supplement ina Martial Form 1 9n,",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMENT-CANADIAN COURIIER. wout to nerve their arms for Rigbt's defence. \"There came a Tyrant, and with holy glec Thou fought'st agalnet hlm--\"2 If that then, is Engiand's tradition, to fight ber battles wltb 'heiy giee,\" whicb can oniy be done, of course, when the cause is righteous-witb such a precept to the credit of the island ,wblcb Is the source and centre ef British dlgnity and freedom-it is much te regret If a British subject forsake the preud pre- cedent for a meaner attitude, If ho juduige lu \".glee,\" whlcb le far fromn being \"boly,\" In the preseut war. The foliowing appeared since the outbreak of war on the front page of a leadùing contemnporary:- THE. EDITORIAL \"We are net vindictive. Justice is ail we ask. Malte It something slow and lingeriug witb bolling oil or melted lead lu It for the Kaiser-.\" The sarne fiooded one's mmnd with reseutment, as have bundreds of remarks-în the past few weeks, heard upon the lIps, of both women and men, wbo are advocating torture for the madman. Torture is the instrument of despotisin, surely. It is the manlac's weapen like the toothed bayonet, the ex- piosive builet aud the poisoned barb. The civiiized soldier may deai deatb, but must nlot gloat In terms of barbarism. Need is for the consecration of swords, Inciudlng tongues-those doubie-bladed weapons! VIE W-POINT B y \"E RI N\" .The Wine Press of War OUR world bas cbanged, in lîttie more than a montb, s0 that we bardly recognize the old round of Interests, In wblch we taiked of chiffons aud suffrage. The builet bas taken the place o! tbe ballet, as a settier of differeuces, and the soldier Is the man o! the heur. Admirai Destb mails the bigb seas, and tbe world awaits, with a beart.-breaking 'patience, the outeerne of ail this coufilet. Âlready eue nation bas won a place ameug the historie examples of' fertitude and courage. Little Belgiuni bas showu a greatness lu the heur ef trial, whicb Is betb iueplring aud tragie. The tbought o! the desolation whicb must follew liauits us as we read of the berole resietance whicb bas been made te the advance of the German forces. Verily, these meu sud womeu of Belgium blood bave held net their lives dear, te preserve their, independeuce, snd the exazuple and memory of their sacrifice wiil be kept lu the worldIs beart, se long as gallant deeds are honoured. But the terrible havoc o! it ail! As oe thinks of siing valieys in smeke and devastatien, wIth ruined aud forsaken bornes, sbrInes of beauty desecrated, ail that centuries badl gatbered of the noble achievemeuts ef ludustry and art rnutilated and deatroyed, ber sous wouuded sud dying, her inothlers iorloru, who cau but feel s passion of horror fer the ruler whose maiuiac vanIty bas wrougbt this ruln Iu Belglum? The victims of tyran- uic ambition are reapIng the Immemerlal harvest, and we, who are theusauds of miles frern the scene of Belgiurn's sacrifice, can but pray that It rnay net be long before this frautie course is finisbed. The penalty wbicb Brussels sud Liege have paId wIll net be !ergetteu lu tbe day of final reckoning. Criticism and Counsel W E have ne sympathy witb those cosy-corner critie who are doing notbiug for'the cause which.Is near tbe bearts of aIl loyal cItizensz te-day, bùt wbo eleet te finid f suit with every move o! autborities at home snd abroad. Such small seuls were characterized justly duriug the Boer Wýar as- \"Ye -amateurs of Euglaud, Who keep your native seats Aud crIticize so glibly The figbtlng man's defeats.\" The man wbo Is ueeded to-day Is he wbese arm. eau euforce hlm couvictions, wbiie the boit service the peu eau off or le te streugtbeu the sword. Yeto thero are triod sud experieuced counsollers, te whorn wo may well givo heed. Entbuslasm la a noble sentiment; but it muet be associated wlth forethougbt. We are confrouted wltb couditions, snch as our Empire bas net kuowu before, and the advloe of those wbo bave seen hardsbip sud who have smre realizatien of mllltary requiroments le of tbe utmost service. The first Impulse of the young girl wbo desires te serve ber couutry ie te volunteer as nurse. This la a geuereus feeling, ln itself, but fortuuately those at the bead of affaire eau accept ouly a llmited numbor o! nurses-aud vell-tralued eues at that-or the fiolds of Europe weuld ibo fiooded witb amateur Ladies of the Lamp. Noxt te fightiug, uurslug le the serneet business of ibis Armageddou. and it le certainly ne tasit fer the Inexperlouced glisb enthuesat. A mn lu charge of milltary aid euterpriee complalned that rnucb valuable trne vas lest lu replyiug te roquests for nursIug positionis frein those who were maul- !estiy unfit for sucb ýhlgb responeibilltlos. Lot our warrn-bearted girls, wbo wlsh to help, coualder wbat la the niest practical service tbey eau effer. One duty of womau lu tbe preseut crimis lm of à nogative order-tbat is, te keep eut o! mau's vsy sud net te bîndor the expoditious carrylng out ef iitary aid plans. AUl our ýCanadiau women have aboya that tbey are anlrnated by the spirt of help- fulusem, snd moat of tbem are avare o! the lm- nntnp I-If fin nnliv Pynerimeed ald. But we bome-made hose 0fe weir\u0026'imanufacture. There is ne necessity for ber to be Idle, bowever. There are rnany wbomn our Empire's defenders have le! t be- hiud tbem, who may well have our sympathy to-day, aud the znost ardent young patriot wiil find euougb te empioy bier energies moat full. The Way of Economny O %NE e! Montreal's promînent citîzens said during a; troubled week: III haven't the faintest Idea to-day what I arn wortb.\" 0f course, he'was referring te bia financlal standing, for It le siguifl- cant o! our commercial estimate that \"wertb\" re- fers te a man's banit balance, rather than te bis intellectual or moral qualities. The millionaIre admItted a condition of Ignorance wblch ls the commen experience In this season of tumuit. We are ail In a state of bewIidermeut as te our resources sud liabIlities, and realize as neyer before the truth of the Scriptural warnlug: \"Boas4 not thysel! of to-morrow, for tbou knoweet netwbat a day may bring forth.\" Iu ail the conflicting counsel as te wbst we sbeuld glve up and what we shouid retaîn, necessitles and luxuries are dIscussed witb a thorougbness of classi- fication nt attemipted heretofere. Juist let us re- lu the topsy-turvy vcirld In Wbi1ClI we navo iiveri since the firat vesit of August, vo realîze, pathetically sud practicaliy, boy subtle are the liniks o! ludustial sud teiling bumanity, bew oach is ueeded by the other. \"Il lutended te dismuIss my mald,\" said a Toronto vounan. whose muodest menage lucludos only oe doinestie belper. \"But 1 came te the conclusion that the viser sud kInder course would bo te off er ber re4tuced wages sud de a Ilttle more lu the bouse A PATRIOTIC ORGANIZER. Miss Plummner, of \"'Sylvan Tower,\"' who la taklng a le Ing part In Taranto In the systermatIztng: of vartous Il of relief work. Mer work le Iargely cc-eperative. was head of the Hospital Ship Fund commlttee, the \"si' being her original suggestion. myself. $Ihe seemed thank!ul, eveu fer the reduE ýwages sud the extra bouseworlc la not golug te h auy of us.\" Such a course seerns the sane aud c siderate policy. wberever It can be followed. Th are' mauy to wborn the comiug wiuter wil ]V actuai want o! tbe. bitterest kiud, sud these can afferd te employ labeur sbould besitate 1 before dismissiug dependent workers. Wberever wemen are assembied lu theso de the war sud the economic situation are the toi o! discussion, sud mauy are the suggestions 11savlng a penny.\"~ \"If ne one can pair cash, wo shahl ail be III same bsukrupt boat,\" sald s wemau whese buSbi bas had bis salary cut lu twe. \"II'm goiug te w my oid ciothes rather than run lu debt. But net goiug to dismîss rny char-wemau.\" \"But what wiii your dressmaker sud milliner d asked suetber. 'Il don't kuew. but the ouly thiug to do is te ploy those who seern to ueed lt mest.\"1 Se the talk gees, sud vo corne nearer te producer sud the consumrne, than we bave ever d Iu ail these yoars o! heusebold oconomces sud do] tic probloms. The war bas reduced us te tbe 'v primitive ceusiderationa of wbst shaîl vo est wherewlthal shahl vo be clothed. \"lEcouoniy\" le watcbwerd for the cemlug menthe, but that economy, vbich viii uot lese slgbt oif the cemmul as weil as the indîvîduai. Nover before bas se ra depeuded on the wise spendIng of tbe hundred CE whlch maire the dollar. The womeu I the bo' boid, as veli as the mon lu the office or the Il may weli keep before them Kipliug's latest imO558 \"Thougb ail we made dopart, The old commaudments stand; 'lu patience keop your hoart! Iu strength lift up your baud.\"' In Brief--Patr'iotism W TI-1 the permission e! the Duke of ArgyIO, 3 NY Campbell, of Steuefield, Scotlsud, la coller- s !uud te equip a \"Clan Campbell\" Bed beds) lu the Scottlsb Red Cross Hospital. subscriptions, bovever simali, from members Of Clan will be meat gratefully recelved by Mise s bell, o! Stouefleld;, lenakil, Tarbert, Loch Scotisud. Sîr WVilliam sud Lady Maekeuzie, of Toronlto, s party o! frieuds, were among the visiters obsel st Valcartier camp st weoit. It vas a curlous slght at the recent xueet ai Bonnets, Montreal, te see various groups of BO ladies knittlng duriug the lutervals for the Sl at Valcartier. The Daugbters et the Empire, of Victoria, are takiug moasurea te provide relief, fer ? familles bereft et broad-viaiiors by the depar o! the soldiers eullsted fer active service. A special 1 monl",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMENT-CANADJAN COURIER. \"The Girl 1 LA\u003c Behind Me What Montreal Women aie Doing for the Relief of Soldiers Familles Miss Reid and the Patriotic Fund S HE ia here, and we are caring for lier-I mean that tlie women of Montreal Society, the women of Montreal clubs, and the women of Montreal homes, are caring for her. She may be the mother, or the wife, or the child, but It is she of wliom \"Tomniiy\" is thinking, when lie whistles \"T.Lhe Girl I Left Behind Me.\" When 1 say the Montreal women are working, 1 mean, wliole-souled. energetic, real work. 1 have seen IL. I have been in the midst of It. Here is one of the great centres-the offices of tlie Patriotic Fund, at one of Montreal's ýbusiest corners, where Peel Street meets St. Catherine. Hefre is the Women's Auxiliary of the Fund, receiving, welcoining, si!t- ing and investigating. At the head MISS HELEN REID ON DUTY. Miss ReId Is convener of the ladies' comlilttee of the F Fund organlzatlon In Motitreal. she may be seeni, thu at headquarters wlth her helpers, surroundedl by Wh~ chlldren of absent soldiers. Woman o! it is Miss Helen Reid, daugliter mark.\"I of IMr. Robert Reid, o! Montreal, anid the Patriotic Fund la surely to be congratulated on securlng aucli an en able and methodIcal convener. Miss Reid, at lier desk, Is the cen- f tecli- tre o! surroundinig assistants, debat- ýturers, rble questions, and trylng situations. tatives Slie recelves tliem ail wltli a broad lu Tlo- ccmprelienslon and a klndly smile. acently They bave' been romlng for many leville, dlpYs Dast-tie applcants, wlves and womeu ý -' rthers o! soldiers, ln considerable s te a numbers. If you asit witli me for a whlch few minutes and watcli tlie appli- 'hnical Pants you wlll be struck by tlie nun- t such ber o! Engllsb and Scotch faces, and ,bvieus tbe volces tell that most o! these supply women bave very recently corne from the Motlierland. ýIy lm- This soft, Seottilh volce impels you fariua to listen a moment: liues \"I wlnna tak mair than twa dol orever lars for' buits for ma lassie to gae clami- to the situle wi'. I bae a' the wark Y want 1 can due wi scrubbln', an' It gles among mie eneucb for mu balrn an' masel, ,urlous but I'm gey pît aboot for the reclit nDrise, claes for ber to gue to akule. l'in ersblp nuole obleeged for Vbat, but 1 of the dinna want ony mair.\" la a Brave, Independerit littie Scotch- when woman; worthy you are te use n yet Burna' tongue! This young EnglIsbwolllan, wlth a really beautiful child in her arm's, is given transportation on the Cal- garian, to her home country. Only, lîowever, after it lias been definitely found that lier friends are able to receive her and care for lier. On these conditions alone will thie Pat- riotic Fund grant transportation. How methodically the work 18 be- ing carried on! The applicant gives a full account of lier circumistances, and family, any means of support she may have, and of lier ability toi work, if necessary. A visit of in- vestigation is made by one of the committee, and tlie applicant's naine is entered on the llst. Blie and lier family, if found wortliy, will receive a regular allowance twice a month as long as the war lasts. Miss Reid lias divided the city Into wards and districts. At tlie head o! each lias been placed a lady, wlio divides the families In her ward among lier as- sistants. Eacli assistant undertakes toi visit lier par- ticular families twlce a week, aut as thfeir frlend, and give tliem every belp required during tlie time of war. Dr. Marian Hansford liead- ed the lis ,t of doctors wbo offered to sive frese advlce and attendance to the sol- diers' familles. A group of lâwyers have offered frie legal advlce. A long llst of dispensaries and nurses and liealtb resources are at tlie dilsposal o! tlie commlttee. The Red Cross Workera. T AKE leave now o! Mi8s Reid and lier lielpers and come a moment to Belmont Street, wliere la an- otlier hive of lndustry-tie Red Cross centre. The heade o! this organization liave qulte alI tliey can do to I tbe eager lingera waut- lng sewlng for tlie soldiers. You recognize many o! the Society glrls-last years' debutantea. A year ago their heads were fllled witli thouglits o! dances, teas, tan- goes and pretty frocks. This year tbey have grasped the S knowledge o! life in the Mawful reallty and tragedy of war. College girls are liere, young matrons and a group of coloured girls anixlous to ~add their lielp In the worký of tlie Empire. If you could peep -Into \u003eatrIitic many an office wlndow on St. s, daily 'James Btreet, or Peter ees and Street, ori Ïotre Dame Street, you would ses the. business girl ait every avallable min- ute, pop lier work from ber drawer, and knlt for dear life's sake to lielp along tlie work. The \"Boss\" knows it, and lias willngly given permis- sion. By the way, we mlght remember thie little Canadian girl wlio tucked into the boot she was mnaklng ait tbe factory the tiny note: ,\"Gootl luck to the. soldier wlio goes to the war in tbese boots. Froin the littie FrenchCanadian who helped to malte therm.\" A Higlilauder preparlng to go to Valcartier round it, and was very properly touchied. So mnany fingera to work! So mnucli worlt to be doue. Pneùmonla Jackets, nlgbtingB.es, wrlstlets, bandages- everytblflg that tlie Red Cross nurse will ueed ln ber work at the. front- ahl niust b. ln exact readiness, and mnade 'by the patterns authorized. Pyjamas by the. tbousand bave been sent, too. And presently we are go- lng to malte protectors for tlie knees o! our Highlanders5. Wben Wol!e's men' braved the bitter frosts of a Quebec wlnter In tbelr Highland cos- tumne, did not the geutie nuns, iooklng tbrougb the. convent windows, sbake fteir heads in pity, and lminedlately proceed te kuit long, tbick wooilen stocklfl\u0026s to proteet tbe bare kuees You Can Change the Color of Youir Clothes With Ease You neeri fot be dissatisfied with the color of your ciothes. With Diamond D-yea ynu car' change garments that do not please you to new fresh coloured costumes. To use Diamond Dyes îs not difficuIt. In fart mnany wemnen fD home dyeing to be a fascinating pastime Mrs. C. N. Mars- den writes: \"My broadeioth suit was tango color. It became spotted, and I feit that it was worthless a n d would have to be dlscarded. I thought of send- Ing it to a dye place, but one of your advertise- ments which at- tracted my at- tention said it was very easy to dye clothes \u003eat homne with DIA- MOND DYES. 1 f e 1 t uncertaili about my abilitY to use DIAMOND DYES but I suc- ceeded beauti- fully, and my suit Is now black (Tango Broadcloth as coal and looks Oyed Black.) fine.\" Achild c.a use them' ,5i',uy dissolve th* dy. and bail te. mattriZ in te cored ate.. Miss JosephIne Howard writes: *1I arn an old hand at ýusing DIAMOND DYES, having used themn for ten years or over since I was a littie girl. My first attempt was on a pair Of cur- tains for mny moth- es birthday pires- ont. They camne out perfectlY, a deep i ich crimaon. \"Tio-day 1 \u0026end you mny picture in a skirt whlch I recent- ly dyed navy blue from a light green. It now matches a chiffon waist, and together they moake an attractive cos- tumne for afternoofl wear.\" Truth about Dyes for Home Use There axe two classes of fabrIol- Animal Fibre Fab- ries snd Vegetable Fibre Fabrica. WooI and Bi1k are \u0026nimsal fibre fabrics. \",Union\"' or 'MIXedl\" goods Are usually 60%q to 80 Cottoni (Llght Green Dyed 9O rouait, be treated Navy Blue.) as vegetable fibre fabrics. it is a chemical lmnPoss\u003cibility te get perfect colour results on ail classes Of fabrlcs with any dye that diaims tO col- our animal fibre fabrica and vegetable fibre fabrics egually well in one bath. We manufacture two classes of Dia- mond Dyes. rnamely-JYiamiotid Dye:g for wool or S11k te Colour Animal Fibre Fabrics, and Diamnond Dyes for Cotton, Linen, or Mixed Goods to Colour Vege- table Fibre Fabrics so that you may ob- tain the Vory Best results on EDVERY fabrie. Diamond Dyes Seil at 10C. Par Package Valu.bl. Book and Sanaples Fra* Send us your dealer's naine and ad- dress--tell us whether or flot be sells Dlamond Dyes3. We wili then send you that farnous bonk of helps, the Diamônd Dye Annual and Direction Book, also 36 sýamnpes of Dyed Cloth-Free- The -WELLS \u0026 RICHIARDSON CO., Llm- ited. 200 Mountaîn St., MONTREA,ýL, CANADA.",
         "WOMAN 'S SUPPLEMENT-~CANADIAN COURIER. Are .You Worried About Baby? Are there frequent attacks of Colic and Summer Complaint? Do you dread the hot spelis, because Baby is so pale and weak, and cow's milk entirely f ails to strengthen the littie one. If you are unable to feed Baby yourself-use without delay ý7M1g1nburgs\u003c]FoodSý MIL1C FOOD No.,i MILK FOOD No. 2 MALTE» F0OD No. 5 Fo' birtA te a .,,s,,t. Fre\"' a to 6 ,,o.tha. Frwn 6 ,anth-,-:-. upwarde. si Owe My Baby's Life to your Foods» bas beau written to Allen \u0026 Hanhurys by thousands of moth.rm They have realized that proPer fe.dîng saved their babies. And they know that the 'AI. le»buMysFoodapre- vent bowei troubles of babyhood and bring their littia ones sol elY through the mnuch dreaded '\"first sumuner\". There are three WAlenhury\u003e roods-each for a specific period of baby's life-each containing the. essentials for baby's perfect development, supplying the food properties needed for flesh, biood and bone, for vigor, strength and vitality. Your baby will digest and assimilate the 'Alleniburys' Foods when cow\"s milk cannot be tolerated. There wîll be a steady increase in weight and strength. The gain in health wiil protect baby against the depressing effects of hot weather. The 'Allenburys'ý Foods wilI guard baby against the danger of improper feeding, and heip baby very much during the troublesomne teething timne. BAB3Y BOOK Do flot xisk your baby's if e any longer-use the FREE 'Allenburys' Foods. Many thousanda of babies that mnbedyifl the ex- were \"not doing weii\", have grown heaithy and strong \u003eerience of manv on ths wonderfui foods. î THE ALLEN \u0026 HANSURYS COMPANY, LIMITED 1 66 Gerrard Street East, Toronto Jisn't this the Sait you have always war'ted -a Sait that stays dry and free running, da p ai ny w ahrl the year round-and especiaiiy ilu \"Regai\" Sait is the f inest grain of Wlindsor Sait prepared by a new process under perfectiy hygienie methods making a pure and perfect free running Table Salt. 126 e foodaforbabiet. We bave a free copy for you. Write us for 15. of \"lles Ecossais\",? Of course, history repeats itself, anci again in the FrenchCanadiafl province the Bsters oIf the veil, like the rest of women, are busy making garments for the soldierS. The Imperial Order \"At It.\"1 N OW leave these busy workers, and for one moment visit th,ý home of the Daughters o! the Empire on Bleury 'Street. They are preparing the means to keep \"Tommy\" comfortable on the field. This pile of Balaclava helmets are much softer and cozier than their name implies. When one is pulled over the head of a soldier lad, as hie lies down to go to sleep, the niglit frosts will have littie chance at his ears or his nose. Think of the differ- ent women who have ltnitted them and helped to bulld sudb a pile. Wo- men of the surrounding country towns, and farmn houses; women o wealth, and women of very, very small means; womnen o! leisure and women wlth only a f ew moments snatched from a million household cares! And the resuit is ail the same, and lies before you now. The little housewives, too, wlth their tiny askelus of black wool, and' lihaki wool, bachelors' buttons, and safety pins! Close your eyes for a moment and see the picture they briug to you: a little group of rifle- meu or Highland lads sltting lu front of .a tent, knees drawn Up and eyes screwed upon the vastly serionis busi- ness of threadlng a needie. I Incline to thinli that the linen \"housewife\" wlll conjure up many addItioual. thouglits of a tender sort for \"the girl I lef t behind me.\" Meanwhîle, you and I are proud, and every Canadian womaf lai, like- wlse, to .be helplng the, cause of couflry and empire, lu our dIfferent way from the meu's way-whIch Is, none the less, like theirs, alert and hearty.G.A C. W. P. C. Patriotic M ISS ANNE ME)RRIIL as beel' elected President of the St. John's Ambulance Brigade lu Edmonton and la organizing classes to reuder flrst aid to -the InJured. Mrs. Arthur Murphy bas organized a tranich o! the St. John's Ambulance Association In the samne City for the purpose o! making garments and htospital requisites for the men at the front. Mrs. Arthur Murphy, o! Edmonton, the Pressident of the C. W. P. C., was elected to the Central Commltteeof the Women's Hospital Slip, and'ap- 'DoInted Miss Edith Macdonald, the Presideut of the Toronto Branch, to act as hier proxy., A movement Is being Inaugurated this month whereby the different clubs or the C. W. p. C. will eud a home letter from ,each Province to, the soldiers at the front, whether on active service or in the hospitals. This letter will contain home news and bright messages of cheer to \"Our BOYS.\" A special meeting of the Toronto Branch was called on Wednesday last to discuss the part that the Press women shahl take lu forward- ing the work of relief to war su!- ferers that wlll be carried on in that City. Mrs. Ambrose Dickins, the Domin- ion Secretary, addreszed the Calgary Club this month at the Palliser Hotel. Mrs., Anle Anderson Perry, \"Ph11- istia,\" of Winnipeg, who made a climb of Mount President lu the Rock- les 1 eat mouth, has~ peeu visiting ln Calgary and Edmonton this mnonth where she addreseed the local cmbs.",
         "CANADIANC RE. Our London Letter (Concluded from last week.) London, Aug. 2Sth, 1914. C OIL upon coul the great Siav move- ment cornes siiding from the East. It is a shuddersome cam- paiga, this of our great Aily. This is the first time that Russia has moved prepared at ail points and with a wiaole-hearted people behînd her. Shi, cornes as the head of the ISlav peoples, and that fact, crowned by the epoch- making promise to Poland, has made one stream of ail the wayward na- tional torrents. There is something very like Freemasonry in the Slav nations, and this has ma.de tie pra- sent campaign against the buily of the Blkan States and lier bectoring supporter, a holy war In the eyes of the Russians. A student af Russian affairs has toid me that it is bis opin- ion that no ambition of aggrandise- ment for Russian aims, no desire for territory, could have moved the great mixed Empire of the North ta one- haif the degree that the continued op- pression of the Slavs in Aiistrla-Hun- gary and the Balkans bas done. Late- ly in Russia bimself, be said that what impressed hlma more than sanytbing -Iwas the fact that this almost religious fervour, instead of finding vent In use- less outbreaks of frenzy, concentrated ltself lit continuous effort directed by their officers. These officers comt from a elass that Is littie known. We' are too apt ta, regard Russia as a coun- try consisting of two classes, serfs and nobles, 'but as a matter of strict fact the backbone of modemn Russia is a prosperous and numericaiiy strong middle ciass: mercbants and men of the professions, and from this class the great bulk of the officers ln bath army and navy are drawn. Russia went inta the Japanese War against the will of the people, agalnst the judgment of the majorltY of the better ciass; \u0026she was dragooned Into It by a mllitary clique just as Germany la naw dragooned, onlY Infinlteiy more unwdiiingly. As a result, she was soundiy and deservedly beaten, and she learnt that ber barbaric military clique was ail wrong. Sa she ex- tinguished it, and reconstructed ber forces, with the resuit that to-day, when she goes to war on a righteous erra.nd, shte moves with magnîficent suppleness and with science ta, back ber strengtb. The declaratian o1 Japan set free ber Siberlan legions, and they join the invading force at once. So she cames on, coul upon ln- evitabie coi. Germs.ny surikes bard witb ber hands ln tbe West, but be- fore she is aware of ber extremity that cold, irresistible pressure wlli bave crept up about ber beart. W are a nation of sbopkeepers, a0 our netghbours tell us, and what was originally lntended as a sllght bas at i engtb become a tribute. Commerce Is tbe dominant factor of mnodern International pollty, and in commerce tbe British peoples pervade the seas of the world, as In war they secure the peace of tbem. Consequently it Is aniy naturai tbat a concentrated attack should be made upon the trade of Germany, especi- aily that Overseas. Whilst German commerce is canflned aimost entireiy ta Internai exchange, the ian.g-saught opportunlty 0f ousting it tram, at least, the markets of the Eflmpire accurs, and great movements are on foot ta reacb the much desired end. To read tbe gllb leaders In the papers, and ta hear many business men speak on the subject, *one would thlnk tbat trade was to be bad for the askIng, but I bave seen a great deal of the organisation af the campalga, and It Is a tremendous and a iengthy task ta upset tbe scientiflcaily constructedl trade connections of Germany, eveil with the golden opportunity that now presents itseif. But there is fl this movemnent an opportunity for every Britîsher. if we could only malte It a rnart of every transaction ta ask, \"Where were the goods manufac- tured ?' wp could revolutionize the trade conditions of the world. This, however, will be dgfflcult unless man- ufacturers get soene goverament guai- antee for their expensive campaign-s. HAROLD TRACY POOLEY\u003e WVEANINO BABY It ia always an aurions timue 'with Mathers 'when it is advisabie to wean the Baby, ta knaw what is best to feed them on. There is nothing better t'han NEAVE'S FOOD FOR INFANTS ht is used la every'part of the world, end lias been the standard food in England for nearly go years. it is the oldest, the cheapest, and Stil /he best. \" 231 Dorien Street, i)er Sr:-Montreal, 30 Jufle 1913. I received the sampie of Neave's Pood and can highiy recomntnendý it. M y Mother Usedit for a farmily of 13 children-my wife le pleased with il. Our Baby 18 increasingdalily in weight and she says ail her friezids \"Ia know of the food. Vustay C. H-. LEWIS.\"1 N£AVn'S FOOD is sold in iclb. tins by £11 daruggists. FREE TO MOTHER. Write for free tin of Neave's Food end capy of a valuable l3ook--\"Hints About Baby\"l ta the Canadian Agent Edwin Utley. 14 C Fr-ont Street East, Toronto. 48 M.ris J. R. Neave \u0026 Co., Ungland. Peace Hath Her Victories no Iess renowned than War --- and chief among the victories of a peaceful and well ordered civilization i SHREDDED WHEAT the cleanest, choicest product of the highest of ail human pursuits --- the tilling of the soil --- a food that supplies ail the body-building elements in the whole wheat grain. Shredded Wheat is anwevangel of peace and health---a builder of sturdy, robust men and women fit for the day's work. Always the same price, always the same quality. Two Shredded Wheat Biscuits, heated In the aven ta restore crispness and eaten wlth mllk ar creamn, wiII supply ail the nutriment needed for a haif day'. wark at a coat of nat over four cents. DeliclausIy r\\aurlshlng and satis- fylng for any meai wlth fruits or creamed vegletabies. Made by The Canadian Shredcled Wheat Company, Limited Niagara Falls, Ontario Toronto Office: 49 Wel«ingten St. East fiu G In DalIy Use INDISPENSABLE ON EVERY DRESSING-TABLE REPU8E SUBSTITUTESI Always b. sure to look for Our Trade ]Itak on the. neek of the. botti. CO URIE R.",
         "CANADIAN COUJRIER. War Notes. 0 burglars la Paris sînce Aug. 2, says a repart. Paris awalte Nnational burgls.r8. Oaa a! the next Pages a! the world'5 , histary is due to ba a woman'a page - aad aý sad one. e Latast llterary rlvairy amaOng the nations is in the developaient of the si best news-ceasors. ai \"The woman and the chlldrali first!\" exclalms the Zeppelin craw as il draps bombs la sleeping citias. b. G. R. Geary, Toronto's Corporation Il Ccunsel, bas jolnad the iroops. Ha ji wantS to lire somethiag more effec- tive than writs at the Kaiser. Eurape's fields are belng fertllzed ,ý,th the most costly fertiliser that d klngs and emperors cau flnd. c The Kaiser givas-an occaslaflal iron cross ta Boule heroic relative, but it would keep hlm busy providing woodan crosses for the brave fellows v ho dlad for hlm. Tbe Russian steam roller was slow la gatting a start, but it gathars mo- manti as il goas along. Tbe great thing for the British peoples ta do ls ta keep thair hearte as stout as thosa o! thair soldlers. Like tbat greater warrior, Jullus Caesar, tbe German Kaiser is avar- ambitions. The allies must emlulata Brutus and cul; hlm. If wa remembar rightly, il; was two or three weeks5 ago that the Germa.f ambassador at W~ashington anaoi.ifled tbat tae war wao' over, and tbat Ger- many had won. The ýCzar, bas re-named the Rue- slan capital Petrograd. 'Wben il; cames the urne for hlma ta r e-namfe Berlin ha wlll put Da \"Pet\" la It. Payiflg the lndemflity. Whaa the war's over Germnila wll gai A note tbat will rathar surprise bar, And looklag about for a way Out o! debt Sbe miay suddefly say, \"Hock der Kaiser.\" Wili Convince Hin.-After the war, wben ieh secs the Alleés' palie raquesi that hae psy sama rather large bills whlcb ha causad ta ba con- îracted, tbe Germnax Kaiser may sud- denly décide thai it's tinta for a moratorium. Sounded Like it.-I-Ha-\"ýDoes site sixig for paye\" Sha-\"I should ralier faacy that it is for splWe.\" Isn't It Odd?-M\u0026fl lsa \u0026 xervy ani- mxal. HIe flide a nice girl, talls lbar that nothlig Is good exioi.gh for bier, and ihan asica hér ta take hlm. Yourng Men, Use Candy.-~~Dctors aaw assert that candy le a good hieart tonic. Does ihie expiain wby sa mnany Young men buy cady whean bloodthlrsty thought. man than we had W bt àtmark somethintS about the ehaPB that Doge of War.-Hereafter, la the pu thRIurria la Prussia. lst o~f doge o! war the Gantas dhhlidmust be giVeul a place. Ther'se alw5,ys root a, te top- dahhn d gntshb l dog l u h olds ad a W 01maI can always ftnd raom ,n,,t~~a th,, oald Briis bul o Reversed. - Experts have figured ~that the cost of war tes so great that it coets about $16,000 te kill a manin l battle. W;e used ta hear a lot about the pigh cço : iving. but it isn'i ut 8% Xtoi Every Convenience.-This Is an ad- co, irtisement recentlY insarted in a oronto paper* N \",Singla bads $1 eacb, steam heated, m ectric llght.\" About the only thing left to be de- *m red about a bed lîke tbat is an utomnatlc alarm cdock. The Soltin.-Many a man would h e parfectly satlsfied tbese bard mes If hie wife bad a good steady b. Wel Educated.I-Hon. ,Col. Sain th Lughes, Minister o! Militia, the other ro ay received a letter from a little ir bild, addressing hlm as \"Gteat Lord pi arn.\"1 Tbere's no doubt about. it, tbat F ,hlld bas been proparly tralned. W W a A Patriotic Poem. wish 1 were a German shlp Upon the great Nortb Sea, so that aid England's fleet couid c knock a Tbe stuffiIig Out Of me. Couriergttes. MAfý may be la advallce of hie, Aage, but a wamaa. ls aiways bebind it. 1t doesa't haiP much If a juan be reguI2ar la bis habits, if eaid habits be bad onas. Octagenarlans in France receatly aaced the miXiXe , provlng that peo- p le are neyer too aId ta leara the modern f001 dances. Exvarîments la Eangiand showed that whiskay can be used as motor fuel. Nul; tha first case, howevar, of auto-lntoxiîcatlan, ht took twenty-two yaars for a posteard ta, travel 30 miles la Scot- land. -Now we undeatand why Jakes are reputed to travel 80 slowiy thare. Saldiers somatimes find, it neces- sary ta trust more to their legs than tu ihaîr armes. \".Wbat is Germnan honouri\"', querÎ'es a baading la a Toronto paPer. And the answer le-lt lsn't. Sci1 entistes say tbat the aarth wll last for 15,000,'000 years yet. Thlak of aIl the ne'w f amînîne fashions ihal. can be contrlved la that t1m 1e. Garmian officere Wha fail ta par- formn taske set for themn are exipected ta suicide. Will the Kaiser obey the rula? And by a curlaus freak of fortune, the name o! tha Kaiser wa.s On h lit. of nominations for the naext Nobel pes.ca prize. Kansas 'City is ta have a skyseraper iromr whi0h masn are to ba barred. Truly tae wamean will ba up lin the air there. They tell us that tha aid Romians used ta play gaif. NawY we begin ta eL orna llghi on the de9h of Caeear. HIe probably boasted Of bis scores- atch on the present higli COst Of ng. t Was New ta Hlmn. -Josef ansky, conductor of the New York ilharm;OflIc orchestra, and one of most noted musiCianS in America, le on a visit to Canada recently, ated an incident that mnade bis teners smille. sed ~t Is said that AmeriCa sed \u003e0,o00,00 annually on music, but emilionaire that Mr. Stransky d about had evidently falled to ntribute a copper to that total. It was at a big hotel function ln ~w York that the noted musician Atter the Introduction, the mnan o! illions asked- -What is your occupation?\" \"Coaductor of the Philharmfonie,\" plied Mr. Stransky. \"The Philharmonic? Why, 1 neyer ard of that railroad.\" Parisian PolitenIss. - Now that aris loomS so large ln the eye Of .e world, a littie story told by a To- nto, woman as illustrating the ex- eme politene8ss of the PariÉian Peo- .e znay be interestling. -Na nation le as courteous as the rench,'\" says thls woman. \"'When1 1 as la Paris somne montbs ago i Was 'alking down the Champs Elysees ad wianted to, flnd a particular street ailed the Rue de la cloche. Not nowiag jusi where to tura off into lie side streets 1 asked a Young 'renchmafl who paSsed me 1f he ould direct me. lia assured me wlth thousand Pardons that he dld not :nOW. \"A faw miînutes later 1 heard ~urrying feet behlnd me, and there Xas my Frenchmnan, almost braath- -s. Madame,' ha said, sweePing off his bat and bowingpoaulY did you not ask me the way ta the Rue de la cloche? 1 W\u0026s gorry that- 1 did not know, but 1 have seen MY- brother and aslked hlm, and 1 amn sorry to lnformn you, madame, tbat Lie dld not kaOW elther.- just a Bit SarcaStie. -Sydney Rosenfeld, wha wrltes POems and pîsys with equai ease, and whose comedy, \"The iCharm O! Isabel,\" was recelptY' given a try-Out la Toronito bY MIs PercY Has el telis with Bome zest lîttie storY Of the late Maurlce Barrymore, theý noted actor and wit. lnclentally, eh point o! the jolte iatteexpense or Mr. Roselnfeld. One day Barrymore was eign dowfL Vlfth Avenue, New York, when Raenfaid met hlm. The playwright, excitad, began ta pour a tale of waa into Barrymore's aBars. yuha4o -\"Oh Maurice, have yuhado my muiefortiue?\" he asked. \"a\"sald the BympathetC actar, \"leB there iilness ia yaur family?\",M \"'Not that, but almiet as bad. M litile boy, tve years of age, gat hold o! My naw play, and tare it ta tat- \"I ddn'tkno the chld could read,\" sald Barrymùre, and contlinued bais walk- Vou Can't Be Sure.-Wbefl a man The Luxury of a Tut right In your own borDE the trouble or expense of atte House. Why fiy tô druý9s fo: ache or pain? Byi keep'ng t) from dirt and sweat by helpilng Il RKEi Riiii6NWAINET M 541 ThR. Ds, Wall' Boys- Ingersol Cream Chee ie a pure wholesomne delica manufactured under ideai col', tions. The same icruPulous c is observed in every detai1 of preparatiol-eVen to the wrappil THEN-i Packed ini Pure, d proof vegletabie p armechoaumt. MECE-AIwais inesu *ad sol The Finest and Richest Creani Money Can Buy îs used ta mnake Ingorsoli Creain It. delicious flavour - its creamny ency-its nutrive properties 1 superior ta any otiter cheese. In Packets-15c. \u0026 25 The Ingersoli Packing CO-# 1 Ingersoli, Ont. A Slight Changesos\" She uaed ta cai hi- \"IOlogaiOe, But whefl hels on the spree And se would fain describe hilm weII She drops the letter \". Conaummrate BlockHead. - The Kaiser le sald ta own tumber in Brit- lsh ýCalumbia ta ,ie valua o! nine million dollars. Some a! It le believad ta bave gona to hie s d Ravlsad estimates o! the cost a! Tbe War comlng frani Parls place tha prlce ta clviiizaiaf at $22,000,000 a day. This dues not includa the naVy, and le based on a centeus of 8,000,000 max in tha fiý-\u003ed, eacb costlag $2.50 a day, as determuiaft lly the Balk~an War. Thé balance o! tba cost will be for artilry and bores-",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Youthful Complexion The woman who desires that delii a t ely clearo~nd smooth complexion of youth should procure at once a bottie of GOURAUD 'S ORIENTAL CREAM This old reliable complexion ,eautifier hl a a '110 for nearly bree - quartera fa century, and !you wnîl use lit ~iknow why la s been ~-~ a\u003ePnlar for se ,any yéara. It purifiés and eautillés t h e klia and cannot be aurpassed' 'Ir thé relief of tan, pimples, reckIles and other blemiahea fthe Complexion. At Drugglots and Department tores. elrd. T. Hopkins \u0026 Son, Props. 7 Great Jone8 Street NEW YOIRK ,wthra Mulock \u0026 Co. Toronto Stock ]Erdige Brokers And Bankers KCING STREET EAST \u003eRONTO, CANADA ýÈJ£ ADDRUS..CAWLOCK, TOIRONT linlative Memory; or 16~W t. Attend an Nioyer Forgt of* - Loisette. The comploe * Mweznory system. its afin le te o the Power of memory ln much ýe roportion as th 0 power of the viila creased by means of leoc nd teleacope. l2mo, 70 P. Price $3 00 post-pald. \"e no hesjalti n l commending or Lo1aettes sy\u0026tem to ail who es-Meslet la wlahlng te train their 111inlent Aatronomer. NlORMAN RICHARDSON fellngtn treet . Toronto FIN AN CIAL THE hiýgh prices, being received for grain and other farm pro- duce seem likely to have an im- portant effect on the supply of loan- able funds later ln the autumn. There have been fair crops ia Ontario, good 'crops in Manitoba, fair ln Saskatche- wan and slightly better ln Alberta. The British navy assures a market for Canada's surplus products. The war, and even subsequent peace, seem to assure a continuation of high prices, the latter because of the withdrawal of s0 many men from active employment through the war's destruction. Because London has been the world's financial clearlag house, the 'British moratorium on blls of ex- change became aecessary. But Can- ada is not a rival of Lonaon ia thîs respect, and so has less need for any such legisiation. Ia fact, Cana- dian banka seem webl supplied with i esources to meet existing commer- cial requirements. It is a question la bankers' opinion, what these existing commercial requirements should be. One général manager bas said: \"No industry in a sound posi- tion with a legitimate dlaimi on bank suDuort la indulgjng la antl-bank crlticism. Their needs are fully comn- prehended and met. it la a ques- tion o! orders. The outbreak of the war caused a réduction of ordérs. Under these circumstances we took thé vi' ew tbîat manufacturera must en- deavour to rua for a minimum amount of timé and for a maximum length I o! time, extending labour and wares over thé longeat period of weeks.\" The present pollcy leaves thé batiks la good position to fin- ance expansion o! lndustry as It aurély wll develop with the retire- ment o! thé war from Its présent prominence miercial wor That 'Can moratorium able when s Argentina, have found tent, and e pean countr and Switzeî prised by T NOTESI ln the mind of the Coin- Id. ada does nlot need a is ail the more credit- uch far-away countrIes as Brazil, Peru and China It necessary, to some ex- yen non-beilgerent Eure- les, such as Italy, Norway land. One ls less sur- urkey. The milis of the Dominion Textile Company are operatlng at 100 per cent. capacity f'or the firot time ia more than a year. This la nlot the result of capturing German trade, but of capturing British trade. Nor le It the result of British trade ceas- ing to operate. It la due to the un- certalnty as to the cost of such Brît- lsh products. With exchange unset- tled, Insurance hligh, and dates of shipment uncertain Canadian deal- ers have placed their orders at home at a known coat and date of dellvery, rather than la Britain ait uncertain cost and uncertain delivery. There has flot been much trade la this country la cotton producta to be taken from Germany. A factor of strength la this situation la that thèse 'Canadian milîs are al worklng on orders, not ta store up products..Thé requirements of the Governmeat and others has called for some Increase In production, but the great part of the increased activity has come from the demand ordinarlly supplled by imports. The active demaad la thia fine is an encouraging reflection of ,general trade conditions. The Canadlan Consolldated Rubber Company aise announicea the resump- t'ton of full-time actlvity la Its fac- tories. The company opérates ten factories at various -points la Eastern Canada. S tory of the War (Oontlnued from page 6.) b eéénBritish Ambassador Goachen an d HerVon Jagow, Germant Secretary o! State. Von Jagow marveled that the Ambassador should thiak war possible betwéen Germaniy and England ail on accounit of a 4scrap,-0f paper,\" which was the Hague agreement to respect the nieu- trality of Bebglum. But the scrap of paper was beglnning: to become the changed map of Europe. That samne day the. British Parlia- ment votéd a war loan of £100,- 000,000. Thé very next day the Reichstag la Berlin, having prevloiis- ly shaken hands with the emoctional Kaiser, doubled the amount. The Britiash Territorlala. were called out 150,000 strong, brînglng the army 11P to a war footing o! 730,000. Lord Kitchener called for recruits. The country was put under martial law. The Bank of England rate went up to ten ver cent. :Stock exohangés closed la ail thé financlal centres of Europe. The machlnery o! crédit bad broken down. London no longer had any market for Berlin securitiés. Owing to the International character oÊ modéra finance, Wall Street, finali- cial headquarters of the only great n eutral power, was forced also to close its doora. Exchangés la Montréal and Toronto were closéd. Gobd ceased to cross international boundaries. Every nation lnvolvéd was absorbed la hoardlag its gold, a commodlty in whlch thé leé.dlng banks of England, France and Rus- aXa had an éaorzAous adantage over Germany. There would be no direct bass In crop. No armies devastatéd Britiash harvest fielda. With our trade routes héld clear by British cruisers, and the German fleet bottled up la Heli- goland, with Goverament guarantées o! marine Insuranc, thé tradé of Great BrItain held as near normal as possible, wbile thé trade of Europeaa countrfés went to thé iNall. A moratorium, delaylng débt- payments for a préscrlbed pérlod, made it impossible for lnvestéd capi- tal te, bécome thé plunder of un- acrupulous creditors. Canada votéd a million baga of flour for British conaumpion. Thé arrivai of thé flrst conalgamnent hélped to kéep thé priée of flour near a normal level. The famine- price boa! waa warded off. Owing to thé pan.icky conduét of a large nunibér of people stocklng their cel- bars wlth food beforé thé nation had recovered its poise, the Geverament lnstltuted measures to prevent cor- nering of provisions. In this coun- try thére was an immédiate concert- cd effort on thé part of thé' Canadian Press As- oclation and thé Canadian Manufacturera' Association to main- tain advértlsing and thé machinery ,ýË business goln« as usuai. Manufac- turers began to réalisé thât while somne industries were béiind te suifer, others were alréady beglnning to re- store full timé, and iu sème cases ovértimie, to protuce soims of thé gooda formely lmported from Europe. Graduabîy, liowever, England and Canada and .Australia settled dowa to thé cool-heeded poise aeoeaaary la thé conduct o! a great war when evervthinoe noqsih1n wng hin~ An'. --e., - is Usual\", and. Dana bat- We oiwn-andoHfer a wide range of Can- adian CiyBonds to Yield 5%05 t. 53,% Particulae, UPon Requeaî oeRO)FATIONI-LIPIITED The Merchants Bank Of Cana HEAD OFF ICE - MONTREAL Président, Sir H., Montuu Allan. VIce-Président, X. W. tlackweL Géneral Manaer, EB. F. Hebden. Pald.up Capital.....7.00Ooo Reserve Fund an il. vided Profites...........7,248,134 220 BRANCHES IN CiANADA Generai Sanking B3usiness Transacted. Saviags DEPARTMENT at ail b~ranches. iDeposlta of $1.00 d upwards recelved, and interest allowed at béat current rat es. TORONTO OF*'ICES, 13 We»Iington St. We.9t; 1400 Queen St. West ( Parkdale\u003e; 406-408 Par- liament St.; Duadas St. and Ron- ceavallés Ave. The. Iupoeiul TrusaC.pn of Caa\"d MOTGG Pao u\u0026rVJIAa RUA\u003e Ouisca: 10 RUe6n..4 St W.u*, Toeu. T.ILPL 214 The Basuis of the SNation'a Wealth Real Estate ls the basis ef the Nation's Wealth. It produces that which both man and best muet have to sustain 11f e. Wlth our ra- Pidly increasing population cornes the demand for a correspondîng increase ln the products of the soif, and ibis demand will neyer be less than now. Land cannot be destroyed, and with proper care Its Producing power niay be main- tained Intact. Land values, there- fore, Possess that element of Per- manency that reduces the sPecula- tive feature to the minimum. This corporation's borrowed funds (Deposits and Debentures), and by far the greater Proportion of the shareholders' money,9 (Capi- tal Stock and Reserve) are Invest- ed ln flrst mortgages on improved, productive real estate. To afford an opportuaîty to ail of Investing their mnoneY with such absolute safety, we issue our Debentures ln sums of one hundred dollars. They are a security ln whf ch Trustees are authorized to invest Trust P'unds. Cail or Write for sPecimnen De- benture and coPy of Annual Report CANADA PERMANENT MORTGAGE CORPORATION Paid-up Capital and Reserve Fund Exceed Ten Million Dollars. TORONTO STREET, TORONTO. ESTABLISHIED 1855.",
         "CANAIAN COURIERI. Electiric- Service Means comfort, convenience, economy, and safety. The home that is completely equipped with electri- cal devices is a happy one. Ail the drudgery of housekeeping is eliminated by electricity. You can wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep cool in summer and warm ini winter, by means of electrical apparatus designed especially to relieve you of un- necessary and fatiguing labor. At our showrooms ail these devices are ready for your inspection. Competent demonstrators will operftte and explain them for you. The Toronto Electric Light Co., Limited * AT YOUR SERVIE 12 AdaW St. E. Téléphone Adelalde 404 -No beer brewed gives such general satisfaction Io so many« men as COSGRAVES MILD, (iliW-proof) PALE ALE Men drnk what they like---that's why almost Al true judges of ' good beer prefer Cosgraves. Au Ilgbt as agev. HO1TEL DIRECTORY KING ED)WARD NOTEL Toronito, Canada. -Fl reproof- Accommodation for 750 Kflests. $1.50 UP. AmrerUca and Europeanfl ?ans. MOSSOP HOTEL (Llmlted) TrORONTO, ONTrARIO, Europear Plan. AbsoIutely Fireproof. Roorns wlth or wltheut bath from $1.30 and up per day. QUEEN'S HOTEL, MONTREAL $2.5, to $4.00 Arnerlcafl Plan. 300 Roomes. THE NEW FREEMAN'S HOTEL. (Europeafl Plan.) One Hundred and Flfty Rooms, ,qingle rooms, wlthoN.t bath, $1.50 and $2.00 per day; rooXils with bath, $2,.00 per ,lay and upwards. st. James and Notre Dame Sts., Moritreal. THE TECUMSEH HOTEL. L.ondonl, CanadIa. Ail rooms wifhrunnfi5 hot and coNi wate-r, also telephones. Grill roomn open 8 to 12 i\u003em. Geo. H. O'Neill, Proprietor. red enough of the forts of Liege- occupy the town. The French aptured the unfortified town of Mul- ausen In Alsace where a large Ger- an army was operatn-g under. the rown Prince. Having occupied Liege and taken eneral Leman prisoner and having \u003est General Von Emmich in action, ermany moved towards Brussels. ritain seized Germau Togoland in Vest Africa. France broke off diplo- matic relations with Austria. The= erman dreadnought Goeben with hie cruiser Breslau took refuge In he Dardanelles under the wing of rurkey. Britalu declared war on %Lustria. That made the comabined 3ritish and Frenchi fleets lu the %editerraneafl effective against the ~ustrlan fleet. Two days before the Ks.lser's date f dining iu Paris, German cavalry were routed by Belgiaus ait DIest and ,y the Frenchi at Spincourt. The Kaiser'% army was stili Iu Belgium. T'he next day the French and the Belgians linked forces. The day that he Kaiser expected to reach Paris he French defeated a Bavarian corps n Alsace and the, Czar promlIsed I-lome Rtule to Poland. On August L6th Japan, through the Anglo- Japanese Alliance, gave Germany a wveek's ultimatum to evacuate Klao- Chau. The next day there was a naval fight in the Adrlatic when an Austrian cruiser was suuk. ,Meanwhlle the day after the Kaiser had exuected to dine lu Paris, Generaï Frenich arrivedl thero and was given a different kInd of reception. France. broke Into huzzas, «'Le Marseillaise\" and \"Dieu Garde Le Roi.\" The Belgian Goverument mov- ed Its officers to Autwerp. The Ger- maus marched through Huy and Jodoigne to Brussels where, without flrlng a gun, they levied a tribute of $50,000,000. The Kaiser appeared at Maluz, personally directing his army. ARMAG1ODDON was now arriviug. Wlth the Russian \"steamn roller\" advaucing lu three sections on East Prussia, through Poland and on Galicia; wlth three or four or per- hape fIve German armies operating ln Beigium and Alsace-Lorraine; wlth Austria trylng to strangle Servia and te get away ln Urne to check Rus- sian advatices; with the British fleet awaitiug for the German navy to corne out from Hellgoland and Wilhelmshaven, wlth Japan walting for the hour to go pounding at Klao- Chan; wlth German shlpplng to the tune of more that t2.4~00,000,000 a year chaeed off the high seas by British cruisers; with Italy ap- parently ready to mobilize agaluet Austria; wltli Turkey leanlng towards Germany and the Bal- kans ready to go at the throat of Turkey; wlth Belgian and French troope In active coujunction against the huge German machine lu Bel- gium; wlth airehlps and Zeppelins takirmlshiflg In the blue and gettlng ready to drop bombe wherever cou- veulent; with a British force of 110 000 men and a heavy force of cavalry and artlllery getting ready to join with the French and the Belgians ln the cockpit o! Europe; -wlth daily expectations of the great- est battie sInce the world began not far front Waterloo; with only Sweden., Norway, Swltzeriand, Sp)ain, Portugal and Denmark outslde the European zone of actual war-withln two weeks after England declared war upon Ger- many the world was up ln arme la a wray that begail to make Norman Angell's \"Great Illusion\" a grirr reality, and the contention o! financiers that the world's busines, .oudn't afford t. have a worldwa the greateest Illusion of ail. And by a littie after the middle o! Aýugut wýhlle one haîf of North Amrca wla s the only great civlized nation lu the world not at war, the othýer haîf luj Canada wae at war be- cse y nud was at war. On AugUet 18th there was a war session o! th e Canadian Parllamnent, which vote.d $SO,00 0,000 of a war loan and backed up the Militla Departmeflt ln its xnobllzation o! au airmy of mo:re than 20,000 Canadians. Valcartier begali to emerge as the second most",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. faînous milltary centre to Quebec. City and town and rural regiments began to muster from Charlottetown to Victoria. The Royal ýCanadian Regiment was called from various centres to Haifax. The Rainbow was put into, action on the Pacifie in con- junction with Frenchi cruisers. The Niobe was Put into commission. A squadron of British cruisers was sent across the Atlantic. Witli a, hundred regiments furnishing drafts for the new four brigades being organized at Valcartier, with millionaires and -plain people donning the khaki, and other ratriotic citizens raising millions for war fonds, with guards on ahl the canais and waterways, with every village and farmhouse in the land excited as neyer before, Canada was actively in a state of war. On August 21st an army of 500,000 Russians was reported to be on Ger- man soil. Germans drove back the French in Lorraine and occupied Luneville. General Pau more than held his own in Alsace. August 23rd, Japan began operations at Kiao-Chau; tbey are stili going on. Next day came the surprising news of the fail of Namur, which. was supposed to, be as well fortifled as Liege. Tis gave the fIrst intimation that the German army in Belgium was equipped with artillery that might be effective ln a possible siege of Paris. At Neufchat- eau French and British retired with- out retreating; thus beglnning a series of strategie retirements which for weeks, with very little reai news from the front, began to look like a- weakeniug of the French lunes of resistance. AUGUST 26th the British held teir lines at Mons but lost 2,000 men. Then began the brief era of iilines holding.\" A Zeppelin dropped bombs ln Antwerp. Belgians defeated a force of Germans at Malines. Next day British troops had a third day's ifight with the Ger mans and retired on Arras. August 27th the Kaiser Wilhelm der Grosse, a German liner and auxillary cruiser, was sunit by the British Highflyer off the west coast of Africa. Longwy surrendered t0 the Germans. The German cruiser Madgeburg was sunk by Russian ships In the Baltic. Russians oocupied Konigsberg ln East Prussia. Next day Admirai Beatty banged five German warshipe out of business at Heligoland Bight. right under the gune and among the mines of Heligoland. That was the first whimper froro the silence of the North Sea. End of that week the Russians ad- vanced on Lemberg lu Galicia. By Sunday, after the heavy fighting be- tme en Mons and Charleroi, the Allies were shoved out of Belgium Int France. The British lost 6,000 men. Lille was abandoned to thc Germans. The long ass5ault on the allies' left fiank began tô speli a possible ad- vance upon Paris. Monday the French fell back -on La Fere and Laon. Tuesday -the French lefI wIng feIl back again bat the Britishi held thc centre. British sharpshooting became bte terror of the {Germans. Weduesday France shlfted thc Capital from Paris to, Bordeaux. A German acroplane dropped bomnbs and a message front Mars into Paris. Thursday Amniens and-La Fere feil inb the bands of bte Germans. T.Ïe second siege of Paris began to look Ilke a -cerbaiuty. The German ma- chine with a loss 0f betwecn 200,000 and 300,000 men was still pusbing re- lentiessly 10 the gates. Saturday the Gerntans suddeniy changed tactics and pushed past Paris toi the soutbcast, with the possible lin- tention of concentrating on the wealc. er aide of the outer ring of forts or effecting a nction wlth tite army loi Lorraine. The Allies were puzzled. France, Russia and England signied the protocol pledging each to make no peace with Germany without thï- cthers. Suuday the Austrian army was vir- tually put out of business by the Russians. Monday and Tuesday thc Allies took the offensive. The Ger- maius asked for an armistice of twenty-four bours to bury the dead. The Allies gave tbem twenty-four bourse to get out of France. SC'HOOLýS AND COLLEGES AVERGAL COLLEGE Jarvls St, Toronto Special Englisb, French, Germnan and Musical Courses for Girls who had intended wintering abroad for illiutrated Calendars and prospectus apply to the Bursar, R. MILLIiHAMP. Ho., Sec.Tas Thjîwalkoow '~ Hsad Master - J. TYSON WILLIAMS, B. c'Thise CoUeg.,.ý bbiae OP.., nd oetn ~Mairte Ry. giving oey acce.a to Ne', York and Easer ate a eIi as ai, POInts in Canada. Tho buildlng, for the iiper 4aiId prepaaLory chbool are beau' ififly j(,ua 0d, np. to-date, oitar aind walUvenptiWed, and omiup e gyiinnasium, olay..rooo as -11l u ext eiîsiv% , tay. ground,. 5*8Boye are propared for R.0.., Kingston, ttl Ilii ýersiec, arnd Iiisi oes LUTc byan iellicent staff o f Xfaqterà i )t1y oradiis, s of Engish Universitics. 8chool re, vu 'ei mdcday, Sept. lStb, Bordicrd returnthg, Tread*y FSb lor L]alendârs, Information, etu. appsL th, 11-1 N1iMater CUUrseS: Matricuation, Art, THE WELFARE 0F THE BOY D A isMusi This college affords an ideal en- twenty4y. Intutr are lncge vironment fo lads fit a critical Ofthse v fimnortsnt subJects Pt period in thi ives, Youngwoimen.. WP do Its duty b? your boy lu, st bu Write for Prospectus ta by thousands of others. BARET»TATNELI.A T.e Ma\u003eIcNlLL.B. A. si B.A.,~~~~~~~~~~ D.Pe.,Picpl-86 W-uokCUg Wetdato*. ()nt. AVERGAL LAD1ESC0LLEGE:ý PRINCIF\u003eAL MISS KNOX Il sa",
         "CANADIAN COUTRIERI. WHITE L A BEL AL E with your Lunch or Dinner coaxes an indifferent appetite into pleasurable k ~ anticipation of the meal. Try it. At Dealers and Hotels. B»W.. a\"d Botthd by DOMINION BREWERY COMPANY, LIMITED, Toronto A Flower of the Prairies (Continued frein page 11.) meante tban It baeong 'esu babie ma young 1ehore oen sen tbiey are ail red aud squirmy-looking et first.\" \"Oh!\" Tanîs lay back lu ber cbair. '«So mayn'V I ses baby?\" persisted Merlan. \"No, uo.\" Tennis looked round liRe a huuted thing. \"ItVs-it's-un- lucky,\" sbe gesped, at lengtb. \",unlucky? Why I neyer heerd that it was uuluckY to Ses a young baby before. Ia 1V an Indien superstition? Do you know,\" Merlan lesant !orward nnd droppsd ber voice Vo a whlsper; 'Il hear thet there is going te be trou- ble with tbe Indiens?\" \"Trouble witb Vhs Indiens?\" \"*Yss, Jack doesn't tblnk there will be; but Mr. Courtney-I met hlm wben I was riding here-warned me Vo go beck; that IV wes ndV sae to be alone and unarmed. But I don'V believe Vbsi'e Is any danger, do you? Besîdes, tbey neyer dans Vo attaek Engisb meu.\"1 \"-Wouldn'V tbey?\" Tauuis's liPs curled sllghtly. «'T.o, they'd be punished if thsY did. Do you Vhlnk 'Englaud wlll stand by and ellow us Vo, be massecned?\" \"Englaud la a long way off,\" ne- pllsd Tennis, \"and Il am afraid If the Indiens were Vo rie uotblng would stop tbsm; did Rate sey Seon?\" \"$No, he just spoRe Iu a genenel way; but be looked awfully baggard and upset.\" \"IOh,\" answered Teunis. \"4But do you thn-e-b!\" Merlan spraug Vo ber test with e sbniek. \"éLooR! Look' Look!\" She poiuted out of Vhe wlndow wltb e baud that trembîed vlolsutly. TNiISýS eyes tollowsd Merlan. HeN' face blanched. 'She sprang Vo ber test. \"The Indiens! pull lu Vhs iehuttene 'wbils I1 bar the cloors.\" $6I danen't,\" sbrleked Merlan. \" deren't open Vhe wlndow wltb thos dreadful People Ouslde.'Ba \"Tyour lite depnds on IVLBa the doors, then, l'il attend Vo Vhe wlndow.\" TennIs Vbrew open the wlndow ad drew luVhoeeyeht Vers, closed and locked the windw Then she flew Vo the Rîtces and did Vhe sae, iMerlan !ollowing ber. The twO woen stood clluging together lu the dark Rîteben listeuing te th,, yells of ths Indiens outside. The old Indlan, Merle, crspt dowu ths stairs, the baby lu ber arme, and squetted ou the floor et Taunls's test. The cries et tbe Indiens lncneased lu volume. \"ýOh! oh! oh!\" sbnileked Merlan, VrlIngilg bher henda, \"how evýn you stand quiet lîke thet? Isn't there auything we eau do; send 'Merle eut te stop theni?\" t-Merle couldn't stop the=. -She could go if she 1used, they weuldn'l burt her, shO e euoe et themn, bu thet wouldn't help us.\" \"'TheIl 1 amn gelng upeteins Vo aheo somns et thein.\" She made a grab a a rifle that hung ou tbe 'wall, bu Tennis ceught ber arn. \"Stay 'wher you are. if you shet any e! tben they would tsar the place dowu ebou Our ears lu a. moment. Our oui hope la Vo stay quiet. Maybe Mi Wilson will hear and corne. Liatex tbsy are beginiiing theîr wal' dane they won'V attack tIi- tbey have lshed.Y IlListen! \" Tannl5 clutcbed Mar ansam tihlbA aoIiriek et an animal lu torture rei clean above the clamaour, dîed, an rose egain and agalu; 9.1t's yoî horse.\" WlVýh a loud, plerclug abris Merlan tbrew berself on Vhe fBec and ley there a shuddering, sobbl beap. Se Vhs Vhree womneu waited Vhs darnuss; Vhs Indien Woxua sqîxettlng on the floor, gruuting ov Vh. baby lu ber armes; Tennis, stan ing a 'wbite, motioniess statue; whî Vhs terrible clin weut on outsîde. last there came a silene thet lasV lonýger. Tennis meved resVleaZîy a~ addrese5d Vhe IndIen iu ber nati tongue, Who grunted once or twicS by way of reply; again Tannis spoke; again the Indian gruted. TaflUîs gave a littie sobbiug cry, and Marial raised ber bead sligtly. 'Do YOU think they have gone?\" she asked, hopefully.ar \"No,\" answered Tannis, \"theYar going to burn the house.\" \"lBurn the bouse! Burn tbe bouse! And you stand there doing 11otblug!\" Marian spreng to ber teet and rushed to the door, battering on I With ber bauds. \"Let me Out, I Say!\" 'rar'nis turned the key and OPelUe the door. \"Go, then,\" shbSe8id quietiy. Mran took a stepl orward,,thlel tell au inert mass on the steP,as\"'~ Indian with a wiid warbooP rushed Voward ber. Tennis dragged Mara in, and locked the door, then Sb' walked over Vo the Well aud tOÔý down the rifle. 'Marian's eyes tollowsd ber, edded borror growng ln then 0 Sh watched. \"What aire you g041ng tc do?\" \"Kili yeu, and tfreu Marie eau me, sbe will be ail rigbt.\" She rai5ec Vhe rifle as sbe spoke. \"Dou't, dou't!\" sbrielted M\u0026riaIi covering er face with er bauIds \"Wbat about your baby?\" \"Babyt\" 'The rifle dropped f1'On Tanuls's bands, and clattered Vo tbl floor. Il bad forgottenl ail about lu: son.\" She walked over Vo the IIudl'] woman nd took the baby fromn he arms. Then sbe walked Vo, Vhe dUO at Vhe front of the bouse and OPene it Mrlan gave a îtte gasp of borrO and feinted dead away. Tanuis stood on Vhe VbresbOld, he bby lu er arma. Ail aroiind th bouse braucbes of trees Were ple~ nearly to the lower Windows, and tii Indiaus were aVRi brluglflg Jni', \"Imy fathers, and my brotbers s spoke lu their fttve tO11nguSIyo sister brIngs you ber sou IlttiS GI Face, that yov. may mak: ! hln mighty werner and due!\" Fealessly she beld tbe chu4 d ward thei. The Indins sted In tionless, looking at ber. didn't kuow what Vo, make of IL. white womeu bed faced tbhiXi this betore. Wbat dld it meaIl!W il a ruse to geV theza iu to thle ~ri man's power? ~ fters, my brotbei5.\" Il Ir 6M n riabeid. the baby out at ari ieugtb. t inlualy a young Indien braveba ped torward aud loolced at the f~ Then be drew bac\u003c and spokEO t ' others. Their grunts besPOke tb fe~eling as plaiply as words -v' ave dloue. 'Tanis scanned VWq tfaces, auxîously, but -they were le IlTbey tblnk I arn cheatlug the' she tougt hopeleslY. A Youngi tdian, lghtsd torch lu bis han us t orward. Wlth a cry Tannîs tP qack aud locked the door behlfl4 She leent baeR agaluet Vhe door t trined her ers. An OIIIIni\u003c crackllng sounded threugh the l6 tSbe stepped baeR luto the kitel eaud looked et the ludien wn ~'\"You'd better go, Marie,\" s said The Indian only grunted. Sh 1 d cown VilI s Iay witb ber ear the floor; then abe itsd ber slightly. ,.Llsteu,\" she cbefLted In Vbeu spoke the words, 'I hear boots o! tbe white mau's horses lug on the plains-, tbey cDO of tbem, they drew uearer ad e g 1 cen heer Vhs wlnd wbiprn lu 'e fer-off Happy Huntiug Groufld. 1 cd hear Vhe feet o! many bravs8O ir jouruey. I eau heer the VOle fiathýers greetlflg tbeir Sons' k, ber the waillngs of the rohr r, the wlves. Oh, -y tathers! Oh' ~g brothers!\" lu \"ýOh, ush, ushl\" cried Ta\u0026I1Ie u, cen't be\u0026r anything but the cra0li er o f the fire. Yee, h, Y e, 1 'Gan d4- them gailoplng up. Llaten, they le shouting. Take xny son, 1wilî At te the Euglish wornan. ed Tnnis rushed across the reeW nd raised the prostrate terin of M ve She slewly o)pened ber eYes.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. ýâ~t of the flarnes, instead of fright- 111g ber, as Tannis had feared, ý1med to steady ber. She rose to rteet. \"Is there any way out?\" Sasked. 'The front way,\" gasped Tannis. Over Your face and head with your i't, bend 10w and corne.\" The two ulene alnlost crawling on the floor, 9gered at last into safety. )ultsde they etood looking at the 'ne ln front of them; a company 8Oldiera were vainly trying to stop lie by means of buckets of ter, but the Indians had fired Place too well. It soon was a ýp Of srnouldering ashes. They SOff babtling with the flarnes and 't to work to rernove the dead and Ilg Indians, and sorne of their own 1 Who had fallen. Jack Wilson thern and carne toward the two 'ien. \"Mrs. Courtney,\" he said, iwill coule back with us.\" \"\"nlis hesitated, but Mrs. Wilson le l eagerîy, -0f course you will. cau'tta hYere, you and the dear e baby. Poor little baby.\" She led Over to where the Indian wo- 1 StDod w!th the baby lu her arms. Il have had a- She drew back Lrror. \"-Mrs. Courtney,\" she called, le at once, the Indians have et' Your baýby.\"1 1NNIS rau over and took the baby Dut of 'Marie's arrns. -No, they baven't, this la my son.\", 'r. son Why, that la an Indian ý1 ,5\"-Tannis reared ber head dlIy-\"Iand my son. I, too, arn an B.\" She turned and walked tlY away. ck ,Wilson drew a long 'breath. iW!\" b e said. \"'Poor ýCourtney.\" )o YOU think te knew?\" asked an. (ardly llkely, she looks white. I S11o 0111Y found out when the carne. I have bead of many who maIrried Indians, and she la 1rettY. Her father *May have white. Hush! bere cornes ber axid.\"t 7her\u003ee la Tannis?\" asked Rafe tiiey, as he carne up to, tbem. I ýàt she was bere wlth you Y\" es, she bas gone wlth the Ind- 'Jabys nurse, I mean,\" explamned \"tbrough the foreat. 1 say, old N', I-I-\" àank YOU,\" answered 'Rafe, LtllY. \"You wilî excuse me if 1 MY ryWlfe? Sbe la doubtiess to ber fatber's bouse.\"1 el' Out of aight of their eyes, 'qulckened bis stops to a run; IL bad gone sorne distance Into 3\u003erest before be saw Tannis waik- ilth steady, unfaltering foot; the Il Woman tralling behmnd ber. mls!\" be shouted. \"Tannis!\" leitber paused nor turned. munis!\" be sbouted agaln, but Tannîs walmed on unbeedlagly, few minutes ho caugbt up wltb rau swiftly to tbe girl and took a Il arma. Iuls,\" be a-skod, \"'wby are you 119 away frorn me like thîs?\" musaeyes dropped to, the In bier armas. \"Because of my 1 son, too,\" Rafe answered. 1, Do!\"* crled Tannis, trylng to away frorn hlm, but Rafe only ler the tighter. \"II cboated you. ildri't drearn you were marrying ihan til this mornlng, wbea you 'y son. I eould.n't bide hlm any You saw hlm anti You left Tannls,' Tannis, my littIe e Plowert I knew It aIl tbe DO you thlnk,\" be went on, Y\"tbat Captain Ki.ngston wouhj decelvOd me? 1-1 marrlod an woman and waa proud of the I marrled au Indlin woman and oud of the fact. 1 saw our son St bonI' be was born. 1 left you 10 go for belD. Thunder Bird dl me, but I dldn't tblnk tbey colns e so\"on or 1 would nover eft you. But, thank God, I was e- Why dldn't you show thera aby, tbey wouldu't have fired 'use thon ?\" Id, but tbey tbought it was one Owed to fool tbem wltli. And Le- aIl the tîme? And You mar- 0 knowlng?\" ,and I mean to keep you.\" PRINTING. VISITING CARDS--Ladies' or men's, prlnted to order-lates flfty cents per hundred, post paid H. Barnard, Printer, 35 Dunda Toronto. BAKERS' OVENS. ]HIUBBARD PATENT PORTABI -lans supplied; latest m~ lowest prices; catalogue free. Manufacturing Co., 782 King W i onto. HELP WANTED. GE E'CANADIAN GOVERNMEN Big pay. Examinations thr Canada during November. We candidates by mail. Sample les schedule of examination placE Write Immediately. Franklin 1 Dept. L. 176, Rochester, N.. SHOPPERS' GUIDE PATENTS. BOOKS. Genie ~TRTE orDu 12-agefle oo o ASSIILATIVE MEMORY, OR HOW Gtsle: VJRT o u 1Vag leBo n ATTEND AND NEVER FOR. Fratyle patents. Tells how to lavent and GET. Prof. A. Loisette tells how you .Fak dispose of Patents. Trademnarks regia.. may strengtben the power of your mem- sStreet, tered ail countries. Robb \u0026 Robb, 287- Dry. A perfect menlory means increased 290 Southern Bldg., Washington, D.C. capabilities, and a larger Income. 12mno., cloth, $3.00, post-pad. Norman Richardr AWORKING MODEL should be bulIt son, Desk A, 12 E. Wellington St., To- *E Oens before your patents are appiied for. ronto. Lchin Our modern machine shop and tools are 0 Warn ait your service. We are the only manu- A EK O OF ERRORS IN ENG- Warreno facturIng attorneys in theeWorld. Get LISH, by F. H. Vizetelly, is an In- es o- ur advice regarding your Invention. Ail valuable text book for those who are Par- advlce free. The Patent Selllng an ticular about the language they use, MsnufacturIng Agency, 206 Slmcoe St. Cloth, $1.00, P05t-paid. Norman Richard- Toronto. son, Desk A, 12 E. Wellington St., To- ronto. T JOBS. SAMPS AND COINS. EUAINL oughout DCTýNL coach PACKAGE free to collectors for 2 cent s LARN ENGINEERING - Stationary, oua and postage-, also offer hundred different L traction. gasoline. automobile. corn- es free. foreign stamps; catalogue; hinges, Olve plete practical courses by mail. Cana- nstltute. cents. We buy stamps. Marks Stamp dian Correspondence College. Liliîd, Co.. Toronto. Dept . K, Toronto, Canada.",
         "À Mora fom the Lie foi School- jack puts his LeRibbonDelita Cream i his Grip jack is told to ýgo in training and joins the squad as picer jacks night and morning. routine The repulat pitcher net lcts heh aned hiasd- gestion Thýebg - the regular pitcher is ini poor condition and weakens Jack in fne form is put in and saves the game APPROV the Boai Commni as the ef dentifrice' a drugY You Your dealer has Col or we wiill send a generous on reoeipt of 4e ini stamp COLGATIE 8 Lstabiahed 1806 DEPT. C. DRUMMOND BLDG., Ca3hmnçtc Bouquet Scap-Luxurioui Movie t [jack decidir Nine wifls apploval fî( the coach"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Courier Press, Limited, [1914]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Biweekly Feb. 2, 1918-Oct. 15, 1920"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XVI. No. 16 (September 19th, 1914)"
      ],
      "type" : "document"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_408/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_402",
      "label" : "Vol. XVI. No. 10 (August 8th, 1914)",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06911_402",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06911",
      "note" : [
         "Biweekly Feb. 2, 1918-Oct. 15, 1920"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Courier Press, Limited, [1914]"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "I - NI. ir~ A - - n.. - I %J--- . b-Xugust ebtfl, I*1 (-7k.0?- ai-Lac ~N~TlONAL When Justice, Peekçs By BRITTON B. COOKE The Mouth of the Gift Horse ST'ORY By JOHN A., HOLDEN A New Panoramna of Travel By W. L. AR-CHER M ainly About Men Illustra ted Talks on Popular People The Battie of Burrard Inlet By MABEL DURHIAM k\u003chrr' gr 'ý m Price 1i 0 Cents,",
         "CANADIAN When Going Io Europe--- The delihts of ocean travel are beat realized on CANADA'S NEWEST AND LARGEST SHIPS \"ALSATIAN\" and \"CALGARIAN\" ACCOMMODATION comprises slngle-berth staterooms, \"en suite\" apartmezits, Including two bed-rooms, stttlng room, private bath and toilet, louages, dilng saloons, restaurant style, card rooms, smoking room, librarles, gymnaslum, glass-enclosed promenade decks, elevators, telephone system4 etc. ORCHESTRA OF SKILLED MUSICIANS. RATES 0F PASSAGE: SAL.OON, $95 and up. 2nd CABIN, $55 and up. Srd CLASS, $33.75. THREE SAILINGS WEEKLV: Montreal and Quebec to Liverpool, Glasgow, Havre, London. \"ONE CLASS (Il.) CABINII SERVICES TO GLASGOW, HAVRE, LONDON offer many attractions ta travellers wishIng to enjoy the. b.st the ship affords at moderato rates. Ilu.trated Handboolw. furtboe particulazs, tickets, etc., on request to LOCAL AGENTB oi The Allan Uine Steamnship Co., Ltd'o, or H.\u0026A. Allan, As5 Pe-s Montreal The. AU,. Lin., W. R. AlIas. The. All. Un. os gin st. W. T.obnt. Om. X4 Mli t. Wlmimu, M1. 320 Hm.. st, Vmu., \u0026C. The Best Way.I b Muskoka Boat aide Stations at Lake joseph and Bala Park give quick connections for a points. The besi way to the Maganetawan New Resorts at Bolger and South Maganetawan. The besi Way to the Rideau Lake Direct Access to Principal Points is via CA NA DIA N NOR THERN RAIL WA Y Through Tourist and Excursion Rates Now in Effect. A long drink of the delicious liquid he a whole lot when you are tired 1 thirsty. Try it. Pints and quarts in crown-stoppered bot DOMINION BREWERY- COMPANY, LIMITED,",
         "CANADIAN COUIER. The Canadian C osur ie r A National Webekly Published ai 12 Wellington S. East, by the Courier Preas, Limlicd VOL. XVI. TORONTO NO. 10 CONT ENTS A New Panorama of Travel .......By W. L. Archer. When Justice Peeks ..............By Britton B. Cooke. The Moutit of the Gift Horse....By John Holden. Illustrated by Fergus Kýyle, Mainly About Men ...............Popular Sideliglits. Battie of Burrard Inlet ............By Mabel W. Durham. The Throb of the, War Drum ........13y Augustus Bridle. Agriculturally Bigger than Wheat ... .By Kennethe M. Haig. Home Rule and Federalism .......By Sorutator. Cartoon, The War Situation .......By Newton McOonnell. Sign of te Maple.......... ..... By M. J. T. Demi-Tasse...... ........... .... By Staff Writers. News of a Week...... ........... In Picture and Paragraph. Money and Magnates ... .......... By the Finanojal Editor. The Fifth Wheel ................ Our Serial Story. Reflections..................... . .By the Editor. Editor's Tallk OUR affluai Home Produets Number will be issued on August 22nd. Tt will be radically different from. any of its predecessors. We believe that in the making of great industries the native genius of a people îs ultiniately of as great if not greater concerfl than the possession of raw materials and industrial power. This speciaI number will he the mnost complete illustrated representation ever sent to press of the men who have built up the industries of Canada. Just at present there is a eliglit luit un our manufacturing activities from causes by no means peculiar to titis country. Yet there has been no wholesale reduction in faeitory staffs, fac- tories have not elosed down, solne are as busy as ever, some work- ing on slightly reduced payrolls, and many without night shifts, which. for some years so tremeldotsIY inereased the output of our factories it o keep up with an enormously increasing homeý market. So far as we have been able to gauge the sentiment of manufacturers, and so far as titis special issue of the \" Canadian Courier\" ils coneerned, there is every prospect thst without fresit world-wide disturlbances affecting capital and industry there wilI be a graduai return to normal conditions. The more titan a billion dollars of investment in Canadian factories is fundamentally safeand Sound. The $1,200,000,000 of annual output fromn tIhose factories is flot seriously en- dangered. In 1914, after an unparalleled periodi of expansion, wvhieh might h ave 'become one of reckless investment, we are reaping the Salie resuits of a wise protective policy enacted in 1878 and'since respected by every governiment that came into power. Send for This Interesting and Instructive Book on TRAVEL It Io Entfrely FREE denind'forthi o' page, illustratedl booklet on travel, than has ever beeri known for any iother ever published foi free distribution. Motheraill'a T r a v e 1 Book tells yen what to taire on a journey and Just off the Press what flot to take-how tpackr and how ta beat .arc for your baggage and gIves exact infor- nation as ta checkin filtes, weights, etc., .n forci gn cauntries--gives tables of money ,alues.--distances fromn New York-tells when, who and how much, ta '«tip.\"1 In tact thîs ooklet will bie found invaluable ta ail wba travel or are contempin tadgatpn .hscunr or abroad. Published by the proprietars of the famous MothersillFa Seasicir Remedy as a practical hand book for travellers.l This editian is limlted,. so we suggest that you.send yaur Paire and address ait once, and receive a ceopy. (A postal wlll brlng It.) Please addresns ur Detroit office for this hookiet. MOTHERSILL REMeDY CO. 463 Henry SmÎth Bldg., Detroit, Mlcb. Also at xg St. Bride Street, London, England. Branches In Montreal, New York, Parle, Mlilan and Hamburg. Keep Absorbmne, Jr. In Your First Aid Cabinet Ili adependabke preparatian for the numerous house- hold accidents. Ap- plied tacutsbruises, '0 wounds and lares, il makes the part asePtic, kilts the germsand promotes rapid healicg. It is purely herhaii rontaîns no mineass and là harmlu to the ust sensitive tissus. IJdE AvsCoRBINE, JR.\u003e to redure inlammatory conditions - prains, wrenrhes, painful, swollen teins or glands. To redore bursal entergemntsnanid infiltrations etc. (Absorbine, Jr., is a e st and resolventi To atlay pain anywhere-its anodyne effect ts prompt and P\u003eermnanent. To spray the throat If sors or infected- a 10 per cent or 20 par cent. solution of Absorbine, Jr., is healtng and soothing and will destýoy bacteria. To el ruts, bruiseo, larerations, sures and ulcers. *1.00 4-os,, 52100 12-oz. tiottle at druggists or posrpaid. A Liberal Trial Bottie will be sent te your address upon recelpt of 10o in stamps. W.l'.Yousg, P.D.F., 2U2 Lu'# Bldg., Montréal, Cas. 150 Lake Shoire Lots For sale, at Victoria Point, an a sheltered plece of shore ON LAKE SIMCOE;I WITHIN THE TOWN LIMITS, 0F ORILLIA Whîch has the Best Train Service of ony Summter Resort Town In Ontario. The property. la PIcturesque, Beauti- tull Woaded, Convenient ta 3 Ra.iiways, and wIil have Town Deivery, Blactrie Llght, and Telephone. PRICE $15 PER FOOT Of Lake Frontage, but up ta Auguat lOth we are authanlzed ta seil at Twelve Dal- lai'. (12) paer foot ta those wha wii agree to b3ld befare July lat. 1915. Thtis ls an Exceptionai Opportunlty ta secure what we bteve to be the Beat summzer property avallable an Liae Slmceoe. CLARK'S LAND AGENCY ORILLIA 'eAA IN ;'FIN FNIIIW Y Gti-M UMM Ç EXTRA DRY Is The Most Exquis ite Dry Chempagne lmported ABS UPo*LIID 41 Ms MAJcrY KING eOCmg4C . M",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Elevate Profits and Lower Costs T FI volme o proits la\" business. alone marks that business as a Tin requires no argument The fact îs seif-evident. And profits depend upon two thingeo-the ability ta sell your goode at a sufficient advance over coat ta cover the expense of handhing and leave a surplus -and the '-t abîlity ta place that selling price at a figure which enables your customner to recognize-the value you offer. Now, it is impossible ta oeil goods continuoualy unless the pnice la rîght. It is, Iikewise, impossible ta get j the px'ice down ta the right figure unless the cost of handling goods kM 2 la reduced ta a minimum. An Otis-Fensom Freîght Elevator enables the manufacturer, or the merchant, ta, econornize time, labor and floor-space.' Ah the- floors of the building are made 1 goulmolliinstantly available. The top floor lu practically placed on a level wîth the basment, gving in- creased storage capacity, elimina- ting wear and tear on goods. and sinte in checking and Just stop a marnent and consider what this means 1 An Otis-Fensom Freight Elevator cen be bought for as lîttle as I. $70.00, while the prevailing Iaw rates for electricity now make an electri\" levator possible to those who prefer to use power. ____ ____ ____ELIEVATORS Our free bookiet 'Freight Eleva- tors and Their Uses.' wl1 tell yeu ail about an elevator intend- ed, specifically, to meet the re- quiremnents of YOUR business. Write for it to-day 1 Don't put it off until another trne -simpiy fillin this coupon and mail NOW. while the thougbt is fresh In your mind. OTIS-FENSOM ELEVATOR CO., LIMITED 50 BAY STRE ET, TORONTO. ,CONOMIGA.L---Heats the house weli v~ithout burning ail the coal you can buy. I n Lighter Vein Try Th is.-Sponger \u003cmeeting acquaint- ance)-\"Do you know, old man, I really believe Pro losing my nerve? I'm get- ting so I hate to ask any one for a loan. As soon as 1 saw you I began ta trem- ble. \"-Boston Times. The Reason Why.-\"Te1l me about your aunt, old Mrs. Blank. She must be rather feeble now,\" said the man who had returned after a long absence. \"We buried her last year,\" said the other. \"lBuried her? Dear me! Is the old lady dead?- \"Yes; tbat's why we buried her,\" was the response.-New York Post. Song of a Suffragette. For work In the home, it Is plain degra- dation; But work in the office Tis work for the nation. \"The creche for the babies, and canned food your ration, Wjll do,\" says the suffragette girl. -The Argonaut. Needed AdvIce.-\"He's a self-made man.\" \"I1 know. He surely made a mistake In not coiistlting an expert. \"-Detroit Free Press. The Original Handy Man.-A colonel wated a man-servatit, so he Inserted .âriadvertlsement in the local weekly. one of the applicants who answered was an Irlshman. \"What I want,\" explained the colonel, ,lis a useful man-one who can ok drive a inotor, look after a pair of horses, dlean boots and ýwindows. feed poultry, milk the cow, and do a litile painting and paperhanging.\" \"Excuse me, sor,' said Murphy, \"but what kind of soit have ye bere?\" \"5011?\" snapped the colonel. \"What's that got ta do with ltir --\"Well, I thougbt If it v'as dlay I might make bricks in me spare time... -Every- body's. The Season for Oats.-A long wisp of artificial grain that served as a stick-up on the sweet gîrl's bat was placed honi- zontally, s0 that It tIckled up and down lthe face of the man who sat next, to ber In the street car, utîtl it came ta a resing place with the end nestlingin bis rigbt ear. Âfter the car nad traveiled'a few blocks tbe man was seen ta, remnove from bis pockei a large jackknife, which be proceeded to strop on the palm, of a borny hand. Excitedly the girl inquired: \"6Wby are you dolng tbat?\" \"If tbemn oats gits In my ear again,\" the man ejaculated, \"there's gonfla be a barvest.\" -The Argonaut. And Next? When grandma toured In foreign parts, Hler letters were an education- Twelve pages of Impressions, sigbts, Heights, distances, and population. Mother, dolng Europe, in four pages told Wbom she met and wbere the best Gowns and bats were sold. Maud, abraad. Gets ail sbe's able ltpon two post-cards -ie And one cable. -ie Satisfied.-Hair Dresser-\"Your hair's very tim an the top, air.\"' Customer- \"Ah, I'm glad of tbat; I bate fat hair.\"- Tatler. The Natural Deduction.'-One day two farmn labourers were discussing the wlse- tiss of the present ýgeneration. Sald one. ýV,-,twierthan our faibers was, and 'Lfe\u003e wers. wiser than their faibers was.\" Thb second one, after ponderlng a-while ad gazing at bis companion, replied: \"Well, Garge, wbat a fuIe thy grand- faytber mnust 'a' beeni\"-The ArgonaUt. What's li a Name.-She was a young missionary in China, not y-et quite profi- dient in the language of the country, andi was givIng a Uitile dinner to some friends. During the course of thie \u003emeal she asked the servant~ to bring In somne fruit-at least as thougbt she did. He obJected; s Illaisteti; be refused; she grew angry. At last be lef t the room. Presently bc returned, carrying a large platter, wbleb be placed before ber witli an air of supremne coniempt. On fi, carefully arranged, were ber busband's every-day trouaers!-ThOe Wely Sots- Canadian National Exhibition PEACE YEAR America's Greatest Livestock Show Acres of Manufactures Exhibits b\u003e' the Provinces Exhibits b\u003e' Dominion Govern- ment Exhibits by West lndies 1 Grenadier Guards Band Dragoons' Musical Ride Auto-Polo Matches Circus and Hippodrome Dozen Shows in Single Hour Boy Scouts' Review Canada's Biggest Dog Show BABY LON Greatest Oriental Spectacle ever presented on Continent Paintings from England, Scot- land, United States and Can- ada Educational Exhibits Gooda in Process of Making Athietic Sports Aero-Hydropiane Flights Grand Water Carnival reatre's Fanious Band Score of other Banda \u003eDozen Band Concerts Dailly Chesapeake and Shannon Biggest Midway ever Peace Vear Fireworka International Peace Tattoo I10 Bands 400 Musicians 'Ug. 29 1914 Sept. 14 TORONTO Desk-book of Eirro in English Ry Franik H-. Vizeteliy, F.S.P Assaciate Editor of the Standard iionary, treats the hundred andi questions that arise In dalI\u003e' si and correspondence whicb are treated of in tbe dictionary. Tbe New Yark Tirnes: \"The and plan of the volume, whlcb handy aize and alpbabetical arr' ment, strike one as pleasantlY and sound.'\" 12 mo. cloth, 240 pages. Price post-pald. Norman Richardson 12 E. Wefllington St. - T",
         "VoL XVL. Auguat 8,, 1914 No. 10 A NEW PANORAMA 0F TRAVEL Describing the Route Prom La Tu que, Que., to Cochrane, Ont., Over the National Transcontinental O UR second era of great railway re construction i s comting to a close. President of the C. P. R. announces that huge extensions Io that system are f or the present not on the programme. The Canadian Northern has entered uPOn its last purely transcontinental stage. The Grand Trunk Pacific be- tWeen Winnipeg and Prince Rupert was.linked up a few months ago. Our Nvatonal Transcontinental between Wiînnipeg and Mon cton will be com- Pleted this year. The Quebec Bridge across the St. Lawrence will be finished SOOn a 'f er. Thr year 19,15 will see twentieth century Canada mbt her second era of development when the railways already built will become a Vast network of traffic, the freight train in Place of the gravel train and the tteam shovel, the Palace Pullman en Place of the tar-paper shack, the hand-car and the gangs of navvies. Most of Our far-flung army of pick- and-4hozeller, will be absorbed by fa2rm5s, factories and civic corporations. 7'he subboÎned article is the story of a npfront La Tu que, in northern Que- bcto Cochrane. the junctional Point of the national road wîth the provincial \"\"dthe Timîskaming and Northern nt'O. ANA12AWAGATU\"-the laIte o! the rIppling waters-is at this 1ýà Moment in may sight. Over to the lert le the black clearlng- 'lre brule-which will be the more ,aie Doucet, the third divisfonal it on the National Transcontinental lway from Quebec, 350 miles away. h. early part of the journey brought ýho0ugh the wonderfuî rock cute and t fills that have been devised to SPossible this bold aligumnent 85thýe Laurentian granite, the one- bed Derhaps, 'of a mighty sea. tbe ar wrth seeing, ýthese wIl- Ploughn of orternQuebec. Up the '11119 Ribbon River, acroa Gatineau andc head er~s, thi5 blg construction train even, 111 a simple ter Water power after water power-In îts B y W. L. A R C FLE R A River and a Ribbon of St..l tkrough Thousanda of Acres of P~ off Ballast, on the T'emporary Trestle over a 14-Foot last days of unharnessed freedom- thousands of acres of pulpwood, with a Percentage of commercial timber; these for the practical man; for the poet, lakes and rivers, ail enclosed In rolling Laurentians, their white birch gleamlng in the sunt, miles of these, From Parent, the newest town, one can go by canoe to Ottawa in four days by the Gatineau. But the magnetie North drame our minas In the other direction to La Loutre. Far, far up the St. Maurice, near the Obinan post of the H. B. Co., at La Loutre Rapids, the Quebec Government wlll presently con- struct an enormous storage dam-a quarter of a mile long and its estimated cost a million and a quarter dollar8-to, regulate the flow at La Tuque, Grand Mere and Shawinigan, where the great electrical and paper companies are weakened by the -dlscrepancy between high-water maximum and dry season minimum. ulpWood. AT Parent the statlonary railroad .I.equipment included twelve miles of track In the yards, a twelve- staîl roundhouse, a steel tank, and the ? fine divisional station (Standard Design D) will soon be finished. On the ll la the H. B. Co.'s new store, a splendid re- tafl outfit. A few years and the present population o! saw milI employees wll be augmented by a large staff o! rail- rmail workers. From Parent we strike boldly west- ward. For ordlnarY People a bi.weekly train service la provided, packed always, with contractors, engineers and their employees. Not this for us. To sum It ahl, I travelled hence by hand-speeder, tracc motor car, locomotive, and canoe, also--perhaps more Ignomlnlousyýby hand-car and on foot. Atter ah, that Io the way to see the country. No prairie bere to hasten over. This ls not, and neyer wll be, agricultural land. Doubtless, settlera wlll come and will scratch where they Culvert. can, but farmlng I muet 11nd nearer Abitibi. The weal.th of this land la Its acres of jackpine, spruce and blrch. We are bere some twelve hundred feet above sea level. The poilcy of the Transcontinental Railway, rigldly enforced, of a maximum four-tenths per cent. A Ouîng Bear readly to grow tUp wlth'the stock mark't",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. grade, eastward 'bound, compelled our location par- ties tu seek easy ways acrosa the watersbeds, and it is bard tu believe we are on the beight of land from whlch waters flow tu Hudson's Bay. At the Pitch- pine and Marten Rivera we see tbe fast of the soutb- ward bound streama, tbougb curiously enougb Lake Oscalaneo (Seagull, Lake) empties away to the north into, St. Maurice -____ waters. Long, narrow lakes abound, sprlng fed and conveniently parallellng the uine. The bMils are growlng les rugged; more muakeg, more placid streantg. Rallro'ading is easier bere- no the tangents. are surely twice the average lengtb of those along the St. Maurice, and only the contractors can regret the absence of the deep rock cuttings. ALL la life about bere juat now. Ballast pits witn those would-be buman steam abovels, filhlng the hollow places, and adjusting the track to grade, keep tbe work trains and tbe hundreds of forelgn labourera busy. Another few montha and the boat will bave passed on. Other inhabitants tlian these tranalenta there are few, and these few trace, In a more or les mixed strain, tbeir ancestry to tbose who once ruled the foreat. So far there Hufldr are no settiera. Presently tbey will appear and transforma these log cabins and tarpaper shacks into primitive farm-houaes. For their con- venlence, station buildings are under construction, and the present resident engineers will have their names diaplayed for generations on the slgnboards of these cases. But Imagine Kanrlskamak becoming MoCarthy! I suppose it will save much worry to thé clerical staff of the Grand Trunk Pacific, but one hates to see the passlng away ef un Indîgenous nomenclature. But on to -the ever-advancing \"End of steel\"! Long lines of beardlng cars on temporary aldings welcome us. Ahl during this construction these samte cars have been the ploneers and their day la nearly done. A cook from Naples, a Floren- tine cookee, serve our supper along\u003ewItb the \"steel gang,\" and we hasten on (via that wearylng band- car) towards the setting sun. Four miles more, and we find the last, raya sparkling on the newest rails, and the outleok la a long, aandy stretch, broken at last by the low bills. Beyond that we know another crew bave just atopped laying steel eastward. StUR Wheî four miles, on fooit now, to Doucet, wbere everyone la waiting for the Invaders. I leave it for the last time in its sylvan peace and take Up my pack for the march toward Cochrane. This stage begins witb a delightful disappoint- ment; a six-mile canoe trip is better tban walking eds of men worked on this tremendous f111 at Waboos' and the Atik River is perfectly adapted. In fact, we could have gene mucb farther witb an occaslonal portage, but at Canyon creek I left my good friend the engineer, and gave the grade more detailed in- spection. Firat, I found fine sand; thon came the muakeg. This la the beglnning. I tbougbt 1 bad seen muskeg before, but 1 had not. They say that if lt's on a clay aubsoil it is good tillage. That la not the essential point. If, as In some of this coun- try, there are not enough valleys along with artifIclal ditches, to give drainage-lt will remain muskeg, with the suction ot a devil liaht. My trousers bear the marks ef its reeking tentaclea. At laat to the Meglakan. -The Meglakan fiows soutb at the eastorn crosslng and thon turna nortb, and we bridge it again beforo it breaks away for the Bell River and James Bay. The eastern crossing marks the division betwoen Districts B and C; It la the objective towards whIch steel la bolng laid from cither end. A canee brought me ovor and there was juat a glimpse of fine rapid. The Megiakan is broad Justi-'eI and deep and is a valuable tributary to the Bell, whicb it joins. My ears priCk Up at the hoot of a locomotive in1 the distance. Furtber advance shows that the last cuttîng is being comfpleted, and it la only a mile to another. The rest of the story ias 8001 told, for Jim Cassidy was an old friend, and bis gasoline car was just sýtartlng. SeveLltY miles that afternoon. The second Me- giskan and Bell River flash by. Stili there is muskeg in abundance, but 1 gradually realize that it is a transitional strip and prospects improve. At lart we reach the place wbose name has ja-mtdd aroused my curiosity, Peter Brown,- Peter, it seems, was a primitive settier of wide renown. T RIS is one hundred and fifty miles from Cochrane. At present 1 cal, hardly recommend the construc- tion train service, for it takes from day- lIght to dark. There is more hope for farmers both east and west of the Pro- vincial Boundary. Robinson Lake, or O'Brien, where progress is being made on divisional yards, ls a centre for a ________real agricultural district, to be. TIIe land is covered witb light timber, anI eCreek. asset to the Incoming homesteader Both Quebec and Ontario GovernmentE wIll doubtless assist hlm wlth colonization roads and drainage ditches, and the excellent facilities for rail road transportation will make this location attractive 'The advantage over the prairie la that the colonÎi can busy bimself ahl the wlnter with turning biE wooded lands tu material advantage, whicb is nol the case on the prairie. The Harricanaw crossing brings us somte pros pectors from north and soutb. Bach bas bis OWr tale of joy or woe, but the former is retailed 01,13 into Individual ears. It Is most probable tbat ther4 are great mineral deposits to be uneartbed;, whC can foreteil? Another Cobalt? A second Yukonl Why flot? We pass just to the north of glorious Lake Abltllb and rapldly now tu Cochrane-the town of abund1ý faitb, courage. and hope. Cochrane deserves thi realîzation of its ambition. The end of this story involves the tale of a tender loin steak in the good King George at Cochrane. I was opportune. Peeks Off-Hand Observations of More Than Ordinary Interest to the A verage Man 711118 la net an accusation; It la a suggestion. the affaira of, for example, your local police court? Wltb ail the courts la whlch criminal cases are trled ?\" You may reply at once: \"'Nothlng wbatever! \" Very -well, thon. I could net prove you wrong un- less you happened te make the denlal on the part o! the few ýpartîcular citles, I happon te know best, lu tItis regard. Tbere, Pull counts fer mucb more than oe mlght suppose. I wlhl net aay that, ln ltaelf, this Pull la altogether wrong, but it la mis- chieveus and, -what Io more, I am loath te belleve tliat thie examples which bave conte te my attention are the only exaniples te be found, or that the olties lu which they happened are alono in their weakness. Yeu, lu repudiatlng the suggestion, may be allowlng yeur civic loyalty te cluench 'your natural thIrst for Trutb, wblcb la te soute extent gulte preper. For there may be times when loyalty la botter than destructive truth; and you may be anl excellent judge in sucb matters. But whetber you admit or dony the posslbllity -wblch I bave intlmated, It would be ne less discreet for good cîtizens generally te keep an eye on the Pull and wire-pullers, partlcularly ln the matter ef Justice. Does Justice, lu your clty, peek, as it wère, frein undar the bandage wblch yeu sup- pose covers ber ey'op? Cau sbe, by ber olfe.ctory or ether nerves, deteot the presence of a friend lu the dock or on the liat of those who sbould be lu chiarge e! the police? Or dos the Crown Atterney wbisper te her wlhen a frlend of bis, or a frlend o! a frlqnd o! his blunders into au uinwilllng pellcemnan's armas. Thils article doos net refer te hrlbery. It is un- thinkable andI 1 thlnk bas nover $0 mucb as been wblsperod agaînat a Cafladian court offîcer. Bribery bas nothing te de wlth the situations te wblch I refer. But Justice may bo cheatod bofore the offender la actualîy breught te trial. There are many boep-holes bet'ween the lseulng ef a warrant and tbe priseners' dock, and these avenues of escape open te certain influences: influence througb lodge, through club, through outside political associations, tbreugh persoxial relatlonshlp. And this Pull la only a feW stops f ror the pull wblcb le basod upon the excbaflge of money, and wbich, when we read of It in the Ujnited States, we eall Brlbery. In a fashionable bouse lu a rosîdential districtln By BRITTON B. COOKE an eastorn Canadian city, waa a, \"poker joint.\" Acroas the road was the bouse of a man who bad occaslonally playod a game In that house. It had seemed for a long time te be immune ,from the atten- tions of the police. On this c ertain day the local Crewn Attornoy, passlng the doctor's, bouse, dropped In for a 'vislt, and'as tbey lookod out a front wlnd-ow together, admlrlng the day, the Crown Attorney chuckled: \"Ses that bouse over thero?\" he laughed. \"Thore'l be seme fun tbere ln a while. It's a poker joint and we're golng tu raid It at elght o'clock.\" \"At oight!\" oxclalmed the other. Then, in another tone of voles, \"«I guesa you don't know who's la there, Charlie ?\" \"No,\"\u003e re~Plid the Crown Attorney, startled. \"No. Who?\" \"WbY Jlmmy -. He's been playlng poker there for twe days. You'll get hua for sure.\" \"Phew! \" exclaimed the CrowiI Attorney. \"Where'a the 'Phone?\" The doctor led the way. \"Main 999!\" ordered the lawYer. \"H1ello! Police swltchboard? That you Jçrry? Give me No. seven.\" (The Police division In which the poker bouse was situated.) \"Hello Seven. Sergeant, get me Inspecter Perkins. That yeu, inspector? This la Worrel. About that littie visit we were golng te make te- nigbt . . . Yes . . - .Weil, iaten: I don't really think we had botter make it a clean-up-at least, not titis time. Take your men in plain clothes and give tbemi a scare. -Tell them tu ahut up or we'll dlean themi eut. But sInce-we haven't given them any sort of warnlng before, don't gatiior any- bedy lu. Just put the fear of the Lord Into 'em; tbat's enough.' T HE Inispecter, wbo lked tbe Crown Atterne'y be- cause he had helped him get bis promotion, laughed. There was ne raid. Botb the lawyer and the doctor breathed a sigh o! relief te thInk how narrowly they had avertod trouble for Jimmy -, one of the \"lbest scouts,, In their acQua.lntanco. All thinga considered, thero was nothlng very wrong 'wlth wbat the Crown Attorney dlid. Most wbole-bearted and red-blooded people wll say that he did just about what ho ougbt to bave done-M any \"good head\" would bave done under the cire stances. The Interests of the community at l wore apparently served as well by warnlng gamblers as by dragglng tbom off In a dirty wag te a dlrty jail, and bavlng them fined In the morli Yet in principle waa it safe? F OR Instance, the Inspecter knew, just as wel was sheltering a frlend. Being a man wl senso of humour and a capacity for good fellowl htnsolf,,ho admlred the Crowvn Attorney ail the Il for It. But subconsciously ho lest a littie of respect for the tboory o! the Law, and the next that ho, la the course of bis duty, oncountere friend he theugbt lea of lettlag hlm go. Everi waa net dangerous. But Iu that same clty a whIte-balrod man calod upon to account, one day, for munies W~ ho had obtaInod from municlpaliljo In another of theý province for the promotion e!, let us sa mining project In their vîilty. The project collapsod and the whlte-halred man sald, wea that thoro was net enough te, complote the w The country people alloged that thore bad beefi appropriation. 'It was dîfficuit te, get the 1WI taken up by the Attorney General's dopartfl Thero -was net any evidonce,, the dopartineOft Jected. The man was undoubtedly crooked aIld made away with the peaple's monoy, but therO ne use takring -any action, for it was one o! f dlfficiilt case whero you could prove nothlnig- ]3 let it lie, tbeughit the departxnent. But the pressure o! public opinion grew strong and the Attorney General saw that ciel mental objections were useless. Ho arrailg$ an investigation by a committee of the LegilI' For some reasen or another the commIttee IIelý and delayed, and when fInally It was readY, supposodly crooked premoter was found te 1\u003ee When he recovored be bad te go te Hot Sprinlgs, te rocuperato, and 'whon ho came back, bis m1et was very poer, respectlng the affaira of bis 'ni1 onterprise. He bad lest some of bis papers. openly snoered at bis evasions; the public se6 satlied that the man was gullty. Flnally, es$e: papers wero milsslng and the whole case was 011",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. 'verge of collapse, when by accident they were found. *The committee brouglit a report condemning the man for fraud. Days passed and finally a warrant was iss8ued for his arrest. The man was now supposed to be resting iu a nearby health resort. A provincial .detective went after him only to find him gone. ýFeeble Mention of a reward was made. Circulars were ultimately sent to other police bodies in Amn- *erica, but that was all. The man escaped. Months lIater, by an unfortunate fluke, he was seen in an American city hy a citizen of his native place, and the Police were forced to make another search. This 'tÎe they found him, brought the man home, com- =I.tted hilm for trial, allowed hlm out on bail and allOwed the case to drag on and on, from postpone- ment to POStPonement, untîl the man died. The .authorîties seemed to breathe a sigh of relief when lihe dled. The curlous thing is that this man had scarcely a 'frlend among the powers that lie, and although the newspapers, too, seemed in the conspiracy to let 'hlm go, lie was nlot reîated in any way to that ira- WternitY. The mystery of his case was simply ex- carry that sense of obligation to strange extremes just to \"«oblige\" someone. The great ambition of this type of man is to be considered \"a good scout.\" A \"good scout\" apparently means a man who neyer tells, who abliors meanness, or anything that is nlot straîghtforward, but who, when another \"good scout\" departs from the paths of righteousness, prefers to turn his back and forget the man's existence, hoplng in the meantime lie Will have sense enougli to get out of town and not force the police to arrest hlm. This streak of generosity, and this attitude of, \"Oh welI, what's the use of hounding the poor devil after he's made a mistake?-consider bis poor wife,\" Is ln many respects admirable. There is something blg, and broad and generous about it, when you look at it ahl by ltself. But It, Ilke many other good things, collapses when viewed ln proper perspective. Not long ago a very clever man who-had 'worked hlmself Up lu the financlal world by sheer ability, was sent to penitentiary because the loan and building con- cern whlch lie had created collapsed and it was shown that he had kePt certain facts from the gov- erument inspectors. 0f course it was a crime and of course lie deserved the punIshment lie was given. But it was curîous te note that because this man was flot of the same \"«set\" as that ln whlch court officials and their frlends moved no effort was made to pro- tect hlm. Later, when a club man-and a member 7 0of agcertainhpolbiîcal Partny-did precsey thesae thin, wth he ook 0f noter oncrnevery pos- sible means was taken to screen hlm, and thougli he had to stand trial and was found gullty, he received a very mucli ligliter sentence than the other. The offenders who thus are Sheltered or who are allowed to escape are chiefly financial men, men who have gathered in the savings of less gifted people and have squandered them on themselv,-s or on foolish enterprises. The class of criminai whose sin against society is much less far-reachîng In its effect, gets short shlft. There is no pull worklng on his behalf. If lie offered money to a police officer, he would be tarred and feathered. Money to a Cana- dian policeman, attorney or judge? Neyer. But let the \"quid pro quo\" be, In place of a coin, frlend- ship with old Tom So-and-so, or let himt have some political Party in bis delit for campaIgn funds, or services rendered in the past, and there is hope for hlm. Pull is a great thing, sometlmes a good thing, but always a dangerous thing, and when It affects the operation of the leýgal machinery in our commun!- ties It is especialiy nuischievous, for it breaks down the respec't in which the law Is htild,' and when the present generation of \"good scouts\" îs dead, and a blgger clty and niewer population arrives, worse forins of corruption might just possibly creep ln. Home Rule and Feder:--ralism By SCRUTATOR 1,e, In YOur city, peck, as It wiere, tramn ilendage whieh 'You suppose cavera her the tact that bis crookeduess had been by elle Of the best-hiked men lu a certain \"t CiVy. His trial would have dragged lu \"I 0Vhers. By a curlous net-work o! busi- 1, POILÎcal, religious and other connec- cas was nelated Vo too many interests. lave hurt Voo mnany people, and, as Vhs xeiieral hiniseîf put it Vo a colleague- ý devil good would IV have doue? IV av recoverod Vhe stolen money.\" One 5tiiig phase o! the Tuatten was Vhs way In Doeln ad Postponiement had been ýt e an a been comnmitted to trial. 'ft lai the tact that Vhs partuer of Vhs )reoenitiflg the peophe who had been ,as linder social obligation Vo one of the \"Ill, had been 'nlxed lu Vhs deni, and thus Vo tako advantage of bis partuership Vo eo0OPeratiOn of bis partuen lu letting Vhs o mring to trial. Ye been canl other cities, where vital 1 case were unaccountably lost, or '9 ,ho Were \"wnuited\" were suddenly ~te Vhe advisability of getting ouit of oul,01 thein way to make nrrests, '~yterlOusly delayed. Doctors, making *e9uilnatiou reports, betore coroners' 8ee lit te bur\u003e' imuportant evidence lu KOb8e and explain iV wlth a sbrug of the T 1I s aild Vo'bave happenied recsixtly lu IPreuhluent mau iu a small Vown w'ho, he un over and kilhed a girl wlVh bis beog Vo clubs lu an\u003e' o! the cities whlch iilOr who kuow higli police officiais, II a genenal way, these alhegatlons that amnongst man\u003e' o! 4he most iu- 01 the~ cit\u003e, Mnu who are theinselves beIli their Private affairs, the customu lrd1it\u003e' Vo a frlend's !riend bel ere dut\u003e' Ont Princle~ o! JusVice. The\u003e' sometlmes SIR EDWARD GREY'S suggestion, orne monts ago, that the way to peace, as between Home Rulers and their opponents, might -be found in the establishment of a federal systeni for the United Klngdom-sucli establishment to be com- pleted during the six years for whlch, under Mr. Asquith's amerîdlng bll, sucli Irish counties as desire to do so are to be permitted to vote theniselves out of the operation of the Home Rule measure-may even yet be fertile lu result. Esýpecially is this pos- sible If ail parties could be brouglit to a-gree, as the basis of compromise, to the exclusion of a defined area, of Uleter, peuding the arrangement of such a federal system, during the next six years, and the immediate establishment of,- a statutory commission to report as to the best. means of arranginýg the sanie. Mucli, of course, must despend on what Sir Edward Grey, as the goverument spokesman on ths head, means by \"federalism.\" And, happlly, bis election address tells us that the kind of Home Rule he de- sired, three years ago, to see established In Ireland resolved itself Into \"local powers elmilar to those enjoyed by the Provinces eCanada.\" And suoh a forma of Home Rule would assuredly not be incom- patible wlth a \"federal system,\" as that expression is understood tlirougliout the British Empire. But it is equally certain that the present Home Rule Bill proposee to confer on an Irishi Parhiament far wider powers than that. Hence, the Liberal contention that the measure lu question 18 but a first step applied Vo Ireland, as \"prier ln point of tixue and urgency,\" Vowards the establishment o! a complete \"1federal systeni\" for ail the countries of the United Kingdom, is, to the non-blased observer, a lîttIe difficult o! compreheiisloii. It seems unllkehy that the Parliament at West- minster, under any sucli \"ioderal system,\" would be content wlth powers substantially less than those reserved Vo the federal governmeflt In any of the three greatest British self-governing Dominions over- seas. And yet the present Home Rule Bill proposes to confer on an Irilih ParliafelV powers whlch are' suibstantlally greater than those enjoyed by pro- vincial iegislatures lu an3' of the Vhree. For instance, the Irish Parîlament Is to be allowed Vo vary custonis duties. This is bounld Vo hamtper the free circulation of commodities as betwi-,t Great BrItain and Ireland. Whether In the Americali, the Canadian, Vhs Aus- tralian, or the South AfricSIi federations, it lias been recognized Vînt suci Irée circulation is an essential of union. Again, and silIlu Vn he realm o! commerce, wliereas, lu Canada, legisiation as Vo banking, blls of exchange, and ban1kruptcy, bas been excluslvely and specifically reserved Vo the federal parliament, legislation on sucli matters is to be lianded over to the Parliament at Dubli,~ insteàd 0f boing reserved to that at West-inster. The post Office, the census, f1shories-these are ail matters whicli it is desirable, as lias been recognized lu Canada, sbould be reserved Vo tlie foderal goverumient to secure unifoz'mity througbout the union, if for no other rasAoXi .And yet these are ail matters over wblch 14 Is proposed that the Dub- lin Parliament shail have juiirsdlctlori. A more serîous deviation yet fromI the true IoderaI idea is to be founid in the tact that Vhe Home Rule Bill con- tains no reservs.tlan o! ail\u003e lrind witli regard te Vhe crimInal law. That le to be a subjeet as regards which. the Dublin Parllament is to have unfettered power, whether as regards the execution, or Vhe sn- tiorcement, of the Iaws agaiIlst crime. Under the Canadian constitution, the subiect of crimInal law bas been speclaIlY reserved to the federal parlia- meut. Moreover, the judges, under thie Home Rule Bill, are to be appoiuted bY the Dublin Parliament, and they wlll be entirely independent of the central authority. There wlll be no federal court at ahl wlth original Jurisdiction as there le lu Canada. There is to be an appeal, in civil cases, to the Privy Council. And this hast provision, lu itself, goes Vo show that the Bill does flot serlously contemplate prsservlng the Uuited Klngdomn as a federal entity, for the House of Lords, and flot the PrIvy Council, is ths historie ultimate appeal court for the United Klngdom. Par ho IV froni me Vo conteud that ahI federal systents must be cast In the same iron mould. But the cumulative effect of the few devatlons-and It would ho possible to tabulate many more-I have Indlcated frora any known systeni o! federaîism lu -the Empire, Is enormous. Lt is sspecilîy significant when one remombers that the Home Rule Bill Is declared by the Unlonists Vo be tlie antithesîs of federahlais, and ls asserted by the Liberals to be the llrat step Vowards It. If anythlng like a federal systen for the United Klngdoma comes Into belng, it must elther be a gfV to aIl parts of the Klngdom slmultaneoushy, or many of Vhe powers coiifsrred by the Home Rule Bill on Vhs Dublin Parliament muet subsequentîy be withdrawn, unless the Parhiament at Westminster is to be turned Into Vhe weakest' central legisiative body of wbich the Empire holds record. On the question as to liow many separate component parts of the suggested federation there should ho, the dlffereuices of opinion are acute. Many Unlonists mîshike the ioderali dea altogether, nor la there any lWkng -for IV among the Nationaliste, who, foresee Vtt as I have polnted out, it must almosit necessarlly derogate froni the powers the present Home Rule BIIl confers on Irehand. Such i uoniste as favour federahism (andi many Liberaîs, too) Vhink that Ulster, by hersoîf, sbould Ionm one of the separate component units of the federation. But the Nationalists, and the majorlty of LIberals, view Vhis Idea with mucli aversion. The Go d of War ~0safeguard pence we must prepare for war\"ý- \"TOI know that maxini; IV was forged lu bell. This weah of shIps and guns inflames the vulgar And makes the very 'war IV guards agalnst. The God of War la uow a man of business, WlVb vested interests. So mucli suuk Capital, sucli countleas cahlngs, The Army, Nnvy, Medicine, the Churcli- To bhess aud bury-Musîc, Engineering, Red-tape, Departmeuts, Commissariats, Stores, Transports, Ammunîlion, CoalIng-stations, Fortifications, Cannon-foundries Shlpyards, Arsenals, Ranges, Drllhalls, P1oaVlng Docks, War-loan PromoVers, Milîtar\u003e' Tallors, Camp-followers, Canteens, War Correspondents Horso-breeders, Ammourers, Torpedo-buiîders PIpechay and Medal Vendors, Big Druin Makere, ,Gold Lace Emnbrolderers, Opticlans, Bughers, Tent-makers, B3anner-weavers, Powderqn1xers Crutches and Cork L4mb Manufacturers Balloonests, Mapplats, Hellographers, Inventons, Flylng Men, sud Dlving Demons, Beelzebub and ahi bis hosts, who, wbetber lu Water, Earth, or Air, among thein pocliet Whon Trade la brlsk ton million Poijnri a day. -erael Zaugwlll. [EdIton'e Note: Mr. Zangwll's lnst lino sait! \"Ven million pounds a week.\" A recent couservative esti- mate le ton million Pounds a day.]",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. The Mouth of the 61f t Horse Tom mu Peck, as Near as Nolthing, Pa id Oui Nin e Hu ndred Do llarstb a Couple ol Crooks I lke that.\" Tommy Peck laid lis uews- Ipaper down and gazed thouglitfully out the JPullman window. \"Imagine having a for- tune le!t you liecause you'd done somne ricli oid boy a favour so long ago yau'd forgatten It! \" For upwards o! an liaur lie sat, hardly consciaus of the prairie landscape scudding by througli the gather- lng gloam, pondering the vagary of Fate that re- wards a casuai act with a fortune and tasses the liusks a! existence ta a life of toil. \"IBerth's now ready, sali.\" The young man repaIred ta lis reservation an re- celving the porter's message, muttered a ralid con- demnation of a system that farced him ta bundie bis modieli apparel like washing ln a basket and, rather against bis 'wiii, continued ta muse on the etory of the benevolent deceased and tlie fortunate yautli. The clickety-clack o! tlie train-wlieeis presentiy became a soothing lullaby that wafted lis tired senses ta dreamland, wliere lie busled hdmseif witli innumeralile good deeds for kind aid gentlemen witli liestowabie fortunes. lie was somewhat rudely awakened by the Pullman porter. \"S'cuse me, sali,\" that wortliy apoiogized, \"but ah just thouglit ah'd -ask If you miglit be gaod enougli ta give Up yoh berth ta an ai' gen'iexan that wants one powerful lad. The lower ones a-. gone, sali.\" \"kAw, tell hlm-\"ý Momentariiy obliviaus o! auglit but tlie npleasant, fact o! lis awakening, Tommy was aimost maved ta a caustic rejoinder. \"'Er-wliat, kind o! an aid gentleman?\" lie queried, with timely discretion. \"Fine 100km' ai' man. mcli, ah guess,. Swell cio'es--damon's. Mlght lie wortli yoh whIle, sali.\" \"You've got somne uppers left, haven't you?\" \"Yessali.\" \"Ail rglit, thon; tell hlm lie can have mine.\" Tommy shited bis lielongings across and down the alsle. le ingered about bis vacated iertli for an unwonted length of tîme searchIng for a collar that lie knew perfectly weil had nlot been lest, and at lait lits diligence was rewarded. The i'ol gen'le- man\" was usliered ln. \"Two-fifty you paid for thîs, eh ?\" Mis authorita- tive vaice matelied his masterful bearlng. \"Here's your money,\" thrustIng the exact amount Inta Tammy's expectant palm. \"'Namne and address ?\" Tommy gave it. \"Muai 'bliged. 'Niglit.\" With thîs scant courtesy the beneflciary disappeared belidnd the curtains, leaving the astanislied lienefactor ta creep dazedly back ta his \"upper\" snd there medi- tate on plutocratia Insolence. The porter came aiong presently and Tommy Ioased a portion o! lis accu- muiated wratb. \"Yessali, dat's riglit; dese liere ricli folks pawerfui abrup' tliatssway. Taok yoh namne, thougli, didn't lie? Weil, yoh ain't likeiy ta b. sorry. Ah speaks from 'operience. Yessah.\" \"Jimiuy! I came near forgetting that.\"1 Tommy soothed his autraged expectations with the cheerlng thouglit that a reward of some sort would daubtiess lie fortlicomlng. Hie was not a seiftsli young man, but if klndlieartedness could lie muade ta pay dl- dends--well, he was engaged te lie married and lie needed the money. EHowever, a week paF,%ad rewardless, then another, cum here lu ta crati - O By JOHN HOLDEN ITwo-fifty you paid' for this, eh?\" and stîlI another. The sleeping-car incident had almost faded freim Tommy's memory wheu, one morn- log, lie found at bis employer's, office a card notify- Ing hM that an express, parcel from Winnipeg awalted hlm at the local agency. \"Say, wliat have you been up ta, anyliow?-gettiflg a package o! money this way?\" marvelled Old Ike Blundeil, the agent, as lie pushed the' recelpt-iook toward Tommy and indicated an lnk-encrusted peu. \"Package af--what?\" \"Maney,\"' I said. \"Bils-currency-coin ýo' the realm.\" The reciplent gurgied lncohere2ltly. \"Lem-me see lt,\" lie managed ta artIculate. 'He tare off a corner of the package. Sure enougli, It was a bundie of buils--dollar bills! The package was somne six lnchies deep, 1! ail tlie notes were o! the unit de-- nomlnation-some migli.t lie higlier-there must lie at ieast a thousand dollars lu the package! \"Jee-ru-sa-iem!\" lie cliuckied. III miglit have - known that aid boy on the train dIdn't take mny name and address for nothing. Queer gif t,- thougli, isn't Never heard of! a reward lke that.before.\" lie turned t. \"Âny message with this? Who sent it?\" isper Milîs sent it.\"1 The agent regarded Tommy wIthi aof suspicion. \"Say, there ain't anYthing funny abo deal, Is there? You're sure there Isat another Thoma wn? Seems strange you don't 1\u003c11W wbo sent 1tV\" li, It's for me, ail riglit. You see, It 'was this way- my proceeded ta relate the stary o! lis meeting witli tih c individuai on lioard the train. ,T leavlng the office Tommy lietook himself ta lis two bedroom with considerable haste-lun fact, twa or tlxz pq ,.owilli11P te testi'V later that bis movemeni ýBehlnd a iocked door lie broke the wa~x )rd, and umwrapped the heavy brown paper. aL patkage pf cu.rrency. There must lie at ing d1git on lis tangue, Tommy commenced far as ton whena dlesimiiarity in the bis senation ta lis lips-the eieventh blli was a iged him Juta an abyss o! Iblack disappoint- it upon Mim. The elevent itll 1 was an imita- :ecuted coumterfeit, ibut a mere advertising iblance of a fifty-dailar bill, tliat adjured al )ctar Grindel's Vigarino for nervous debility, oer aliments ta numeroils ta mention., Witb examIlned the t'wei!th bill, the thirteenth, al id found oaci and every one o! tliem a -dupll- r of lits dashed lapes over, Tommy scrutlnIzed ke te know 'who tls Jasper Mils is,\" le B the old skinflint I gave my lierth ta. Whoa )c GrIndel's Vigarino, eh? Guess ho thouglit Y I stood for Mis guif tliat niglit. Sure enaugli I did.\" Hie gazed on the masquerading dodgE then brightened a bit as hin eye rested on the genu' dollar bils. \"Oh, wel, 1 guess ten bones are not worse. What's the sense of looking a gif t horse the mouth? Every littie bit added to what yOU got-\"-ý Hie 'warbled a few bars of the sang,i presently had regained fris customary g( humour. Meanwhile Ike Blundeli had been stirring Ui little excitement. \"If that ain't a fishy yarn Il I'm a liar,\" he rumlnated, after Tommy had depar with the mysterlous package. 'il bet there's in to this than 1 thInk.\" He scrutinized Tommy's sig ture. l'Weil, they can't blame nathing on me, the sure.\" Within five minutes lie had mentioned the oc( rence to a friend. The friend repeated the stc Next inorning every man, woman and clild In Pl sia, Alberta, knew that the new clerk at the ium office had received a mysterlous package of lis notes, and when pressed for an explanation of t :Inexplicable stroke of fortune hýad related a big incredible yarn. \"W'y, the bloke might be a bank-robber a-get that thére swag frein 'lis pal,\" conjectured the C( ney bartender at the Golden West Hatel, aud Ôtb] were proue to agree. The amount o! cash ln the package kept creeJ up, too. Starting at a thousand dollars, It soon panded te double that amount. No one troubled verify the amount by the express book, where thniisand dollars was recorded. Rumeur s boosted it to five tliousand and, after a while, pool-room habitues were whispering that the do bills on top were merely a blind and proïbalilY real amount was nearer twenty tliousand dollars. liopefu coterie examined the \"wanted\" circuler-, the towvn policeman's domicile and were vlsiilY appointed when Tommay's description did not apP N 'EXT morning, on his way ta work, TommY* halted Iu front o! the post-office by F( Sanders, under whom he worked at the lue~ office. \"What's this 1 hear about you getting package o! money?\" Percy asked. Tommny surveyed hirm coldly. lie did net Percy. \"Sure, I got a package o! money,\" lie mitted, witli a touch o! condescension that bOcO0 a man of means. An acquaintance joined the pair. \"Hello, Fe hear you got a -package of liank-notes. 5Is right?\" 'ISure It's righL\" Before Percy, Tommy could bring bizaself ta admit that the package conta only a paltry ten dollars. Before lie realized Y he was dolng lie lbad cammitted himself ta a f position. Another congratulator arrived and lie, was giyen ta uderstand that the package conta a thousand dollars-Tommy modestly admitting twenty thousand was an exaggeratian. Tîme and again lie was calied upon ta repeat story of his meeting with Jaoper Mdlls. Saine leved hlm and some did not. No one, It se0l had ever beard of the donor. However, Interest in the mysteriaus package~ short-llved. Two days later natural gas was t ln the municipal well, and ln the attendant 8% (Concluded on page 22.) \"and -by-four 'ee citi- :s were,",
         "SEATED ln is study at his home, Brighton Villa, in Charlottetown, the second native of Prince Ed- ward Island to receive kuiglit- liood, lookis bacli upon a long hf e de- voted entlrely to the interests of lis native province. Sir William Wîlfred Sullivan ls a rare exaniple of a distin- guilihed Canadian wlio neyer needed to budge from bis own bailiwick to, be- Corne erninent. fie was boru on a fanm, as Most P. E. Islandere of any promin- ence have been. Tliat was at New Lon- don lu 1843. fis early education was entirely local, at the Central Acadeniy and St. Dunstan's College ln Charlotte- town. fis first ambition was to be- corne au editor. fie accomplished this when, as a young mian, he worked huiseif up from, local reporting to the Joint edJitorshlp of tlie Chiarlottetown fIerald. fie was writing editorials wlien the flrst Confederation Confer- ence was lield lu that town ln 1865. fie was also studying law-the begin- nlng9 Of bis second ambition. The year that Confederation became a fact the Youg editor, age 24, was called to the bar. fis greatest case lu those early Year8 'Was as counsel for the local gov- erunflt before the Land Commis- Sio0ners' Court under the Land Pur- Chase Act of 1875. Twice lie was made Q. C-bY lis owu governient 11 1 u*,ad'lu 1879 by tlie Marquis of Uorne* That year hie entered politics; wltliuut auy previous parliamentary ex- erience, becorniug both Attorney-Gen- Bt3ge ad Premier. In1889 lie quit this JStige bf is career to become Chief 0eo f the Province aud loc .\u0026d¶nraîty Iu June, 1914, MUade a Ruiglit Bachelon by King George. a\"y\u003e Other Canadtian, living or dead, wli ÜthedIn l hîgli finance or genenal polit: Inth Part Of Canada than the îsland lie g1jjas0becorne 80 quietîy and deserved gished It looks easy. But Sir William ibldi \"et waY, lias always worked trei AlePoi Pioneer Enthusiast Ilc orvjC f Prince Edward Islan T aigt observe the ffeth ni 'wha iiCine mneant se mucli for the Wecall Canada. That event was the fe5ence lield to discuas the question of ti la 01o2ftle~ varions provinces. The wl Wha \"e5 than seven years of age, stoc rfS Chiarlottetown and watclied theý CANADIAN COURIER. ment House; aquatic parade; firework\u003e nand torchlight procession. August 19- M ainl A bo t M eUnveiling tablet; addresses, society- 1,\",Linly A bou M en parade; athletic sports; banquet and baud concert. August 20-Motor car trip to fox ranches and Ouif Miotel; mli- tary review; garden party and grand. bail at Prince of Wales College. i Practical Governor A T the first good roade congresa. ever held iu Quebec Province, at Montreal a few weeks ago, Sir, Francois Laugelier, Lieutenaut-Gover- nor, was one of the most active workers. Sir Francois lias diligeutly identified hiseif witli three or four well-deftned public movenients since lie became Mayor of Quebec City in the days of the Marquis of Lorne. Wlien lie was afterwards member of tlie Legisiature and of tlie fouse of Cominons lie was, deeply intereste:d lu good roads and trees. There is a peculiarly passionate aptitude about a cultivated Freuchman. Sir Francois, long before lie became a kuiglit, had the sanie slirewd lnterest in these two simple *betterments as many men have in bookis or pictures or fine liorses. Most Frencli-Canadians love good roads, belcause niany of tliem. drive fast horses. The best macadam- ized roads In Canada used to, run out of Quebec City. That was some tume after Francois Langelier quit the mayoraltY and entered politics. In the matter of trees which have so mucli to do witli really good roads, this public-minded Frencli-Canadian was one of tlie earliest Sir William Wilfred Suilivan,,in hls Charlottetown study.apostles. fie took up the cause of Bayer, Photo. Arbour Day. He believed flot merely In al judge page, taken from a painting rnY Years ago. trees but in plauting and caring for trees; for lie lie wa8 Let me tell It now and lt will be the first lrne lives In a province of wonderful trees. Wliere in Is there of the teliing, that at one stage of the great move- Canada can you find greater maples and eums and o without ment, Wlielan liad a petition circuiated in that plnes than in Queibec? To round out lis interest in lcs or any province for signatures favourable to, the movement out-of-doors Sir Francois lias taken a very live grip was boru on the boy scout niovenient In Quebec. .ly distin- These are not merely genial episodes Iu a busy Sullivan, life; they are a very Important part of a career mendously .which lias liad mucli to do witli public affaira, witli politics and law and religion and manufactures. Sir Francois is an emineut lawyer. fie la also an able polîtician of the sta.tesmnia variety, and a very enthusiastic Liberal; a consistent follower lu turn Ld is pre- ot Mackenzie, Blake and Laurier; meinber for Mont- ~ersar3' of rnaguy and for Portneuf in the Legislature, and for rlottetown Megantie and Quebec Centre In the flouse of Cern- people of nions. fie waa also Conmiîssioner of Crown Lande first con- and Treasurer for tlie Province of Quebec and an ie confed- emlinent judge. In the absence of Sir Louis Jette iter, as a lie acted as administrator of the Province. fie was )d on the knlghted by King Edward lu 1907. delegates Sir Francols The Author of \" Le Debutant \" Hl ERE we have, at last, a Frenchi book Wnitten by 11a Frencli-Canadian a4uthor, that la flot written for little girls. This book ia \"Le Debutant,\" and the author Is Arsene Bessette, a Jeurnalist wlio lias long been lu the newepaper field of tlie Prov- ince of Quebec. fie lias narrated lu a creditable way the toila of a beginner lu Jourualieni, interwuveu with au effective love story, and lie lias' depicted a living picture of some aspects of the Polîtical situa- Langeller, a Man of Public Hobbies. (Cnlded on1 Dage 22.) and It was sigued by just nineteen people. But the movernt grew. Wlielan aud D'Arcy McGee were great friends. I nernember the grief of Wheiau on receipt of the news of MoGee's death. Whelau was my\u003e uncle, and 1 was lu bis house at the tiine. fie was the editor aud proprietel' of tlie \"Examiner,\" a paper o! great influence lu its ime. The Montreal \"Gazette\" wired Whelaxi to write au appreciative article on tlie deatli of McGee, That was liow Whelau received the newa. It le a singular thing that both McGee and Whelau, two young Irislimen, living at the extreme ends of Canada, sliould be wýhat ina\u003e' be terned violent Con- federates. Wlielau represented the district of St. Peter'e lu tlie leg-islature for over tweuty cousedu- tive yeans. fie was defeated on the Confederatien Issue sud siiortl\u003e' afterward dled of a broken heurt. Stili, I arn tol, lie la not eue o! the \"!fathers of Cen- federatieli.\" lu Prnce,é Edwardý' Islanid bis namne is ever green lu the. hearta ot the people. fie was an Irishinan aud a Roman Catholic. fie fought the bat- dles of responsible goerlfleft for the island prov- ince. fie ga\u003eve the people there the. free school system whicli they now enJO\u003e'. If lie was not a \"father of Confederatlofl\" he wasa t least a martyr for the cause, aud yet to-day the island province centains nuo monumrent te bis mernor\u003e. lu the aid Roman Catholc cernetery at Charlottetowu he sleeps his long sleep aud onîy a plain, rnarble slab marks the spot. When the people have assemlbed at Charlotte- towu to celeobrate the anivSery 0f that important conference the\u003e' should net forget the lonel\u003e' grave lu the cerneter\u003e' on St,* Peter's Uoad. The programmne for the clebration la: August 18--Church servies,: a*Idrese of wel- corne by Premier sud May'or; patriotie cbildren'B clionuses; Britishi naval revlew: dinueir at Govern- Arsene Be8sette, Author ef a Newapaper Novel.",
         "CANADIAN, COURIER. Hot. Weather Reflections By S. T. WOOD STRANGE it le that man does not cry out agalut the tyrauny of clothes. Mîlder arrogauce and leess onerous inflictions have provoked revolu- tlouary worid-movemients. H1e sees hie sister pase witb bared ueck, cool and comfortable, lnvitIug the sootblug aire that soften the sun's ewelterlng hast, while a starched abomination gripe hlm by the hbroat and bolde hlm releutlessly. The luveutor of etaréh. muet be claseed with thoce ýwbo have brouglit, afflictions ou humaulty. Womeu bowed to lte tyraunies aud tortures for a geucration, but they have euccessfuliy rebelied. It still imposes occa- elonal aunoyance aud iucouveuleuce, but its worst tortures are to thein things of the past, like tic rack and thumb-scrcw. Mau le stili Its slave. It manacies hie wrlsts tbrough the long, torrld days wbule ies cmauclpated eieter with arme clad lu cool, trauspareut gauze, looks pltylag-ly on bis dietrese. Even If lie vwere to carry a succeseful. revoit agaluet the tyraut starch lie would suifer the tortures o! a coat of heavy cloth wltb llued aleevee, padded, shouldere and fieudlebly lrrltatIng design. The temptation to puu ou the coat of maie is almoet lrreeletlble. It le true that mau under the tyraut clotbee bas some advautages wbeu compared with einanclpatedl woman. There le no tyrauny or oppres- Sion entirely lackiug lu compeusations. He eau cllmb a feuce or run to catch a etreet-car wlth greater facllty. But a very emaîl portiou of the individual Ilfe le speut lu cllmbiug feuces or chaelug Street cars. The squauderlug of lime ou a mau'e tollet le a waste to grieve over, especlally wheu coutemplatlug the paucIty o! resuits. It le true that is eleter epeude almost as mucli lme puttIug up ber hair as lie doe over bMs moruiug ehave. But the luartistle pressing, the uucleanly starchlug, tie futle lroulug, the creaslug, spouglug, booklug, bludlug, chalulug, claepiug and pîuuiug make a lamentable wastc that bas straugely escaped tbe conservatiou commiseion. The mau who, eau afford the services o! half a dozen experte doe not feel lie fruillees lose aud waete, but lu any boueold whcre the hîgli cosl of living le an ever-preseut reality every member o! the famlily must bie pressed luto lie service and every day must be made au industrial emergeucy to make the man presentable for the etreet. Aud euch a reeult! The veil of charity caunot cover up lie awful hldeouenees. Sixteenh ccutury priuts tell uc liaI mau's costume once bad lie menit o! being artistic. Now il wouid seem as if some fliud bad exhausted hIe iugeuulty lu deviug a combluatiou of afflictious 10 torture lie hUman eye and muner ceuse witb uglîness, 10 vex man's soul witb annoying lucouvenience, 10 blud hlm witb rlgid bauds, 10 iuteuslfy hie suffernuge lu the lutoicrable heat and waste hie lime lu a multi- tude o! futîlâies. Womau, wltb the courage that faces death from etarvation for au idea wouid neyer submit to lie sartoriai domination that keepe man lu paiued humlllty. Even bier preeut Impedimeute are not eudured wltbout protest, aud cie keepe up cou- tuuis threateniuge of revoit against tie moraliets, artîste, philosophers, coetumera, busbauds and other couventional people whio iusist tiaI ber biologîcal classification ae a blped bie iguored. From man there le not proteet or eveu plint. Ages of eubmlesiou bave taugbt hlm 10 blasa the manacces ou hie wriete and glory lu lie garrotiug clutch aI hie hbroat. Sir Edward, Peacemaker OME meu are boru limeligiters; some achieve the iimelight, aud some have il thruet upon them. It le but a fcw monthe since Sir Ed- ward Grey, another Edward the Peacemaker, eaw hie afim consummated, aud lie Balkau peoplee if not lu absolute harmouy, at auy rate uo longer beligerent. Ail tirough liaI war lie commaudiug figure wae uot Kiug Ferdinaud of Bulgarla, nor Nicholas o! Montenegro. Il wae Edward Grey. Once again lie world stands ou the brlnk of a disastrous war. Auctrla and Servia are aI ecd other'e throats. Germauy, Russia aud Great Britalu stand ready-at no malter what cost-10 keep their respective national worde, and support their re- ) A_' -i spective allies. In this crisis, as in the last, a: the Moroccan aiffair before that, ail eyes ar Britain's foreign minister. His namne leaps t\u003c lips of the man ou the street. Can Grey hold the dogs of war? He will if hie cau. Somehow, everyone ls willing to trust Grey. man of silences has captured the confidence continent. More than a politician, less, per than a statesman, lie is a consummnate diplomat stands for ail that le beet ln diplomatie tradtic It is curious that sucli a man should hold si place in the popular esteem. Less is knowfl Sir Edward Grey than about auy other British ister to-day. Ever since hie entered politics thhi true of him. For nine years hie has been Sec' of State for Foreign Aiffairs lu the Asquith Gi meut. The publie bas no0 method of fiudîng ou how arduous hie tacks have been. Grey won't Lloyd George may raise the roof ut Limel Asquith may lay dowu the law at Ladybank. stou may speak iu Celtie Park, but the voi Edward Grey, at auy rate lu the country, le 1 heard. He îs too busy doiug thinge to fiud for eaylug very much. He le the Sphinx lu British polities. Sittinig hie hand on his head ou the treasury bench Stepheus, nor taunt uor sueer can irli h-m. someone rises to ask hlmn a question, he gi tells as much as he wauts aud withholds the No one can surprise hlm luto a reply if he d waut to. But hie always bas the ear of the 1 Aud afterward, lu the lobbies, the questioniflg ou amouget the memibers, ending up wlth tl mark that Grey bas spoken, and Grey knows lie ls talking about. There le a solidity and , Idity about the mau that inspires respect and alike. H1e le the Gibraltar'that canuot be SI\" The House alwaye I, If It is kuowu that le up. There are few empty beuches for hlm. t to. Buît he would rather be lu bis office st the foreigu policy of Great Britalu, or strollUni the bille with Teddy Roosevelt, or perbape ti of au extra chapter hie mlght have put lu hie \"Fly-flshing.\" Hearing himself talk bas uo fP tion for Edward Grey. Aud I dou't thinli that iug other people talk bas very xnuch. \"Deed words,\" miglit very weli bie bis slogau. But it le somethiug to have gaîued the cou!f of a contineut, when you dou't eveu kuow e Frencb to conduct a convereatiou over the table lu that lauguage. H. 1 i1 1 j HAS THE BMERGE.NCY-., ARRIVEII)? AND IS LT TOO LATE FOR SIR ROB3ERT ANI) SIR W ILFRID TO GET TOGETHER AND SAVE CANADA'8 HUMILIATION?, c4w",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. After the battie between the Tug Sea Lin and the Komnagata Maru, troops awaited orders to go aboard the Rainbow. The Battie of Burrar d mIn et Scenes From the Hindu Drama on the Komagata Maru O 0 ail the, visitors who have corne to Vancoil- ver'8s hores none ever had so many people out to ses them off as gathered along the the erfront one day this summer to witness ti. erventY hoped-for departure of the Hindu to\u003euiste e1 the Romagata Maru. For two months the6 Orientaie marooned upon the shinlng waters Of Burrard Ixilet, created one of the most amazing situations wlth which the authorities of this coun- try ever had to grapple. It waýs on a Tuesday that the dramatlc exodus of the unwelcome so- Journers was aniticipated. The excitement was the sequel to the \"l3attle of Burrard Inlet,\" the name which bas been applled « to the encounter between the Hindus and the Van- couver police on the pre- ceding Saturday night. Armed with swords, dag- gers and crude weapofls (nurdt Sjg.ý0f their own manufac- 8fhWIlY Char- ture, as well as a few re- eeter of the Maru. volvers, hurlîng fusilades dera tll ai the fntcl and fightlng like nftur v\"h-11thefanticsm f thelr Oriental 1auethe a52 passengers on board the Komagata Prist, ee18On by five Sikh and Mohammedan g l1Ulsed 120 Policemen and 40 speclal lmmi- fro \" oficrs Wo atemtedto board the vessel ctii ternOo11 iCaptain Yamamoto, the Japanese ett'l\"ofthe 2hip) ln compiance wlth the orders UD W4aUnlln Government, had attempted to get Wh M ad leave the harbour wlth the Hindus, 8tO ed eaOrdered for deportation. Upon being al\u003ec e, S h., Unruly passengers, who threatened . hxe asiiore and applled for police assist- Asth at le Of Burrard -Inlet\" was the resuit. 8J etug apProached the Komagata Maru and the t\"ea 'BAePt the decks of the big ship, It was Dere t'O e Ofth tug that the expedition was * oe serious than It had at firet \u0026P- w rth b. Crowded along the rail were the f,,,Dleu,,,,,Wearing their multi-coloured turbans squeb rat ent, whule thelr lmpassioned fane. atîih cal yelllng Indlcated the impending eggb above the din could be heard the five hotn 1 boardi the immigrant ship, shrleklng, ex- \u0026Yng and slnging battie hymne. From ot the tug fifteen feet below, the blue- o! b ý lOoked Up in silence ait thxe tur- blea rl-hbi ýf rown mnen, By MABEL DURHAM mutineers recoil for a moment, but they returned to the ship's side and hung on there whlle they con- tinued thelr fusllade upon the helpless constables beneath thein. So many of the latter sought the shelter of thxe outer side of the tug that she came near capslzlng. One man who was stunned from a well-aimed blow on the head tell overboard and had a narrow escape from drownIng. it was soon obvious that wlthout bringlng Into requltion their firearms ît would be Impossible to gain possession of the deck o! the Maru. Rather than have, recouree to thls extreme measure the chie! o! police and Imilgration superintendent deemed it expedient to wlthdraw. So the tug backed away from the. vessel amidst wild shouts of triumph, curses and imprecations from the mutineers and to the music of wildIy beatlng tom-toms. Nearly every pane of glass Ia the tug had been broken, whlle ber deck waB llttered wlth wreckage and freely splashed with blood. Forty memlbers of the attacklng party were more or less seriously Injured, elght of them. having to be taken to the general hospital. The Hindus empioyed the hours of the Sabbath in erectlng fortifications on their ship, carrying up chunks o! coal for use as projectiles, and generally maklng ready for another attack. The agltated citi- zens of Vancouver soon became aware that orders had been issued for the transfer to their city of the Governinent cruiser \"Rainbow,» from Victoria, with regular troops from Esqulmaît and other men of the permanent forces. The \"Ralnbow\" arrlved In thie harbour on Tuesday morning. At the saine time the Japanese Consul re- celved instructions f rom his government to see that The Turbanfld Mutineers on board the Komnagata Maru; in front, at left, ie Gurdit Singh. ..The Shîp of Too Much Trouble.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. ithe crew of the Maru was nlot mixed up in any bat- tie. The entire Japanese crew was therefore taken .off the sbip and the exciteinent grew. Most of the people expected it to end ih furtber violence. The preparations for war in the barbour ;blackened the waterfront wltb great crowds of peo- ple, 'who expected te see a naval battie on a smali scale. The spectacle of a grîi, war-grey cruiser with deadly guns and British blue-jlackets, and the 'khaki-clad treops wîtb shining rifles, thriiled the tbousands ef people who waited aIl day'for stîrrlng .events to happen. Vancouver's waterfrent offers a magnificent grand stand. It has been used many times by the citizens for spectacles which toek place upon the biarbeur waters. A f ew weeks ago it was crowded witbî people watohing the Japanese cruisers Asama and Azuma given a cordial civic re- ception. American warshlps have more than once been given popular ovations on that esplanade. But neyer before had such a spectacle or such a crowd been seen in the city of Vancouver. The roofs of the sky-scrapers were black with people, and the windows below were crowded. Tbousands lined the wharves and piers; thousands fllled the street-ends which open onto the harbour, and tbreughout the day they stood upon their points of vantage and sent ,messengers to near-by cafes for food. Ail day long the wharves bore the appearalice o! R e -m e mb ecriîn p active military Occupation. The 72nd Seafortb' landers, the Sixth RegIment, Duke of Connaz Own Rifles, the Ambulance Field Corps, the couver police and special immigration officers ail under arms and ready for service. Ail day long wbile the people waited, negotis were oarried on between the authorities on and the leaders of thbe rebellieus Hindus et Maru. At last, about ei.ght o'clock, the word ,around that the mutineers had decided te aî the terms offered by the Government as the pri their peaceable de-parture, and the most specta, chapter ln the history of the immigration servi Vancouver was brougbt to a conclusion. Lane Canadian and AmerIcan Citizens at the unveillng of the monument, JuIy 25th. 1W HILE the wtree were busy wlth rumeurs whlch next znorning proved certainties, ln canne- tien with the Âustra-Servlan wa.r, ten thou- £sand Canadtans andi Americans were standing side by slde on the very spot wbere, o~ne hiindred years ago, their forefathers had been waging war Ini the flattie o! Lundy's Lane. The bost of ton theusand met te remexnber the war of 1814 by celebrating the peace whlch bas lasted for a hundred years aines. Entbuslasm was the erder o! the day. There were, ~processions anld speeches. Amarîcan and Brltlsh historlans te ttjis day are net agreed in their verdict as to wbo was the vicor at Lundy's Lane. Mr. Frank A. Leverance, sscretary ,of! the Buff aio Historleal Society, teased the bis- tartans about titis. He said: \"It was the longest batýtis on record, It bas been f ougbt contlnualiy fer a hundred years. The British forces won a decisive vlctory here, If yen read British and Canadian bis- tory. If you reati Amercan history the verdict 15 ïre-versed. I take it that titis afternoon. 1% an 'armistice ln the succession of bastilities. To-morrow, If you lnsist, the merry war inay go on.\" B UT, whoever won, the battis was memorable. The British and Canadian guns were captured by the AmerIcans, wha subsequently lest them again, and inany flt on bath sIdas. One of te prettlest incidents in the celebration hast week was the de- The 48th Highlanders cf Toronto and other troops at the celebratlo Niagara Fale, N.Y., Speke eioquently of the i of America. He sald tha-t the war of 1812 esta the position of the United States amiong -the of the earth. Saveral Important authorities on the histurn time foilowed. The celebration was worthy Il way ef the traditions of the herees who parti ln the battis. Inspiration for the prevention cerd and International amlty; pide ln the tw tries who have been frîends fer a century termination te keep the frlendahip were thef of this memorable gatberlflg. These celet froin timie to tinteare tbe outward and visa of the American-Canadian aimlty. A sonnet referring te the stirring battIs w by Miss Janet Carnehan. It le as follows: Lundy's Lane Monument ln the Background. oppaelng a=iles. Real brayeiy and herolc devetion were dlspiayed that night wblcb were comparable to the incidents ln the stormlng of Sebastopel. Dr. Alexander Fraser gave a carefully prepared bisterleai revlew of the causes and the Issues of the war. Ha urged tItree reasons ln support of bis argu-' ment that the British wonl. Col. P. A. Porter, of Upen this bill we came te ceieêbrate That fateful day a century ago, How saved our heritage wtth forceful blow We meet to tell the taie, but net ln bate. We meet their loyal naines te çonsecrate Who fougbt and fell, shall we forget? Oh, But ligi eniblaze their naines andi preudly How nobly staod our sires ln dangers gre To tell the Inspiring tale tbat so we, tee, May meet our bill of difficulties well, For we have preblenis bard te solve to-day And enemies of greed and gold net few. Hleaven grant us grace their forces te repe And at the caîl ef duty stralght obey. ,anadian Henley Last Week Don Rwlng C l u Rb e r t e anid Fred. Lepper cf the Dons, winners in sOf Lundy L Robert Don Rowing Clu",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. 8ome Of the Young Westernera who graduated tram the Manitoba Agricultural College in 1913 with a knowledge of real farmlng bigger than mere wheat. Agricu1tura11y Bigger Than Wheat Maniloba Youths Study the Art of Real.Farmning GRICULTURE lthe chief in-.B E NT E M A dustry of M2niitnhe ByhEN ETHE . AI Students Judging lve stock as part et the modern method. Young wen in ane of te cooking laboratories. land speculator; In some respects even more. The man who treats the land as a plantation whIch he inhabits a few months ln the year for the purpose of glutting an elevator wlth wheat and then goes away to spend his money is flot a farmer. The only man who can bie senslbly called a farmer is the man who builds a home and makes his farm the maintenance of it; the man who rears his family on the land and gives them. all as far as possible a healthy love of the land, so that after hlm they may continue to carry on his work even better than he did It. AND there is but one way to, produce In the West frpeople who have the hlgh regard for the land and the business of farming that inakes it a perennlal source of increaslng wealtli te the nation. That ls by educatlon. The farmer's son must be tauglit to realize that there is more future for him on the land than in helpjng to glut the city and the town. He must be taught that In order to become a real producer and therefore an independent citizen he must treat his farm as carefully as lie would his family. The agricultural college ls not tlie only way te develop snch people. But It is one 'way. Teaching agriculture In the scliools la the ultimate goal of ahl agricultural education. But unless there la a strong central Institution devoted to the expert etudy and practice of farmlng In ail Uts phases, the rural farm classes have littie incentIve and însplratlon. Thie Manitoba Agricultural College is Intended te serve that purpese. It ls not Intended to develop a corps of speclalîsts hankering for higlily-pald jobs In other colleges. It la Intended to give the young men and women of Manitoba a chance to glorify the farm by living on It and by usIng it as a means of Increaslng the wealtli of the country. Tlie new college, with Its ple of splendid buildings, was completed last autumn, and lias now concluded its flrst term. and graduated ïts first class. Sltuated some nîne miles from. Winnipeg, In a well-wooded bend of the Red River, lt combines one of the most beautiful prospects possible on the prairies. The farm contains 435 acres, 25 devoted te liorticultural, work, 50 to permanent test plots for experimental investigation, and the remainder to ordinary farm work, supplylng feed and so forth for the college barns. A street car line connects up wlth the city. Between three and four millions of dollars wIll be expended upon the buildings, but tlie wliole work lias been planned wltli an eye te the future. AIl the buildings are of tlie finest construction and design, and conslst of an administration building, students' residence, horticultural and blology building. cliemistry and pliyslcs building, engineering hall, dairy building, stock judgIng pavillon, power house, poultry bouses, liorse barn, cattle barn, plggeriea, sheep barn, and the Presldent's residence. Tbey are an unlform of coleur and design, bulît of atone, brick and reinforced concrets, and are fire-proof througb- out. Heat te ail the buildings ls supplied from the central power bouse by four large boilers, eacli wlth a capacity o! 600 liorsepower. Dr. James Robertson, Commrissioner of Teclinical Education, states that it is the best layout of buildings that lie lias ever seen. Commenting on the magnificent accommodation provlded, Presldent Black made a remark sîgnifIcant both as to the character of the faculty and the ad- ministration of the cellege: \"I would mucli rather,\" ho sald, \"1that we liad grown from amall beginninga, rather than started In sucli state. This Institution wlll be here flfty, a liundred years lience. Our eyes must be on present and future as well and build for botli.\" The college was establislied in 1902, and ia firsi year In the old buildings its staff conalsted of flye teacliers and the attendance was elghty-tbree. This year the staff consigs Ôf thIrty-seven lnstructors and some eiglit hundred atudenta pasýsed ilirougli. This number Included the four liundred In the regular college course and those In the special course for normal students; also those In the speclal courses o! engineering, poultry-raIsIng and bome-nuraing. The atudents hailed from Manitoba, Sask\u0026tchewan, Al- berta, Briti Columbia and two from tbe United States. B E i understeed thai thie college ls organlzed In tbree sections, ail equally Important, teachlng in agriculture, ln liome ecenomica and extension work, short courses ln the college and sending eut lecturers for extension work. A fourtb departmnent, ihat o! researcli, will be added directly. This wll conduct investigation Into problema affeting 11f e and 'werk boili on the farm and ln tlie home. And It 1a only fair te add, tliat If by their fruits ye shahI know them, then already tlie graduatea of M[anitoba Agrieultural Coleage have justlfled their agricultural mater. At the Dry Farmlng Congress, at Letlibridge, tliey took fIrat place In grain judglng, and the liye stock show at Chicago always reckena the Manitoba students higi.' As well, and most Im- portant of ail, they take a recognlzed place in their communities, provlng practîcal and effective mis- sionaries 4,oth in the home and the field for the college o! whlch they are graduates. It is a good thing iliat nearly all these students, corne froni the western provinces, whose problems lni agriculture should continue te monopolize most of the M. A. C. curriculum If the college la t» fulfihi its real mission.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. it ê A few days ago Ki ng George reviewed this pageant of Dreadnoughts at Spithead. Not one had ever been in reai action. Next timne he reviewu them-hc' wIl they look? The Throb of the War Drum Looking Backward Over the Wars of a Hundred Years With Their Effeci Upon Canada REMEMBERING that it was an Engi-is poet *ho sai-d, \"When the war drum throbs no longer and the battle flag i-s !uri-ed I-n the Pari-lament of Man, the Federation of tie World,\" You natura-iy rend the fIfteen-minute newspaper extras these days and respond by asking the peet, \"'But when, O Tennyson, I-s that millennia-, When?\" Just as this article In bei-ng wnitten, newsboys four thousand miles and more fram Belgrade are eroaki-ng tiheniselves hoarse i-n crying out the ap- parent down!al- Of sevoral great powers i-n Europe. Stock exchanges bave ci-oaed i-n ail the financia- centres of the wor-d. German\u003e' bas declared. war on Russia and Invaded France. She bas tried te lipset the neutrality o! Bei-gi-un, probably according wo the Napoleonle theory that the occupation of 13i- gi-uni and Holi-and le a \"pistol poi-nted at the heart of England.\"' Whilie one section o! the German army i-s bus\u003e' wi-th Rusai-a, that moves wi-th the speed, o! a gi-acier, the other section las probabl\u003e' begInnlng what Is i-nteuded to be an avalanche on the head of France. The Briti-sh ileet li-s in the North Sea. Part of the French i-s thore ai-so. We are told that BrItIsh ahi-ps aunk eavon German vessels heurs before EnLgiand, aifter forma-iy noti-!yi-ng France o! ber active aliiance, deci-ared war upon Germany. The report was net Conflrmed. The Briti-sh Ca~binet bas held specIal muid- ni-ght sessions. The war ei-oren.t, headed by Si-r Ed- Ward Grey and Wi-nston Citurchli, i-s sald to be I-n the ascendant. The Canadi-an Cabinet i-s ai-I for war. The Canadi-an muitia are to be mobilIized, not on a volumteer basls, as i-n 1899, but as an Intagral part o! the Briti-sh atm\u003e' i-n the sanie ki-nd of emergene\u003e' thait a volcano I-n arupti-on i-s. The Governor-General, touri-ng the West, bas hurriod back to Ottawa. Voluntears are knocing at the doors of the armoui-es aking for enlistment. The marine servi-ce han been put upon a walr basis. Vessai-s are held up. Trade routes are te be kept open. Iu the inidst of ai-i this-where i-s Gabriel Prncip, who sbot the Ârchduke Ferdi-nand? He i-s the match Iliat got burnad Up la the explosion. For a bundred yearB now we have bad next te abaolute peace i-n Canada. On!\u003e' a week ago a peacefu1 eongregati-on o! Canadi-ans, Ameni-cans and Iadi-ans gathared on the battlefield of Lundy's Lane to celebrate that bundred years o! peace between Great Bt-tain and thte Uni-ted S.tates, -so far at laast as Canada i-s concerned. l-n tbat hundred years we have itad in tbis country oui-y two or three spasmodic ilare,-uips; the Upper Canada Rebeillon of 1837, -the Feuleam Raid of 1866, andi the t'we hal!-breed rebellions, one i-n 1870, te other ln 1885. So we jjimpire îo-uay were starti the rnouth o! the St. La, neyer eycu seen Canada; years the troops o! Canad fore we began to have a that Hali-fax, Leulaburg, By AUGUSTUS BRIDLE ronto were ail at one t-me or another garrisoned by sucb troops, someti-mes attacklng, sometimes on te defensive. The battie o! the Plains o! Abraham i-n 1759 was part o! a wonld-wi-de «ar between the Bri-tish and the French. The Amenican Revolution, that sent the Uni-ted Empire Loyal-is i-ni ibis country, was a sort o! great clvil- war formlng a pre- i-ude to the French Revolution, whi-ch grew into the greatest cycle o! wars i-n modemn inmes, the batiles o! Napoleon against the forces o! ail Europe. Andi that was the i-ast greai Buropean war that could begin to measure up i-n magnitude to the war about which the newspaper headi-ines are now tai-k- i-ng. I-n the year o! Waterloo, after the French had helpèdti he Ameni-can colonies to break away from the Briti-sh rule, our first and i-ast war wltb the Uni-ted States was concluded. - l'or nearly tiirty years before that Europe bad been the theatre of wars ibat upset ail calculations, staggered ai-I mon- This big naval gun, wlth the ship's biulldog masct on it, la now in the North Sea wlth the Dreadnought \"New Zeala#id.\" archies, ravaged te greatest. conti-nenit ln civi-Uza- tion from Cadi-z to Iroseo1w, aid flrom the Danuibe to the Engli-sh Ci-annel, and matieone man for a Urne 1ML 10A'S fJMYa t~ troop, o!B-co0tWtr mnarc'hed hi-s legions acros Europe, anti but for Nelson Le \"nation o! shopkeepers,\" a statement ibat aaems )14. Ha said: [ can obi-ige ai-I Europe to roy Russia, and Spain wi-ll :ed by Engi-and. My desti-ny ed. I must have but one Ltes, and Paris must be lits code o! i-aws, the Napolaonic, ;htts and measures.\" titat ha wouild bave fopuid i-t h tbe Triple Alliance ait the Otbei bard to Triple Entente, along with Japan, getting read: a possible pan-European confi-ict. But Wat settled the fate of Napoleon and i-eft Englan( preme i-n Europe. France entered upon an el reconstruction under successive repubics an( vivais of Napoleons, and Europe bad a rest froD for just about fifty years. The woni-d was bankrupt, in an age wben a year's fightlng cost than a day Ins estiniated to cost now with mc s rmaments. Canada began to work out ber pi-a the woni-d througb an cira, of peace, after more 41 century o! batt-efields between Halifax and De T HEN the Crimean War demonstrated that EJu the kindergarten, I-f not the cradie of clv tion, had recovered ber perennia- appetit gun-powder and blood. That was I-n 1853. The c as usual, was greater than the pretext. Russia was the real provocator o! 'hostilities. desire of the Emperor Nicholas to dismember key, and a proposa- f rom hi-m to Great Bni-tair other powers to, become Joint parties to such 2 titi-on was the immediate cause of the war. F bewever, was concerned, and so were Âustnii Prussia, to each o! whom. Russla proposed to part of Turk-ey's dominions. Engi-and was 1 given control of Egypt If Ruesia were. perla to occupy the main part o! Turkey. British dipi-omacy was adverse to givi-ng f this outiet to the Mediterranean, because B3 dipi-omacy saw that Russia migbt some Uie wý preci-ude the Brdish from that -part o! the W~ mairIne highways. And ai-though no statesula' as yet foreseen the Suez Canal, i-t wa.s obviOlU i-n the extensi-on and ruile o! a great Empire O, seven seas, Bni-ti-h shi-ps must be gi-yen free Pa through the i-ni-and ocean where she had al- fought wi-th Napoleon. For the first tume since the Napo-eOliU England aililed hersel! with France agadinst,21 The battie of Bai-aci-ava, with i-ts famoUs ' of the Li-ght Brigade,\" Inkermann. and Varffl siege o! Sebastopol and e! Kars, were added repertory of great battles fouglit and ore 19 won by Briti-sh troops outside of Briti-sh ter-' Canada took no Part i-n this war, which, lun 18 agrand crimp l-n the poli-cy of' Rusa-a and 'W record as one o! the mont mIserabJe and inel5' wars that had ever seen thie redcoats of Ii-l Scotland and Irei-and thousands o! miles froUn MEANWHILE, history was [being made in 1 VIpart of the AngI-oýSaxon world. The next' the nineteenth. century that becanie Of wide concern before cables were i-n vogue 11 fore hour-y newspapers kept the woni-d i-n a\u0026O was the great Civil War i-n the 1Uited State8\u0026 as thousands o! people i-n this country trel began i-n Màrch of 1861. And, as schooi-b07 a the world have been taught, li-t was teg moral confliot ever undertaken between two s of the same people. [t was the North gi South, the Yankee comznerciali-t and e against the si-ave-owner and the Confderfite, the one great. werl of Lincoln, and i-t costlt Prom 1861 tii-I 1865, when the war drurnce throb i-n the United States, Canada was dite0 cerned i-n this greateat of a-I interna, xar hapa not less concerned, because I-t -asl ' C home, i-ihan site has i-ately been lid a prbl confli-ot in lrei-and. There are in this coutry thousands o! negroos who came, mail\u003e Oft! the \"undergrounmd rai-lroad,\" !romi the platt the Sontht to escape slavery just beforean the war. Hundreds of Canadians, unale jobs at home, took soldiers' pay froxin h Governmt and went Into the camps oftl",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. ern larmY. Canadijans are stili living wbo remember that 'during the quadrennium, 1861-65, the price of Wheat went as blgb as it did ten years earlier during the war ln the Crimea. Financiers are stili living in the United States who remember that fortunes were 'begun by thoir fathers during that period of depreciation, of demand outrunnig the visible sup- PiY, of army contracts and stock market juggleries c0flditiOned on true or false reports of wbat was happening over a vast field of conflict 2,000 miles long and 1,500 miles wide. 1Tbat war freed the slaves. It changed the indus- trial and commercial character of the land south of Mason and Dixon's line. It left as a legacy a black race Problem and lyncb law, race hatred and white traab Outlawry in the mountains, a martyred Presi- dent, and a great revival of national impulse. It demonstrated that before the American RepuDlic Was quite a bundred years old it was capable of Carrying tbrougb to the bitter end a devastating tOlir-Years' war that would have demoraiized any G1hber COlintry in the world. It coat the Federal Governient nearîy 400,000 men ln kllled and W0flflded. In the four years it put on a programme Of One battle of some sort or other every four days, a total of 330 engagements. And lt cost the United States the fine round suin o! just about $1,500,000,000. TWO Years after that, Canada became a Confedera- 1 tlOn...wltbout gunpowder. .About the marne hetixue, mlodern Germany began to emerge in th -Orth German Bund, undex- Bisarck. Up tilI 1870 Ger~ai1Y bad been celebrated mainly as a la.nd 0£ war and religlous reformation. It flOW began te cemnPete witb the rest of Europe in the art Of peace. Wbat 1a this tremendous power iying lke a buge Wedgo Ini central Europe? It ls the most comipactly ognzdouen..ion country In the world. It 15 sevonty lllon-nearly al Germans, crowded Into a eonuftrY that bas become too sinaîl; beld there by a centalzIng Purpose tbat Bismnarck the empire- builder got fromn Napoleon. Frederlck the Great gave thesi the ascendancY over Austria, wblcb was once tu seat, o! German emnpire. Bismarck welded the Prusslan etates Into 'the Bund. He practised on the iany toe arts that Napoleon used to build up tuePOer0fFrance ln Europe. Wlitb Von Moltke beBd Of the army he was successful. The mxodern Crnnempire, born wlth Bismarck, was banded w y hlm to the present Kaiser. That empire 144 td way the destinles of Europe*as Napoleon 1)hjo lle ItWas to develop Induatry, trade, art, S~ofiphY, religion, -poetry, science-and war based au4lgeaest conacriptîve arxny In Europe and avYt whicb since 1900 bas become a close second euTh Idesa bas sUcceedd GermnlBm la tbe re- tendei .fliSni la too big for Europe. It was In- toe 1 orainate tbe world. Greece bad ber day; c u ers; Napoléon bis; and England, tbe only wit th urope surrounded by the sea, bas bers, lrdyde greetEmpire ln tbe world, based upon % ' libertY and self-government. 11tyshoulci not tbe greatest one-nation country the 'worI, the Fatberîand flot bave lier fllng at the al4 Wby sbould not Germanlsm at one se alne tlxne dictate to Europe and establlsb ?eeteth centurY 'Civilization in the world at tej fl entrai Euro~pe the saylng goes:* \"I'.e nine- twe cet¶iry belonged to the British Empire; the beîoOfnhgs te Gemmaniam-.-and 'the army and '8 0!th atberland are to prove lt.\" -a. eran Officers drink tacltumnly to \"The Day\"- nigthe day when Germany may do wbat Na- 41ie t, do0 wltb tbe \"nation o! sbopkeepers\" anewrt en''Gl tbe grand marcb o! modern Ger- W4 r s gains't France. Durlng tbe Thlrty Years )4wace acquired two partly Germnan provinces irýtela Alsace and Lorraine. Modemn Gerniany tlem back. In 1870 the French nation, after Net long ago the Crown Prince of Germany gave hie chlldren a lesson in war by rlding themn at the head of the Death's Head Hussars, hie own regirnent. The Crown Prince rnay finci the rea1 war, if It cornes, not so jocular a business. a remarkable mecovery from the Napoleonic wara, w-as led into a w-ar witb Germany on the pretext tbat a German prince w-as to occupy the tbrone of Spain. France w-as forced Into taklng tbe Initiative. The Franco-Prussian War was the resuit, la 1870 and 1871. Tbe battes of Metz, Strassburg, and the Sedan were -followed by tbe lgnominious siege of Paria. It was a year of swlft andi terrible triumpb for confederated Gemmhany againsi a nation wbicb had juat recovereci from the world-rampages of Napoleon. Tbe Frenchi underestimated tbe strengtb and the preparedness of Germany. Tbey had nol learned bow tbomougbly Germany understands and practices tbe art of learnlng tbe secrets o! other people. Tbe Siege o! Paris, wben Hessians sat smoking on the boulevards jafter the capitulation, coat France the staggering sura of $1,000,000,000 lndemnity, to lie paid wltblnitbree yeams, plus the provinces o! Alsace and part of Lorraine. Tbe lndemnity w-as paid froin the long red atockingsa of the French people and w-as as good as forgotten. The memory o! Alsace- Lorraine reniained. And the result of tbe Franco- Gemman War was-Tbe German Empire. A PTER the Franco-German War the mlltary af- xfaira of Europe for a w-bile w-ere conýfined to the operations of Britisb troops in Afghanistan and Zululand, tbe bordera of China and the sanda o! Egypt. It became a sort of beredtamy notion that modern w-arfame, w-hloh w-as becoming s0 costly lxi an age of Iron and steain and electrlclty w-as likely to ie conflned to the edgea of unclvllized countiles in need of civillzatlon-to the annexing of Polanda and Finlanda and tbe curbing of Turkey-and the regulation o! the Balkans, for some years con- sidered as the military joke o! Europe. In thia country w-e had ail but forgotten the mesaning ef w-ar, until tbe halfbreed rebelilon of 1885, w-hen troopa froma Ontarlo and Quebec w-ent out te a prairie battle ground a tbo.usand miles square. And It w-as not until the United States undertook to settle the affaira of Spain In Cuba and tbe Phil- ippines tbat w-e remembemed bow w-ar teela w-heu It la close to bome. That brie! andi semew-bat comic- opera w-ar, tbougb ne wortby to be clasaed among the gret, w-ara of last century, proved tbat tbe United States la In the mnaking of a goed second-rate Ne-w Lachine Bridge, Monea ýP. R. Bridge over the St. Lawrence, at .tLachine, frtafc naval power, and tbat Col. Roosevelt w-as the genlus o! modemn Amemica before be became President. Two years later thia country took is first modern plunge into a real w-ar o! Empire w-heu the Boer Wam In South Africa, w-blcb w-as to bave been a pic- niv for a few Britishi generals and a few t.houaands o! troopa, developed into a two-years' conflîct witb 200,000 men In the field under the two greateat generala o! modern times. It staggered humanity, as Paul Kruger said It would; it coat Great Britain many millions %and a change o! Govemament; and it demonstrateci tbat, accomdlng to tbe doctrine of the late Josephi Cbamberlain, the overseas dominions are not mere colonies but young nations side by aide witb the old. That ahl-Empire w-ar la now fifteen yeams in the ibackground; and It la now no matter of opinion w-hetber or not this country will again lie as eager to plunge lnto an Imperial w-ar as she w-as thon. The last great war w-as the Russo-Japanese, w-hicb, because It brought loto tbe limelight a new modemn naval and military power just acrosa the Paciflc pond fmom. our Western ports and, elevators, proved to be of considerable Interest to this country. Since that time Canada lias w-orked up a considerable trade and a good-aized race pro-bm w-itb the country to wbicb w-e used to aend nothing but missionaries. Tbe ap- pearance of Japan as a probable ally of Russia Dy means o! the Angloý-Japanese alliance 'gives us a curious round-the-womld relation to the wam wbicb now seema to be getting ready for the stage In the concert o! Europe. S INCE the Russo-Japanese War inoat o! the Euro- peau w-ar scares bave arisen along witb the tremendous development o! the German Davy to a close second te England. For most o! that time newspaper opinion bas foreseen an .knglo-Ger- man strnggle ln 'wbich Gemmany would take the In- itiative. Soine 0f this lias been mere war talk fos- tered by sensatouial ne-wspapems and ammament makers. Much of It bas been based upon facta. Germany bas been armmng botb on land and water fer e.great struggle somewbeme Iu Europe. In 1905 Germany demanded tbe dismissal o! M. Delcasse, the French Foreign Minister, because bis plana did net suit ber. France acqulesced. The saine policy w-as attempted by GerMany at the Moroccan confemence in 1906; but w-as defeated ew-ing te the support 6f England. andi Russia. Ia 1908, wben Austria -boldly annexed Herzegevina and Bosnia, and Russe., crippleci by the Japanese w-ar, dame net prevent it, Germany stoed beblnd Austria. The preeent general melange lu the Concert of Europe la the result. The opirit of modemn Gemmany w-as expressed aptly by Kaiser Wilhelm lu 1910 as the spirit o! cenquer- lng France was ex-pressed by Napoleon a hundred years eamller. Speaklng at Koulgaberg, be said: 'Gemman w-omen must imPress upon their cli- dren's cbildren that to-day the Principal thing la solely and alone te, keep the Fatberland I-fore one's eyes, solely and alene te stake ail thbe powers of mmnd and body upon the good, of the Fatherland.\" This was said at a tirne w-hon Germany had lie- corne perbapa the fimat land power andi certainly the second sea poweor o! Europe. It embodied the spirit wbtch animates modern Germany ln contmast te the genius of Great Britain. It la the expression o! the dominant idles that finda Its blgbest utterance ln the Japanese--that the Indlvidual la nothlng and the State evemythlng. This la the spirit that w-ill carry Germanly into w-ar, not ln lnd enthusiasm as Rusa will go ly millions, not animated Iy splendid Latin impulse lîke the French, net wltb the spirit ef la- dividual liberty ln harmouy wltli tbe Stato as ln Elngland-but ail for the sake o! the Fatherland. for traffic.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Canada and War FOR yeurs Canada bas been urgeti te make pre- parations fer the day when a big Eurepean w-ar mlght invelve the British Empire. Equally ttrong argumente bave been ativancedi te prove thut banatia titi net neeti to atiept a wnrllke attitude' pnti thut ne war coulti ever toucb the Canadian pee- pie. There were two sets of national ativisers- ,those 'who batie Canadia prepare, anti those who thougbt they eaw niversal pence li the near future. !uast. week, when tbe anneuncernents came over ýhe cables that an Enropean war was lu sight. Canada suddenly discovereti that the national interests of this country hati a direct relation te what was hap- pening Iu Europe. The people who bny stocks anti lthose wibese business it le te selI stocks, font themeelves 'lu a Paule. The Toronto anti Montreal stock exchnnges closeti dewn anti the brokers anti bunkers hati net the courage to open tbem for sev- oral days. The militia tiepartrnent ut Ottawa Imme- dlately sent eut a notice that It wus prepareti tL meMllize a Canadian ammy, anti senti It te Europe If ueceesary. Net a single public man anti net a single Joumnallst hati sufficleut nerve te cerne eut anti say that Canada sheulti mmnd ber owu business anti take ne notice of wbat was happening lu Europe. They kuew tbey would be laugheti ut If tbey matie any sncb unpopular tieclaration. Whe'ther there le n great Enropean war or whether there le net, eurely It le qulte clear that the people wbo, have been crying fer a non-militant attitude on the part of Canada, have receiveti their answver. Se long as Canada remalue within tbe British Empire the Monroe doctrine bas-no applica\u003etion te this coun- try. These wbo bave preacheti t3hat Canada le de- fentiet on landi by the Monroe doctrine anti on tbe 'sea by the Anglo-Japanese Alliance are ebown te be mere tireamers of 1dle fance. Wbetber the Armagetitin, s0 long prophesieti, has corne, or whether It cernes in a future year, It la qulte clear that Canada, se a part o! the British E\u003empire, mauet ulways be prepareti te take part In any war lu wthloh Great Britatl may be Involveti. Th-at part may be no more than te snpply adequate conet defence on landi anti adequate cenet defence ut sou for ber own terrltory. There muet be a prepuroti- nese for war on a broatier scale than bas yet been acknowletiged by the Cunudian peole. It wus an appreciation of thîs situation which led 4 number o! promîneut citizene li Winnipeg andi Toronto te urge, In a non-partisan memorial, nearly two, years ago, that the Canatilan Premier andi leader- ot the Opposition shonîti coine together andi tecitie upon a national naval polcy whicb would meet with the support of all classes o! citizens. Hadti ey doue so tihere woulti have been a feeling lu this country quite tiifomrent fmem that whlcb. prevulleti hast week. Every Cunatilan feele that a zreat war among higbly cîvilizeti nations le almost unthinkable. The doctrines o! Chrietianlty are supposeti te have eradi cateti tbe murderous instincts o! ail the races thal have been toucheti by Western civilization. The events of tihe puet week show te wbat an exteut thIF is a mere supposition se far as Auistria. Ser-via anc Ruselu are coucemneti. Whlle it muet be atimIttei that the Unitedi States anti Canada are farther adi vanced inl týhis respect, nevertheless nelther natiox rnay shut lis eyes te the attitude cf the Eurepeai nations. Whlle each af the North Amerlean people; hue izndoubtetily striven anti wlll certainly strive tç avoiti entunglemeut lu sucb 'wars as have the- enigin lu semP-bar1baric Europe, yot they muet a least seek te pretect their own 'terrlterY anti thel own national intereste. This is the only justifies tien for a Unitedi States arrny anti n Unitedi State nnvy. It le aise the chie! justification fer a Cane tilan army anti a Canatilan navy. The CGi Iu the same way that Russia submitted, five years ugo, to Anstria's annexing Bosnla anti Herzegovlna. Russla has troubles of ber own at the present tIme. Moreover, her twe partners lu the Triple Entente, Great Britain anti France, aise have troubles of their own. It seemed an opportune time for the Triple Alliance te bumiliate, tbe Triple Entente anti pnsb tbe German wedge a few hundreti miles uearer the Metiltermanean Sea. This seemes to be a possible Une of reasonlug taken by the Geripan Kaiser. If so, he has nilsealculateti. Rusla, deepite ber labour troubles, answereti the challenge without a moment's tielay anti proceetiet immetiiately te mebihize her forces. France ime- tIiately forgot ber constltutlonal struggles, ber -fac- tional battles, anti berý social arguments. La Belle Republique annonced wlth great alacrity that so far as she was concermned the Triple Entente coulti demanti of ber.ne sa;crîlice wblch she was uuwilliug te muke. What Great Britain answered le not known, except that the North Sea Fleet was môbilizeti untier secret ortiers. Whutever the Inter resulte may reveal, tbis view seemes rea-sonuble at tbe moment. The German anti Austrian. governmeuts tbougbt that tbe struggle was inevitable anti tecideti that the year 1914 was a suit- able one lu whIcb te strike for German anti Austrian supremncy on the nortb-eust coast of the Atiriatie. Explosive Alliances O lnl the grIet countries In the worlti, ouly eue, tbe United Sta-tes, bas kept Itsel! free fmom entanglng ahiancop. Witness the folly o! last week's serles of events. Austrla makes a de- mand ou Servia whIch wus intenieti te bunullate that country. Servia tries te compromise, but the Ans- trlan gune refuseti time for parley. Becanse Austria moveti on Servia, Russla moves ou Austria. Because Russin moves ou Austrin, Gerxunny moves on Russia. Because Germnny ineves en Ruasia, France moves ou Germany. Because France ruoves ou Gerrnany, Italy muet move on France. Because Italy baE moveti ou France, France on Germauy, Germany ou Russia, Russia on Austria, Austria on Servin, ther the wbele'British Exuplre-. muet move on eomeboiy If the Unitedi States bati any alliances whatever i woulti be compelleti te follow atter Great Britain, ai 3apan -wll pre'bably fluti It uecessary We do. The whele situation can only be illustrated by thg nursery rhyme, whlch bas semething 'te do witl water queuchlng fire, flre 'burnlng stick, stick beatinl dog auti tog b'lting pig,- se that a peor olti latiý shonld net be evertaken by the evenlug sbatiews The'nursery rhymne was intendeti te be feolish an( simple. It was creuteti for tbe amusement o! chul dren. The entanglng alliances of Europe seem ti *be eqully feelish anti equally simple. If the live of millions of human beinge are te be subject te th disastrous influences e! these entsngling alliancefi some newer methoti of greuplng will be uecessar3 Iu the meautime Canadians wIll view wltb satisfa( tien ant inl a new light the fact that this Dominie: lei locateti beonti the range o! Enrepean alliances. The War Scare W HETHE~R there le war or net the effect upon w finance sud intiustmy hue been termiflc. A war scare is aliniot as tilsastrous us a meuh war so far as the womld'e commercial opematieus are cencerneti. The telogrnpb anti the cable 'have matie the werld eue emaîl country In respect of finaucial anti commercial conditions. Wbepi tbe luvestore of eue country throw up their bauds anti abandon hope, the investers lin ahi other ceuntries are affecteti. When the bunkers anti lan compauxes e! the great fluancial centres refue te lnd any mer e mlolley, bunkers anti ban copnlsIal the other centres of ail the ether nations atiopt a sinilur attitude. Wlien the Bank of Englanti ativancedi its rate o! dis- count te elght andi ton per cent. every bunker lIn --- . 1, -a ,cfatcit lenti uny- LLBU'- O . 1- - aseete. stop there le ne oil for lustries o! Canada cnu- BY THE EDITOR Sporting Resuti FTER defeating the, Canadians at C A Austre Justen Davis Cup tennis team Germnans et Pittsburgh, The reSUIl ýsale-three straight Wins, two sin doubles. Score for singles: let. 2nd. Wilding (A.) ................ 6 6 Urenzer (G.).........2 2 Brookes (A.)........10 8 Froitzbeimn \u003cG.).\u003e........... 8 Score for Doubles* s:2d Wý,ilding andi Brookes (A.) ... 5 Krenzer anti Froltzbeirn (G.).1 1 This week the wlnners mneet the Brit!x Boston. Grace Church cricket tee-m. Toronto, fat the Robertson Trophy lu Winnipeg, being the present hoiders, the Winnipeg WV wickets. hostilities cornes, as it may corne auy minute, the: wlll probably be a sigh of relief, lu many quarte! The war scare seemns to be worse than real war, phenomenon which would require a school of ph osophers te explain. Mobilization B OBABLY this week, the Canadian Militia w be calleti te arms. This would produce Parmy of .66,000 officers and men, witb 15,0 borses. Frein these regiments a firgt division 21,000 men wlll be concentrated \u0026It Quebec, equlpP andi sent to the front. The \"front\" wlll be wberûl the British army authorities designate. In ail -prol bllty the treops weulti be sent to Belgium or Frar and used on the line of communication. Front two to three weeks would be requireti despatcb this, division. Sulbsequently, supplementi batches would follow regularly at the rate of 4,( every tortnight, untll another 21,000 bati gene f ward. To take the place of these militia at home, rese, batitalions would be organized. There are plefltY officers -on the \"Reserve List\" 'te take charge oý reserve equal te the number IIow on the authorli establishmenlt. These t.roops would remalu at thJ respective heatiquarters until a furtber levy 18 quireti. This, iu rough, le the general plan decIdeti ni by Generals Frenchi andi Hamilton during their rec visite te Canada. Canadian troops 'will take their own rifles 1 guns, but woulti probably be supplieti wlth ammil tien front Great Britaîn. All ammunitien, rifles artlllery, tbroughont the Bri'tish EmpIre le madie the same bore, and may be used with ail make-1 riflez andi guns. The French ammunIilel I f0 larger bore, a.nd could flot be used by British Canadian treope. The Greatest Moment T IE greaftest moment lu any manse life le wben he makes the most noise, but ra' when be exhIbits Iu the hlghest degree dil Jutigment and resolution. This la the moment Canada te show tignlty, jutigment anti resolutioll An (Jttawa tiaily paper came eut'on Fritiay of week wltb a scare-beati, three luches dieep, prdl ln reti acrose the top, ýsaylng, \"lHell's Let Loc That was nlot diguilieti. It was net Canatiafi. Nel was It British. Modemn cîvllization le receiving 1Ws greatest anti It 'bebooves every Canatilan to be cool, st andi calculating. The man or newapaper who hysterical lu this crisis la a menace te the coninlu: If Great Brîtain goes to war anti wins, ber naval engagemen~t w'ltb Germany, the tratie rc% will be open between Canada anti Great BritaiXi, there will be a trenuns tieranti fer C81 fotistuifs. An Increase lu the price of wheat oats will put anywhere from flfty to elgbty Ii dollars extra xnoney In the pockets of Canaian~ ducers. This muait be paiti in golti, and Canada have more of this preclous commodity thafi St time lu ber hlstory. The resultant effect upoil tian business must be higbly beneficial. a Let the people be courageons anti hopeful. e Europe Is terrifleti, the people neeti footi anti SIfP] Mnch of this must corne froin Canada, so that rosverity le aseureti. Indeeti, there is a possi n Much tiepentis upen the tratie routes being open, anti surely the people are confident thaj British Fleet wlll be equal to that task. Lot look upon the situation wlth the caimness and fidence whicb le the test of good citizeniship'",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. The Woman \",Brought Up by Boys An Apprecinuion of Mrs. Broughall, Who Founded the Georgina Ho use, Toronto By ALICE WETHERELL GEORGINA HOUSE, TORONTO. AChurch of England boarding.house for self-supportlng wvomen, Which was namned for Its founder, Mrs. A. rj. Broughall. VERYBODY knows MrB. Brougball.\" This Th as the exclamation ou more than one e\u0026occasion wben It was suggested that this knoble woman's work s-hould be made SOwn. Adinvarlably a word of pralse was added. Thehelug baud,\", tbe \"burden-bearer,\" and the COfInforter,, Were the kind of appellations used. IR1i6ed, M4ra. Brougbaîî just seems to be a true dis- c'i0f tee Perfect Comforter. She works lu secret D aue ,8d tbose who bave been helped, like te leper O! Old, wlll not be sîleut, but are' publishIug the uplthf their ben ef\"Ptor tg power of thîs, lnl'iDwar bas worked not only secret, but aise lu public, and sIreapt the greatest wltuess te Its l le J au institution whlcb bas l eenl ëstablielbed lu' Toronto, C 'etortable resideuce for busi- nes worferi Georgina House, byn,ý way, after Is as fo eabject of ibis sketch. t all~~Y Opened by Hl. R. Il e~ lu e Of Cnagt not many exIte or rvîous to this, it foura 1.ive years under less ftuelbIe conditions, but is Iu- dObed for Segood was quite un- et and ail it Stands for, tbat Ubiae core from British Col- alli) 8'1 t Wilpeg askiug for tioni 1 î a viseew to estab- InllJI bouses ln the West. o eha rnest hope of Mrs. 'hl and ber belpers that a ~QOfrlgina bouses may be Othy oPened from the PacîfloýÀ '%1Dje great work ls but a nr fthe practIcal religion of loigbalî. Married at theag to ente Rev. A. J. Brougball, ebt fSt. stepbeu's Churéh, the rie ad ail of lite to learu. VayOf itnet tbeory, was ibe ýCr1l an,' Drgrss ad even the tert lta, ndtbe cook became lot bat, -rs.Broughall be- t e taIise' wle should b ,tber husband's work, r b p -î Iudeed, on@ iah ht Ilbe bas but little sym- Oxe O! the modern The younger dau heelt e change tee woman's assuma the Cana 131IL * le 0,,lIte l, an ex- Connaught, la her welVethal e,ýrtn9it for others. The rearing of allyworu would seem to be an ample tank Irel h alMme. Droughall performied this work ta tb tree of ber sous followed lu the foot- letb r hi fateer, and are now distlugulshed :%te bfteClergy. Que o! these for som rne m tc 'feather ai St. Siepbeu's Cburcb, aud uow a, ro ,ace Cburcb on the bill. lx telle an amnusing story te show bêw doe 1 seexu to influjence a woman's lite. loterealds0, wbo delighted in bis grand- eOm'aiy, was visiting ber oue fine day, axid her Ibh lIttIe tasks about the bouse. The motheriy heart could not withhold the word of pralse \"What a useful boy you must be at home,\" shle said encouragingly. \"*Oh!\" the boy grunted, \"Cook won't let me ln thi kitchen; but then, granny, Yeu were brougbt up b~ boys, so you're ail right.\" S0much for Mrs. Broughall's famly lie. Ela her influence ended here, it would have beex great. But It has been by no means boundet by home tien. In the early days, nursing bad noi become a profession. Many a nigbt dld this woman of broad sympathies spend in carîng for soine pooî sufferer. Her help was neyer then and is neyer nom asked in vain. In tact ber intimate friends are sometimes aiment jealous of ber time, and tell ber that tbey mnust be eitber III or wicked to get to ber However that may be, Mrs. Broughall bas always considered the sufferer ber especlal charge. Sbe ls stili an Associate of St. John's Hospital, and, It la saidi, had no littie to do with the fouudlng of that institution many years ago. Mrs. Brougball's love for girls, even in those early times, took a very practical form. For some years, ber cares and continued ill-health necessitated her glving up ail Sunday-scbool duties, but ber belp was needed badly. A parishioner once asked ber if she bad no Bible clas ber daugbter could attend. The response was made like llghtulng: \"No, but I wil] bave.\" Mrs. Broughall accepted thls as a caîl, and a clas of lve girls was immediately formed. It seau became qulte evident that the woman wbo was \"belng brought up by boys\" was the woman wbo could reach the hearts -of girls from every aphere of lte. From ail parts of the City, and trom ail denominations, the women and girls would corne to St. Stepbeu's Churcb, until Mrs. Broughall found berseit every Sunday afternoon talking of the sacred things of lite, to 200 eager listeners. The benefits were mutu *ai. The girls gained wbo can tell how much; the teacher found ber knowledge of the Inuer lite of many a girl who was boardlng lu the City, and from this knowledge learned how distastetul to the A FAIR RELATION OF THE GOVERNOR.ELECT. ghter of the Duke of Teck, brother of Prince Alaxander o dian Governor-Generalshlp iaPon the re*t remaent next monti re seen rldlng in Rotten Row, L.ondon. She Is young, but horsewornanl. home-loving instinct were many of the exlsting Con- ditions in a boardlug-house. So it maY be sald tbat tram. that little class of years ago grew tbe great project wbicb gave riSe to the Georgina House. Mauy years ago, after Mrs. Broughall bad safely passed tee crisis of a serious lllness, a dear old lady was talklug te Canon BrouS'ball iu beartfelt eym- pathy. \"I thlnk Mrs. Broilghall wll pull ,througb te be a comfort te you yei,\" she saîd. The ambiguous language did not bide tee true sentiment, and one le thankful teat Mrs. Broughall dld Pull tbrougb that and mauy other trylug tirnes to be a comtç\u003eri again and yet hagain to many. e y d t r A Mascot By M. B. THAT which la being held before the camera, by the very pretty girl ln the accosnpanying Illus- tration, ls not a preconcelved Idea of nlght- mare, neither ls It a make-belleve dwarf playing at belng real. It ls called Cuthbert, and was the mascot of the Laurence Irving Company, durIng their Cana- dian tour, whlch recently bad sucb a tragic con- clusion. And now for a word about tbe pretty girl wbo, seems to be no attacbed to Cutbbert. She la Neil Carter, w-ho was uuderstudy to Mrs. Irving, and played the blg role In \"'The Lily.\" She ls very en- tbusiastic about the Canadian West, and wants to corne back again, soine time. And if one may use the Western press as a candld crltlc, she will be as welcome on ber return as e herselt will welcome that returu. Miss Carter bas not neen before the ligbts very long. Sbe la one of tbose fortunate belngs wbo seem, te fall into luck, or bave It tbrust upon tbem without auy warulug. Belug exceedlngly pretty, wltb iluffy brown bair wblch crînkies ail up lote fuzzy littie curîs around ber eyes, she naturally was cbosen, rlght iu ber first engagement, to understudy the mont beautiful woman Iu tbe company, the star of the company, by tbe way. This was Ellallne Terris, the wlfe of Seymour Hicks, botb great tavourites In London. Mise Carter vas rather spurned by the majorlty of the compauy, wbo ln, this particular case were members of the chorus. The reason why she was spurued le quite a simple one, as choruses go. She appeared eviery morulug for rehearsal, In a simple serge suit sllgbtly worn as to tbe elbows. Mauy of tbe chorus Queeni\u0026, on the other baud, drove to tbe theatre In tbeïr own motor cars, wore sealskin Coats, etc. Tbey calledl modest Neil Carter the \"ghabby flapper\"' of the show. O NE day, somethiug bapPened. Mise Carter recelved a spe- cial delivery note tbat she was to appear that uigbt as the star of the production. Miss Ter- ris was Ill. Her opportunlty ball corne! She arrived at the theatre, as usual, that nlgbt, lu ber woru serge if Teck, who will suit. Presently, ho'wever, tbe audl- h of the Duka of ence wondered wbo tbe young suh- already a notable stitute could be. NeIl Carter! Tbey bad neyer beard of ber be- fore. And she couid act! Anybow, the result of It aIl was that slle played Misa Terris' role for the remeluder of tbe season. Tliat was the steplng atone to other tblngs. She bas understudied many parts. It seemed ouly natural that Laurence Irving nbould -have chosen ber to appear lu the same capaclty te bis brlillaut w'ite. Cuthbert, tbe mascot o! the Company, wbo belonge to Miss Carter, salled witb ber ou the \"Teutonle.\" Wbo kuows, perbaps If be bad been ou the unfor- tunate «\"Eiurese-? Well, he was uot-and tragedy bad lIs way. MISS NELL CARTER A member of the late Laurence Irvlng's company, snapped with her unprepossessing mascot.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. * Cou rierettes. B RITAIN Is having ructions wlth Irelnnd. The United States is wnlting tili Mexico becomes nasty agalu. Austrin le warring ou Servia. Anud we have just made a memorandum of the Battle o! Van- couver for the new history booka._ But on December î5tb shall we sti slig \"Peace on Earth\"? The nrmy worm osems te have travelled to Europe. Isxi't Austria hungry for Servia? The Kaiser le sald to be a warlike mouarcli. le the deductlen ruade fromn the foerce turu of hie moustache? Wbere le Normuan AugelI? These are the dog days. The doge o! war? The discord lu the concert of Eu- rope le makiug Sir Edw'ard Grey. Wheu it was suggested that Joues had marrled for beauty, the cynlo sald lie thouglit the reason wae booty. Au hysterical. jury bas acquitted Mme. Caillaux, and that oause celebre Is nlready a thlng of the pas.t. The result proves that murder, commltted by a French woman, is naught but a recreatien, a pastime, a sport. The idea of suggestlng that one should be puufshed for amuslng theniselves thusly 1 The \"Mail and Empire,\" Toronto, devotes a columu o! epac 'e describi.ng the remxarkable feat of a man çyho took thlrteen bours te land a salmeon. Tiiore are worueu, numbere of thexh, whe have speut yoars o! their lives lu landiug an ordinary lobster and nover a word le prlntod about theru lu the papers. Yet they are calledl thf weaker sex! worma or two. The catfisb, Hauk says. began to watch for bis coming and would stand up spryly on bis taîl when ho beard the kitchen door bang and knew Hauk was comlug with bis dinner. Presently Hauk taught hlm to jump for bis food, and progressed so well wlth bis training that in no time the catfish could jump as higb as the top of the barrel. One day ho muade the top and flopped overboard, and started to follow Hank luto the bouse. Wel, to cut it short. it soon came to be an everyday occurrence to see Hank strlkiug off for the village witb the old catfisb lopplng along behlud hlm, and the chuîdren would mun te the gate. to see hlm go by, and the older Inhabitarits would exclalm, \"Weil, would you look at that now. I neyer seen uothiug Ilke It lu my life- time!\"' Hnk says ho was fonder of -that catfish than lie could have been o! auy dog-\"uno commofi, oruery, every- day pet, that\"ý-wbeu oue day a moan thing happened. Hauk was crossiug the bridge over the river, with the catfish, as usual, at bis heele, wbexi hoe came te a large crack lu the floor- lng. Before you coubd eay Scat! the catflsh laed dropped through into the water. Hank raxi back te shore, scrambled down under the bridge, got a boat and pulled out into the river. The catfieh wne just coming to the top for the third tlme. Hauk got hlm, but ho wae dead. Drowned, poor fellew! Hunting The Harigmaf.-It hep- peued on a Toronto daily newspaper. The city editor was a man o! Sud- den Impulses and brilliant ideas who made life a phantasmtagoria to some UNDAUNTED. \"Why do you tiesitate so about your aniswe you afrald of telllng an untrutti?\" \"No, air.\" -The \u003ess a o! hIs reporters. Thore wns ouE log writer ou thse staff wlie came in for a the goed Ehare of ibis mnan's impromptu g he caprices. t in- One InorninL- the t-ditor rnil *1 \"Weil go, and interview tbe hang- man here-get bis address from t'he dlrectory-ald ask him wbat hoe thînlis of this as a suitable scheme for Toronto jail.\" \"Oh beoavens,\" mumbled the writer. However, hie made sure f rom. the reporters' staff, wbo were strong on names, of tbe exact spelllng Of this naine--\"Radliffe,\" they told hlm. In thbe directory he was set do-wn as liv- ing on A Street at No. 21. He took a car and reached the bouse, a nice- looklng residence on a very respect- able street-wonderiflg ail the wbile how the People of that very polîte neighlourhood rellshed tbe. idea of havixig a baugman lu their mîdst. Hie had been told weird stories about this baugmafl thaît lie had bis front parlour decorated wltb tbe ropes of bis inany victime. But lie was told by a very ploasaut lady that the said- Mr. Radcliffe bad moved fromn there sonie mouths before and was uowN to be foufld at No. 74 B Street. On lie went sevoral-blocks farther. At the second address 'he found a bouse even more respectable than the first, and a lady 'who seemed to be as gentie as the professioni of. ber alleged bus- baud was discredt.ble. And lie was very boath to aek ber. \"-Pardon me-but does Mr. Radclliffe live here ?11 \"Woll, no; he moved away just a f ew days ago. Hie is now living at the Homer Heouse\"-whiCh wau a very orderly and popular home-circle hotol dowutown. Down -wont the scribe to the Homer House. The clerk seemed not at ail surprised wbon lie was asked: \"Doos Mr. Radcliffe stay bore?\" \"Yes,\" WaS. the reply, \"but be's out just now. You'll fiud hlm. at bis of- fice dowu ou C street.\" This was a neW one. How could a baugman bave an office? Thougli, o! course, wbeu hoe came to thirLk Of Rt, a mn spent very Uittle of hie tiue haugiflg other people and must bave plenty o! time on bis bands for slde 1iues of business. Aud, lt soemed that MT'. Radcliffe was a partuer wltb somo merchaut down town. Therefore, feeling sure that this was the last bnp lu the clbsse after the elusive hangmnan, the scribe hustled blinself down te the address givefi hima at the hotel. nie entered a long, ullent office. Beblnd a ibigli desk, seated on a stool, was a dli- gent-lookiflg, geiTteel persOf S very busy over a bedger. The scribe scanned hlma over a o- nuent bofore saying a word. This man wasn\"t tbe loet like auy photographe of tihe hang- man hoe baad seon lu the news- papers. Howevor, It was surel-f tbe man. And Hartmain screw- ed Up hie nerve te the point, where hoe could ask this lne- cent-looklng persou the awful, \"lYou are-Mr'. Radelliffe, T i7 belleve?\" \"IThat's my name,\" smiiled theo other. \"What do you l'Weil, sIr-to be qulte franli -rve been sent by the 'Even- lng Cal'-to aek yen - what you. think about the wlsdom of-! erecting a permanent ec1ýafflold-uh, a regular litruc- ture, you understand-so as nlot to have te bothel' wlth-- wlth-\"l Thon thbe man at the desk klndled mIet a smile. \"'Alieni I guoss yeu've got the wrong mani,\" lie sald. \"The mani you want to se le the hangmn.l H is namella Rad- clive. Oh don't apolegize. r.? Are You'oee not the first that's made Tte. the mitýake.\"1 Tatier. But thie scribe boni a hasty retreaît to the office of the \"'Cali,\" wihere lie wrete out, not bie scaffold story-but bis resIgnation. lngenlouL.-Â ernl boy, as ls the habit of bis klnd, longed for pennies to spend. Ho had a habit of asking hie mnother'e gueste to give hlm them. Hie miother promised a thrnshuing, if she found hlm continulng the gaine.. So ho had another stunt. Ho weut up to a vIsitor anid said: \"Do you know anyoue whe would lond me a penny and niot ask for it bak?\" Lasti Corim Made these shoes im- possible. But Inez told me of BIue-jay. I applied it and the pain stopped in a moment. In 48 hours ail three corns came eut. No soreness whntever. 1 nover thought of the corrus from the moment 1 used Blue-jay. And now they are gene, te neyer return, unless tîght shoes cause nov ones. Thsis i. thse story of millions of corne wbich have been ended by Blue- jay. It wîlbethestoryofyourcorls when you use this one right method. Don't pare them. Paring nover ends acorn. Use the modern metbod. A famous chernist, by inventing Blue-jay, bas made corn troubles needless. Blue-jay takes corns out, without any trouble, wîhout any. annoyance. Apply it in a jiffy, thern forget the com. It is taking out about o.îe million corne a montb. It le the method now used and endorsed by physicians. You owe to yourself a test. Blue-j ay IRISHLIN ENl You kuow froru \"Ho-ar- Yv; .ay\"lthat It la unrivaledi but you can kuow by Ex- perlence, by wrlting te a House that bas a record for etraiglit radig 01 almost a century. MURPHY \u0026 ORRS name assoclated wlth DAMASK TABLE LINEN, BED LINEN, HOUSE LINEN, LINEN 4JAMBR1C RANîDKERCHIEFIS, DRESS LINENS, ]IRISH LACES, etc., ls an absolute warranty Illustratod Prîco is,t Frise. MURPHY \u0026 ORR, Box 18, Belfs\" IRELAND A LeterPersonai aPe A Letter ance counUfo A Crd ood deal Ine A Word eniy ietter, a s iProclaim, a a il ueO! Ilsh ail betraY Gentleman or norance or Getlwoanbreeding. Ag Gentlwoman twomaflo en by their particular attention t these thing. L t us holp Y o tU wordie with o c ae and dîscrilmin a \"A D)esk B ok of Errore in Ele te jut the littie bookc to hlP Yoi ueig the riglit word at tberI tirne aud right place. A VerY and very direct little book. BY H. Vlzetelly. lemo, CIoth, 1,1.o postPald Norman Rjeliarchon, 12 E. W.lihsi St fo",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. OoeUnIort SEajIRMIS CORPOATION -LIMITEDI ESTABUaNE0 \"90' TOORQNTD MOPITREAL LONDON EIIO County of Oxford, Ont. 5 % Debentures Due 1915-44. InterCs. annually. PRJCE: On opplical ion. SPecial circuler upon request. Cunadian Coverliment Mu nicipal and Corporation Bonds PELATT Members --\u0026= = Toonto Stock PELL4fExchange MASTER 0F THE SITUATION. The War God Upsets Thinits a Bit! and closed ut 176. These three stocke 'were ut once the moist active and the weakest stocks lin Toronto market. C.P.R. and BrazIlian, were carrespondlngly wealc lu Monltreal on Saturday. on Monxday, Laurentide and Pawer joined the group on the toboggan and broke respectivel' iseven anld five points. Tuesday was the bJlackest day that the Canadian Exelianges have hiad in years. Bath exehanges closed down, Montreal at faon and Toronto at 2.15. Panic relgned; security -values were béing slaughtered. On the floors, hall a dozen widely differlng prices were inade on the same securlty at one and the saine time. Values turnbled preciýpitatelY on bath exohlanges, and the whole of the members were much relleved when the bell rang and the exch-anges were closed. The action, while unprecedented, was 3ustlfIed. Prices were smashed,, irrespective of values, and the wrecçilng had ta be stopped. C.P.R. slumped everywhere. Berlin sold it on lits own accouint and for Austria. Landau sold. New York sold. In New York it sold for 157, whlch was a drap o! twenty points. Brazilian touched. 53% just beflore the exchange closed on Tuesda?.' One monta before It vas 77. On the Saturday, even, It was 69, s0 that 1t broke ten points over the week end. Barcelona, 'whloh has sold for 40, sold\" on Tuesday for 15%. Toronto Rails, once sefllIng at 140, sýol« for li. Monitreal Power, whiich has reglstered 235, sold for 211. Canadian General Electric, quoted at 110 lu January, sold for 91. Mtlch o! the selling of the Montreal people was put on the shoulders of the Toro.nto brokers. Rlght along through the trouble, New York has beau selllng on about a fIfth of Its total selling ordars for holders lu Europe. The fOllowlng are the prices of 9o0 of the leading stocka on the OanàdIaýr exchanges on Saturday, July 25, and Tuesday the 28th, whlch was the daýy %hh the exchanges closad dowu: uy2. Jl 8 Barcelona............. ................. 17% 15%/ Brazdian ............................. .69U, 45 C. P. R ............................... 1794 17314 Cam. Gen. Electie.. .................... 933% 0V Lauirentide ....................... -..... 175 164 Mackay........... ........... ......... 79 75 Montbreal Po'wer....................... 227 2:11 Toronto Rais........................ 11814 Ili The recass on the Montreal and Toronto exohanges vill continue ti Auguat 4th and probsibly longer. MearwhlO, the local situation la being steadlly lmproved. The bunkers are helpling aIl they eau, and have tacltly agreed flot to. call losals. They are makiiig every effort ta prevent thie ac~rifice af good securitles. A New York banker, speaifg af the situation, hit the nail ou the head. Hie salid: \"It ls flot a questionl of maney; there lis enough aud ta spare. But it is a question of credits, and more especÀaily as ta what exteut credits have been lmpalred.\"' Local brokers say that on the wihole the huge nwnber of calls for margin IMMAGNATL5 \u0026Î One Tragic Week T i neessryto go back to 1907 for a parallel in the demoralization of the On Saturday, July 25th, the firsat tremors came in consequence of the news that Servia had refused compliance with Austria's demand. The markets were In no condition te stand the sbock. As the tables in The Canadian Courier showed, the average 0f representative Canadian -stocks had sunk in the previous week to 99, which is the lowest average in years. C.P.R. was quoted on Saturday the 25th at 1773/, a then new low. Over that week end, declines of from five to niýne points were sustained, and a widespread crumbling Of values was apprehended. At that, prices on Canadian exchanges were bet- ter than London quotations, though, compared with ptrices a month ago, they showed Up badly. On Monday (27th), the group of 'bears on both Toronto and Montreal ex- changes found a windfall In the grave news frosn Europe, and made haste to cover. Brazilian was margined wiholesale. It closed on Saturday at 6914; trading aibroad lowered it to 61%/, and it opened here ut 64. Thus, in one day's trading, it broke five points. Toronto Rails, which was quoted in Toronto on Saturday the 25th at 119, slumped nine points in London, opened In Toronto on Monday at 116, broke to 11114, and hardened to 115. C.P.R., 1773/ on Saturday, was seven points off in London, opened here on Monday at 175y4, Safety of Principal, Certainty of Interest A writer in one of Our flnanclil journais recentiy said that real es- tate mortgages Combine the two great essentiais of a conservative in- vestment-safety of principal and certainty of iflterest. To those who have funds for In- vestmnent only In snmali sums this rnost desirable class of security is neot directly avallable. They may, how- ever, secure ail those advantages by investing in the bonds of this corpor- ation which are based upon upwards of twenty-nine million dollars of care- fully selected first mortgages on im- proved real estate. These bonds may be had in denominations of one hun- drcd dollars. They are a security in which Executors and Trustees are expressv authorized by law to invest trust funds. Send foi specimen bond, copy of Annual Report, and full partIcular. Canada Permanent Mortgage Corporation Pald-up Capital and Reserve Fund exceed TEN MILLION DOLLARS. TORONTO STREET, TORONTO. Establlshed 1855. Securing ]Bargains w anted.emteb Ç And he didn't wish ta speculate on margin. q We solved his problema by bu\u003e ing the shares for hirm on our I eriodical Payment Plan. Re wilI pay the balance ia easy monthly instalments. q' We give hirm the safety of full ownership by agreeinlt ta call for any qthe, pay- ments-whatever aDpens te the market. Our booklet, \"Saving and irvestment\" t\"U how we do thi for \"ou. Greenshields \u0026 Complinyl H embera Montreat Stock Exchanjl 1D.ealera in Canadian Bond las uea The Iinperi Trusts Conpauy of Canada j / Allowed on Doepoij t g W.thdrawable by Cheu 5Pad on Guaranioed 105 nvestmente MORTGAGES PURCHASED HKAD OiqMCE: la Richmonud St. Watt, Torentu, Tot M. 214 The World-Fa.mous LGisette1se, alnland busi- iies. mon, and othors through- Prof. A. Loisotte's Great Wr 4dASSIMILATIVE MEMO 'Ry, OrHowtoAttendandNee.Foger\" Deiective memorjea made' per\u003e feot, Heretor SoIdude 8trli»gent restrIctons aJld ia Wigh price. New Dlfted wlthki easy reach of all. 1ClOth. 12mo. Price, $3.00 Poat \"eId. NORMANE RICHIARDSON 12 E. Wellington St. - - Teormit",
         "CANADIAN COURIER, Bau@3-MOM- -MMflo-umM\" The Importance of a Will IFyudewithaut a WÎII the lwabtaiyprovides for a divi- are paid into Court and speclal application must be mnade to provide funds for dueir maintenance and education. The mnaking of your WiII ih therefore a matter of paramourit importance. The appoint- mient af this Comnpany as Eetecutor is a guaraintee of an efficient, responsible ad priudent adiinistration, with absolute fidelity ta the terras af your Win. 18-22 KING STREET EAST, TORONTO Moatreal Winnipeg Edlmontoa Saskatoon Regia 1 III DI i THIS INVESTMENT Has Pad 7 Pr Cen. Per A*znum half yearly siace the Securlties of this Corporation were placed on the market 10 years ago. Business established 28 years. Investment may be withdrawn ln ar orMmean ire after one year. Sale as a mortae. Pull particulars aM oolet gladly furnlshed on request. National Securities Corporation, Llmlted Confédération Life Building - Toronto, ONLt Talk Correctly and You WÎiI Tliiuk Correctly hodEngithprooteaipahod thougiit. Get into the habit of care. usof words @'M uai . . .,l i thought. To tinkd correcily and taik correctly. to teik ,«oealy and thik conroctly Yeu will fiad A DESK-BOOK OF ERRORS IN ENGISH A ery amimble fittle book. MRiglit toe in L\" U.ao, dlo*, 24 pages, $1. p P. Normian Richardson, 12 E. Wellington St., Tormnto TeCanaclian Bank of Commerce Head Offce:. TORONTO Paid-up Capita, $15,O00,000; Reserve Fund, $13,500,000 SIR EDMUND WALKFIR, C.V.0., LL.D., D.C.L ....... President. ALEXANDER LAIRD ................... General Manager. JORN AIRD .................Assistant General Manager. Branches ln every Province ôf Canada and ln the United States, England and Mexico. Traveliers' Chelques The Travellers' Choques Issued by this Bank are a very convenlent torm ln whlch to provîde funds when travelling. They are Issued iu de- nominations of $10 $30 $50 or $100 anud the exact amtounit payable ln the principal countries of the world la shown on the face of each choque. These choques may be used to pay Hotels, Railway and Steamship Companles, Ticket and Tourlat Agencies and leading merchants, etc. Zlach purchaser of these cheques la provided with a list of the Bank's prIncipal\u003e4aying agents and correspondents throughout the world. They are issued by every branch of the Bank. in thre last quarter of 1909, L.aurentlde soid at 125. Ut rose stoadil the titird quarter of 1911 Ut touched 228. Then twe shares were one, and again it wient over the 220 mark. Now It la solllng ar lees than one millin The liret balf of thre forogolng ohart showE of the aid stock duIg 1909, 1910 and 1911. The break Indio\u0026tei aid stock went off, and th~e aaw stock came on. have been well met. The strain bas been very severe, but it looks as if, wýhen the markets reopen, there will not be many accounts sold out. The whole trouble bas been that the disquieti ng news came at the wrong time, and everybody rushed to realise-no ma.tter a, wbat cost. The Economiîcs of War ONFriday last the London and New York stock excbanges decided to, close until furtber notice. Practically ail the European exchangeR had been closed durIng the week. The transactions were nominal. When New York on Friday morning discovered that it was to be the du=p- ing ground for the wbole world, there was nothing to do but close. New York migbt have absorbed alI tbe International stocks that were off ered without injury, but it could flot prevent its own national stocks f alling lu sympathy witb the International securities. Hence the action taken. What would be tbe effect o! a general war upon the financial and coin- mercial conditions of the United States and Canada? The general opinion seems to be that the effect, in tbe long run, will be good. If Canadian and United States securities prove to be better than the securities of any other country, then the world's capital will flow this way in an ever-increasing streain. It ail depends upon the wisdom of the governmerits of the two, countries. If there are no impediments put in tbe way of financiers, rail- way managers and industrial leaders, industry will tbrive and didends wIll be earned. The financial succeas o! each country depends upon its commer- cial and agricultural success. If the United States and Canada are alive to their opportunities a gefi- eral European war would greatly benefît the North American continent. Tbe United States will bave the greatest crop in its history-nearly six illionl bushels of wheat, corn, oats, barley and other fleld products. Its crop o! wheat alone is estimated at close to one billion busbels. An increase of flftY cents a busbel in webeat and twenty-fIve cents a bushel in oats would mnenT a, great deal to botb countries. It would do miuch to retrieve tbe Cane.dlai Nortbwest, but it would do more to iinprove conditions ln tbe United States. Then thore a istbe broader phase. If tbe Ujnited States bas the only vessels on tbe bigh seas, owned by a \"*neutral nation,\" then mucb of tb.e carrying., trade norw beld by Great Britali and Germany must pass to tbe United States. 110w mucb o! tbis would be secured and bow mucb o! It would be beld would depend upon tbe duration o! the war and tbe extent o! the damage wbicb Germany and Great Britain would inflict, tbe one on the other. Canada, as a British Dominion, would not reap mucli o! tbls benefit be- cause Canadiai sbilps, flying the Brltisb marine fiag, would bo liable to seizure by privateers or war slips owned by Germany or Italy. Nevert.0ees, Caria dian industry wouid benefit, as well -as Canadian agriculture, because a great volume o! our products would find tboir way out througb United States ports- The Cry for Gold EEEN it comes to war-tiine there le only one medium that stands ail the test, and tbat is gold. It Is to get gold that tbe people o! Europe are \"~dumping their securities on the'stock markets so fast that purchasers cannot bo !ound for themn. Hence the stock excbanges o! the world bav' closed. Hence the Bank o! Englatid changed Its rate fromt tbree to four Pee cent. one day, and then jumped it to eigbt per cent. the followiilg day. TwoI days later it soared to ten par cent. It was ut tbis level in the Crimean war, but bas naver been like anytbing s0 bigb since. Henca the people of pa.riE were last woek paying 28 francs ($5.60) for British sovereigus. One must go back sixty years to find a time wben the Bank c! Englaud TatE was tan per cent. iu 1907 it *was seven per cent., Its highest in forty' yeaT' Also one must go back ta Sept. S0vb, 1873, te find a day wben the Ne,\" York Stock Exchange was not able to do business for Ïoar of a criais, ai11 to the Crimeaxi war poriod for a slmilar record on the London Exchange It is qiiite true tbat the New York Exchange did remain closed on May Iltl 1901, but tjhe panic o! May 9th ^was really over. Few of us can remoember even May 9th, and lîth, 1901, and atmn !ewor the~ \u003c dark day ln 1873. Even our fathers can scarce remenuber what. happelled lr the Crlimn war time. But, everything considered, there bas nover been Il tbe bîatory of the modernl world, a more strikng \"Black Frîlay\" liban th5a o! July 3iat, 1914. It was the cry for ýgold. that was the root o! the trouble Steady Increase in Laurentide AGREAT deal of money bas beau made by tihose wbo have pinned thfat faith to Laureutide stock. Every hundred dollars orlglnally 1nve0315 b y the stockholders ls a 1w wortb $260 market value. This h b accomplisbied by the usual proces of doubling the sbares. The comPll makea paper at Grand Mare, Que., and Sir William Van Home la the Presidel The Laurentide CJompany, Lliaited, w as orIginally the Laurentide PaPe Co pnt' L m t d t e l e r p a rt o ! 1911 th e tran sfo rm atio n w as 1118d ont e tck ex ba ge alb u ht o d a a eiy c n u matd at a eS11Se holdera' maeeti g n A g t, 1 1 . T e Id s o k l er g t tw o s bar os of th newv stock for an !teod h e cptll eet-W thousand share ot $10 aci'h oa aia soko 72000 Th a b ond utotaniig ar THE OURE 0 LAUENTDE OMMN. à Wý-ý bw_ý",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Ihe Mlop for Hardwood Floors Yrou can make your floors clean andi bright without bard rub- bing by the use of the It bie hr ih ard, dur- blulah, foggy cstheUsa MiralYs us 0-cedar Poljsh Cliasel Chemical Co., Ltd. 369 sorauren Ave. Toronto The Real Cause? HEMonocle Man, writiug lu a re- T cent issue of the \"Canadian Courier,\" discussed the prospect of better times next year. He said the root of the trouble was no funds. A correspondent writes to urge another reason of the hard times, which we have had for a year: Hanover, 26th July, 1914. Editor, Canadian Courier: The \"Monocle Man\" has bis finger very neatly on the mainspring of the bard times that have struck us; but that being beyoud our control, we can not take much benefit from the ex- position. There Is another side, bow- ever, from which we mlgbt gain a use- fui lesson, and whicb you ought to take up In a future paper. The main ques- tion for us ýis, \"Wbhy did the blow crumple us up so disgracefully?\" Aud Iu answerIng tha.t, the real es- tate raid wbich you bave dismissed s0 lightly will certaiuly corne in for a share of attention. To elucidate, let me tell a tale of facts observed in my own towu andi township; easily repre- sentative, no doubt, of ail Canada. A few years sInce Mr. A. bought a farr n utbe Nortb-West at $6 per acre, wild prairie, pald. $1 per acre down out of bis saviugs and $5 ho borrowed from J. B. Que year later be solti the fax-m to Mr. B. for $12 per acre. B. paid $2 down and borrowed $5 frorn J. B. Two years later B. solti to C. at $16 per acre, C. paying $1 dowu aud borrowing $5 frorn J. B. Two years later C. sold to, D. at $22 per acre, D. paylng $2 dowu aud borrowIng $5 frorn J. B. Last 0f ail D. returneti the farm to E. at $25 per acre; but wbeu E. applieti to, J. B. for a boan 0f $5 per acre, J. B. said, what Is ou tbat faxrn, anyway? Any crop, auy im- provemeuts? And E. said, no, but I cau scon soul it again for $30 per acre. Tben J. B. buttoned. Up bis pocket andi ,sait, \"I have lent $20 per acre on that place already, and I'rn dingeti If I lend. auotber penny on It until there are sorno improvernonts mnade.\" But by tbat Urne the price was so bigb that no farmer coulti pay it, add the lm- provemeuts and maire bis own out of IL Tbeu the slump began. Now, who was to blarne aud wby? Surely we bave been devotluýg too rnuch of our tinte and rnuey to non-productive enterprise, If the Europeaus beave 'theirs to destructive forms. Yours, etc., E. T. EEDE. Another Method A TYIPE of Industry etoCnd tei to be locateti lu British Co- lumbia. Mr. 'St. John Harms, worth, a distinguisbed British capital- ist, andi a brother of 'Lord Northdliff e, Is the iprime mover In an entorpniso for the developmount of medicinai spriugs near Wiuderrnere. In associa- tion with a .group of wealthy -men, ho proposes to, develop the Sinclair Radium Hot Springs at KootOuay, andi will erect tbere a large sauitariuqm and bottling works. The Idea seems to be to make a sPa, siuch as Marien- bad, Iu Germany, or Harrogate. This Is not Mr. HarmsworthWo flrst hot-opriugs enterprIse. Tbrough hlm, Perrier water bas become famous the worl'd over. It was ho who, seeiug the sprngs at Perrier, decided to titra their medicInal properties to, commer- cial accoumt. As some cpeople are very anxious ta .0e the bar abolishet in Canada, tbey should welcome the uows o! the pro- duction of a new table water, regard- lng It lu the iight o! a competitor agaiust the liquor traffic. Possibly, by elimnination and substitution, the bar migbt thus ble albolisheti. Mr. Bryau quaifs a glass of! grape juice aud finds IL gooti. Why shouidu't our, ministers go lu for popularliuig tItis io-w drink? Tou Often. Accordlng ta the Washington Star, Mr. C'éorge Ade wamsfetting witit a littie girl if elght, wbo loolced tmp from her \"Hans Christian Anderen\" and aalced: \"Doe.s m-I-r-a-g-e spell marriage, Mr. \"Often, my chutd,\" saIt the cynical achelor.-Youth's Companion. Take a Box on Your Holidays Cosgraves (Chill-proof) is the ideal beverage for your outing. COSGRAVE.P.S (Chili-prof) ,PA.\u0026LE ALE is the one bottle aie you wiIl like be- î cause its excellent quality is so enjoyable p1~ compared-with other bottle aies. Your dealer wiIl ship wherever you say. U-45 As light aà laser, but botter for you. .,NIORWICH UNION JÎïEJNSURANCE S5OCIETYC4MITED Insurance Against Ffe, Accident and Sicknes - Eniployers' LiaWiity - Plate Glass Agents, Wanted for the Accident Brandi H.ad Offic, for Canada -12-14 Wellington St Eaàt NORWICH UNION BUILDING TORONTO Improve Your Engliah Increase Your Income These Grat Books Point the Way for Yeu to ADVANCEMEy.T- SUCCESS-PROSPERITY in commercial and Professional Life. Wltb tii he adsces vblch are befng madie la «ery branch of businss anud professional iteh ba corntesa demanal for a ligiir standard of intentonsu\u003c ---.of profliency * h time lapatvin teraoy or slipsboC méethode o sc h ant601M cor- respondence ar okt n ttolerauce. The --n vio eau express hlmseaf vltli force andicereel tii anvi la lu demanti everyviiere. GET THESE SIX VITAL BOOKS Ailde fromï thor gram value In widening a man'a mental paropeetive-.puttint him la a position te appreciate and eujoy' ail thme beauties of literature.thos six culte have an intninsle value far beyond thm coc. They hav put thousandu cf men and vomen Into-tii. path that leado to Increaseed business, promotion, and ýhigmer salany. They are the aimpiest, the mont practical, lthe beon for Business Managers, Corne. spondents, Ativerlîsenient Wnmlers, 8tenographers, Sbtony Writens, Auhhons, Public Speakers, andi othens. 'TYour course la rich andi fine. Yeu osem ta have coudenseti the erperi. ence of yeana lot a lew sentences limai a business mon eau use immedîa ely,\" soys 'W. P. Warren, Marshall Pielti \u0026 'Co.'\u0026 Adverlialng Manager, in speaking of thoes books. 'WORTH TUEIR WEIURI IN SOLI, SUT TNEIrR[ YODRS FOR À TRIFLE These six books Includ. malny chapters, covering auci subjecîs as spefuihg use of Words Verse Wnitlng Pronunciation style sud Diction Novel Wntng Word-Building Description B 'sa Wnt1ig t Bu Gramunar Dialogue ZestPoetry1-~~vt ed capitalisation Advertlaeomet Wrting KMow tu Sudy Shakespeare punctuation Nov to Write a 8Sn ant Othen Great Authons Letter Wrltlug-AU mode Oharacter Stuly Theee books also show you the correct use ef Englishin Short, 8tories, Novels, Essaya, Articles, Conversation, Speeches, Busi- ness aud Privats Oorrespondence, Ativertmements, OirclnNBU Booklets, ece. Fonnerly Cest $25-' Nov OiJy P3-$1.04I Dow, 1 .Wilgo 50 Cents a MonaTrot,\u0026aaa Inclosed find *1.00 for vimich sent me Bimenvin In typerntten fonm tlis course of ety as Oody's six clotm-bound books, no pblsiet l tes sx loh-o nd oa . The. Art of Speekiug sud vat soit for $25.00. Thene are over 800 Wrilgbe nis Lanage. pages. i il send you four funthe Sigu andi mail lthe Acceplance (lard mouhhly payments of 60 cents ect, viti 11.00, and the set of books will o.util the price* (83.00\u003e la paît. b. foniwarded tu you, canniage prepait; 60 cents a mouîii for four mouums Signalet ................. ......... pays fer them. This la the big- geet $3.00 wortii of books you . P-Ofc........................... ever bougiit.Poic NOMIAN RZoW*3lsoifpoic . ............... 12 IE.W*ingtm OtDor.....................................",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. ABOUT THE CLOTHES MOTH. The Education of Self (Formerly Published as \"Self- Control and How to Secure le') By PROF. PAUL DUJBOIS, M.D., .Author of \"The Psychic Treatment-of Nervous Disorders ' \"\"The Influence of the. Mind on the Body. t\"et. (Translated froni the French byc Marry Hutchemon Boyd,.) This volunme by this eminent specialit of Berne inakes a valuable addition to the flod of light which Prof. Dubois has already ashed upon the subject of self-con- trol, and especially upon want Of it as contrlbut n g te the production of nervous disorders as set forth in his \"The Psy- chic Treatuient of Nervous Disorders\" and \"The Influence of the Mind on the Body.\" CONTENT1S. [ntrodu1,ction-The Contu est Of H7appi ness-Thought-The Act-Conscience - Education - Moral Cleoen-Sýhtediness-- Egoism and Altrulsm-Meditation-Toier anc. - Indulgence --Rnmility-Modera tion-Paience - Courage--Chastity-Sin- ccrity-Kindness-Idealism. \"~This is a phllosophicai and direct dis' .~sbcn as to wbat self-control inay ac- coipili, and hcw it may bc secured. He shows theo influence of conscience, ,and how educatlon develops conscience. He nxkes plain the necesuîtY of moral clear sightednes and expounds the dlfferenct between mere egolani and so-called altru isixi. Thc book la certainly aiimulating and heIp4liI. -San Francisco Examiner. 1ismo, clOtix. Prie $17 POstPaid. Norman Richardson 12 E. Wellington St.' Toronto There are several closely aliied specles of Ciothes Moths, Tineina, ail so rnuch alike that It is diff icuit to tell them. apart. The Motb fiade Its way easily into chests of drawers and wardrobes, and laye Ite eggs. From these eggs the larvae wbich cet our garments are hatdhed. Each larva makes a case for ltselt tromn fragments of the material on whicb it feeds. Nothing short of hermeticai seal- ing wii keep the Clothes Motb out ,of wardrobes, cheste of drawere, boxes and similar places wbere clothes and ýfurs are kept, and under ordinary bousebold circum- stances hermetical sealing is in- possible. The oi.e way to prevent damage by Moth la to use Keat- ing'e Powder, wbich his every motil wltb wbich it cornes Into proper contact before It can lay its eggs, or should the eggs have been already laid, It Mlls the larvae lmi- rnediately tbey hatch. Betore put- ting away furs, blankets, Summer or WInter wearing apparel, and clothes of ail descriptions, first thoroughly shake them, and thea well eprinkie them vith Keating's Powder; leave the powder on them. Carpets.-Before, relaying carpets see the floor ls thoroughly dry, then duet, aIl over witb \"Keat- ing's\" and lay the carpets on top. FurnIture.-Blow *\"Keating's\" treely and regularly into the tolda of al upholstered furniture, and the backs of chairs, bedding, etc. It la necessary that both the Powder ltself and the article on wbicb it ia used are absolutely dry. Se used it wll not InJure the finest fabric, \"Keatlng's\" coeas no poison, and Is abeolutely harmless to everytbing except laseet lire. ment Tommy and bis package were forgotten. In fact, Tommy had ceased to tbink about it himself when one day, several weeks later, he received an un- expected message over tbe telepbone. Could be cail at room, 17, Golden West Motel, at eight o'clock that evenlng? Me could-aad did. Me tound tbree men la the room; two of them robust o! trame, bard- featured and rougb-mannered; the third a shrinking wisp of a fellow with a weak chin and a furtive air. A nameless apprebension selzed Tommy the moment he eatered the room-and it did not abate aay wben eue of tbe men laterposed bis six-foot-two of Merculean trame between hlm and the door. l'Weil, Kid, the stuff's off,\" he said. \"The littie sbrirnp tbere\"-indicating bis tjmid-looking companion-\"1hae confessedl and you migbt as well corne acroses wlth tbe boot wltbout any trouble.. The bank's wllling to let the matter drop, but you've got to malte good the coin-almIghty qulck, too.\" \"1W-wiiat are you talking about?\" gasped Tommy. \"lCorne! Come! You can't work no bluffs on us. See this!\" The spokes- man tbrew back bis coat and dispiayed a detective's sbie]d; and bis coin- panion did likewise. Tbe sorry third figure wIlted like an October geranlum. \"It's the oniy way out,\" be wblmpered. \"You'Il bave ýto give it up.\" \"lGive Up wbat?\" ln bis exciternent Tommy failed to connect the detec- tive's presence with the package ot money. \"The thousand dollars tbat Jasper Mils-that dlrty littie thiet there- stole fromn the Security Bank at Win- nipeg and expressed to you, of course. D'ye meaxi te say yen didn't get lt?- that you wereu't bis accomplice ln tbe robbery?\" The officer was gettIng angry. \"«My God! No! I neyer heard of any robbery.\" \"Didn't you get a package o! money from, Jasper Mlîls, Winnipeg, a few weeks ago?\" III-I tbougbt It was a preseut.\" \"Present!\" The sleuth laugbed sar- donically. l'Well, what yeu tbougbt den't matter. Ail yen getta do ls turn over tbe tbousand dollars-\" \"But I didn't get a tbousand dollars,\" wildly protested Tommy. \"Tbere kas only ten dollars aad soine Imitation bills.\" \"'You're a liar! Ain't you been tell- ing ail over towa there was a tbousand dollars?\" The officer grasped bib vlc- tim' sheoulder in a grip eft ron and sbook hlm lke a terrier shakes a rat. Mainly A (Coacluded, tion in Quebec as hie bas seeu tbemt. \"Le Deýbutant,\" or the tyro, as we would say ia Elngliis, bears on Its title page that caution: \"Ithls beok bas net beea writteu fer littie girls.\" One would be very mistaken If bo expected thbat a work thus iutroduced was an immoral eue, intendeti es- pecially for those who rend wbat \"littie girls\" must not read. What the aulibor meaut te do and wbat bie bias scesilYaccornplished, was vi depart from t 'he deplerable tradition wbich weakeu'e Freach-Oanadlan liter ature and accordiug te which authori lu tltis. province. iustead of writini fer the public at large, devete theli chie! efforts te producing books tba are devold o! the characteristies o real lite, la order -that they may no offer offence te anybody, And wIbil tbey strive te achieve werlvs tlhs can be read by littie girls, the Intel lectual public et Quebec neglect thei weak productions and read the Frec,1 novels trern France, because thes latter do not suifer tram the lack e virlity that is noticeable here. Mr. Beosette's work le bis first oe but It la a slngularly attractive an lnteresting story, andi he bas attaine frenm the firet a very bigh degree o perfection. He deserves te be rianke witb the best conternporary Frenal Canadiaxi writers, as Mr. Bernier an Mr. Rodolphe Girard, the ajither o ~bout Men trem. page 9.) rnany good books. Paul Miro, the begianer, whose struggles and adventures are told in \"Le Debutant,\" was a little country boy full et enthusiasm and wlth a decidedly poetical lumi of mînd. Atter going tbrougb a classical course ef studies bie enters into the journais- tic career, where, as migbt be ex- pected, bie meets witb dIsappointment iand gets burt. In bis figbt witb the bard reilty 0f lite. Me mixes lu poli, tics and this supplies the autbor witb \u003c su epportunity for maicing au excel- Slent'sketch of -the pelitical situation in the Province ot Quebec. We are r also treated te an insIde vlew et the t uewspaper's edItoirial mrne and tbis f picture, althougb lt dates back eme t ten or fitteen years ago, Is very typi- e cal. Mire was suported and encour- t aged la bis upbiil figh't by tbe love o! - a very sympathetic young worna r wéhose death nearly brings bis ewu. hl .\u0026d tbat's the end et ut. e Mr. Bessette bas advocated broad- f mlndedness and the union 0f the dit- tereat races lu Canada. He bas been \",true to lite and truc te nature, aud d the exainple be bas set sbould bc d toilowed by otherr local aspirante te f llterary tamne. Hie work is geed be- d cause ut ie true, and it le aise beauti- 1- fui because of its genuluenese, as d trutb, gooduese ,and beauty are ail ft eue. The Mouth of the Gif t Horse (Concluded from page 8.) \"See here, Kid!\" he tbuadered, \"we've stood for eaough of your guif. You produce tbat tbousand dollars in this room by six o'clock to-morrow or-\"2 He drew a pair of handcuffs from bis pocket and jangled tbem meaningly. \"That'll be ail for to-night. There's the door.\" The young man who bad not profited by the old adage regarding the gif t horse and Its mouth betook blmself to his room In the manner of a school- boy wbe, bas cbewed bis first cbew of tobacco. From his book-case the bogus bis of Doctor Griadel leered at hlm In yel- low meckery. If only ne bad told some one about them! Well, it was too late now-no use cryîng over spilled milk. He had soine nine hundred dollars saved Up against the day of bis dreame -bis weddiag day. It would bave to be sacrificed. Coulai be borrow an- other bundred? Next day Tommy trod the tborny path of tbe borrower. The office kind- ly advanced hlm fifty dollars on bis salary. In small amounts-being a comparative stranger-he borrowed another forty dollars. AIl bis friends worked, in desperatIon bie called on a mere acquaintance, the station-agent, for the remaining ten. The agent listened to bis story patleatly enough and finally advanced tbe money, 'but before .doing so be calied a man from an lnner office who aiea listened to Tommy's story. \"It woulda't malte any difference If I went over to the botel wlth you, would it?\" asked the stranger, wboma the agent had addressed as JM. \"Those two detectives Mnay be ac- quaintances of mine. Perbaps I can persuade tbern to let you down 'a bit e4sler.\" At tbe botel, Tommy knocked at room 17 and entered, followed by bis newly-tound friend. Me had not had time to utter a word wben the com- mand \"Hands up!' rang out like a pistol shot. The bands of the two of- ficers and tbe embezzling bank cierk went Into tbe air lke. semapheres, and Tommy turned to see Jirn bel Ing a brace of autoinatics on tbe trio. Take the bandcuffs out ef my pocket and cbain those creoks Up,\" he lnstructed Tommy. \"Tbey've worked tbat Ilttle game ef theirs ail over tbe East and therle's a reward out for tbem.\" Later tbe raiiroad detective sbared the reward witb Tommy. \"Fromn your description,\" be sald, \"I imagine the man you gave your bertb to was Old Milllonaire Hcbbs. If it was you were lucky to get your two-fitty bacit.\" 1SandÇo1nd1oleges BALMY BEACH COLLEGE TORONTO- Preparatory School for Young Girls RESIDENT AND DAY SCHOOL Special Departments of Music, Art, Physical Culture, Expression, Dress- making, Household. Science, etc. Ideal suburban location and careful super- vision. AUi the candidates for En- tranceto High School were successful in June, 1914, and aiso ail the candi- dates for Examinations in Piano and Violin. For particulars, write Mrs, A. 0. Courtice, Principal, 109 Beecli Ave. Phone Beach 43. MTCLEMEns COLIS 1 A BRMPTNOT., weReO aN\" tractive site of 100 acres has been Pt chased. For Information apply to REV. A. K. GRIFFIN, Principal The Royal Military College of Cal 'HERE are few national institut T of more value and interest te country than the Royal Milltarl lege of Canada. Notwlthstandlflg Its abject and the work ut uas ac llshlng are net sufflclently unders by the, general public. The College le a Geveraenlt stitution, desIgned prImarlly fer purpose et glving instruction li branches or mlltary science ta ce and officers of the Canadian Mi in tact, it corresponds te, Woel ,mnd Sandhurst The Commiandant and militan' îtructors are ail officers on the ai 'Jet of the Imperlal army, lent foi Durpase, and there le In addlitl comiplets staff o! prefeesors for' civil subJects whIch torm sud' a' portant part of the Cellege CO' Medical attendance le aise prov Wbilet the College la organize a strlctly mllitary basie the ci receive a practical and scie] training In subjects essentiel sound modern education. The course includes a thet grounding Ini MathematIcs, Civil gineering, Surveying, Physios, ( lstry, French' and Englisb. The strict, discipline maintailli the College te eue o! the meet able Meatures et the course, ail addition, the constant practic, gymnastice, drIlle and outdoel' cimes of ail klnds, ensures healtil excellent physical condition. Commissions in ail branches 0 Imperlal service and Canadial rnanent Force are offered annua The diploma ef graduation, lq sidered by tbe authorities colidu the examinatien for Deominioni Surveyor ta be ýequivalent te versity degree, and by the R( tions a! the Law Society ot Oni It obtains the saine examptions9 B.A. degree. The Iength eto the course 10 years, Iu three terme of 91h In oaci'. The total cost of the course',f Iag board, unitorm, Instructions 1terial, aud ail extras, is abouit$ Tbe annual comipetltive eO tien for admission to the Cc takes place lu May et Oaci' Ye the headquarteý,s efthle BeVOlsI tary districts. Fer full partlculars regardil examinatien and for any otheT mation, application should beLu the Secretary of the. Niliti. C Ottawa, Ont.; or te the CeMO Royal Mllitary College, Kingsto",
         "CANADIAN COTIRIE R. OHAIPTEGR XXIV. Twiejty-.0ur hours sountis more im- portant thanl One tiay, yet the safie swing 0£ the pentiuîum marks trie Da8sing o! Years anti the fulfilment of a li~-trne low mucli, or how little \"nY lie accomplisheti while the hantis nieve round the d(ck?, T IÎR adubee twnyfu houi rocul, tiuring which Laurle seenüed to be În a peacefui sleep- th\" tiret natural continuous sleep siliCe hie 111noss began. . Mre. Pritiîam, Whio liati shown s\"ign 0f brealting tiowa from the nervons strain of this ceaseiess watch- itig na waîting, was ordereti by Dr. i'raser to go for a drive every tiay ani ha eutnl lier atreuany withtirawn froni usual afternoon vigil, ieaving 'ileo t lier place. RBCOIItIy Tlieo lad beggeti to be al'owe' to take lier turn lu the sicli o0011, Pleading that to have no occu- !hatie W\u0026 Insupportable to lier, anti ttwliereas Agnes hati outside work It' the shapeys o! vlsiting the poor, and iC lket to spenti many lours cit tItrli, she herse:! founti it ti!fi- oof to -8t ie saI bt t Laurie's sitie, lier bantis folio bu oir thouglits busy, tryiiig te tie t 0 wantierers with whom lireatad set sal over the sea. 13,C Utlinih ail *the grief tiat fin josslthin lir lieart, ail the rest- we5d, theo regret anti the longing, UPg lau iun(e great soli, anti sini- Coelense burled lier face in tha onre 01 Lauril's beti anti mur- db brokenly, -Ohcre ac Od1 y -Tubby, Fen, Laurie! reO ail Bo far away! 'Come back\" '3til di il nht e the' ripple of life CoIs~ cne Over thie still wliite face or e ohr lier o' the graduai lifting Were IlYeidsuntil Laurie's eyes tew g azlng et the Ceiling with thie fr a ra awakenîing la tliem. hI4 ran miomnft lie lay qulescont- Pl B., blanik, slOwly invadeti by d n1llois Thon it occurreti o Slil hft hîs gaze, whtch, tra- et fhOwnrsme the famalliar hil h8 li'.or anti reassured r tl Il hO! Tlos words' was stili pae44, lLthrObbing 1In lis brain-Tubby, lid e wontiered where rialis ' n 011eremetse past, those ad ineaut semetîlng to lig. iap rrs of!h lit broke througli liseldto g1 long laps; and 8, 1111 ring unconsclous, tw l tli the light came an ever- desr to Pick Ulp the broken pe 1 t4 Plece tien toether. Baiseti lie lie trled to 8f on1'on armn. \"I want herf l nstntTh,,laed sprung to linuibs saking under lier, \u003cilZz1 ad .Y Witli the sliock Of at.no Oeing Laurle ln his nier- fi l the sliort sentence anà 'nUtisal look between tim Ul0eIld tiat Laurle liat 'corne llldot't k .sieý- stamrnereui. noI, Laurle. But-but 1 On lis plllow, t effort. Il?\" lie asked, weak \"long ,Me anti wenft, anti 1lier voie lest its convey alarm te Salnswered softly, \"you liaven't been very well lately. 'But you are better now. Mother told me to let lier know if you wake up. l'il go anti lint iher.\" 'ýDon't go,\" lie pleatiet. \"Ring foir soineone anti senti a meissage. I want you to tell me what lias been happen- ing. 1 feel as if 1 had lost count ûLÉ things.\" Anti as slie moveti softiy to the be«l, lie addteti: \"Wly ring at ail? 1 am aIl riglit; I only want to get my mind clear about things. Corne anti sit tiown. Do, please, chilti!\" Again ho trieti to raise himseif, stretching out an irnploring liand to hier, anti Tlieo feit -that it woulti be tiangerous to tliwart hlm. \",Now,\" lie saiti, as she sat tiown, \"to, begin wth-what matie mue ili? 'Something liappened--something tireatiful-but i can't quite remember what. Tell me, Theo!\" \"You iati a faîl,\" she replieti sooth- ingly, \"on your way to the station 'Blut,' Laurie, please tion't talli abouL it-yet. You are net strong enougli, nurse woulti not like you te. I ouglit to let lier know-really.\" \"1 have batil a nurse, then!\" lie saiti. \"How long ago was thls fali? Wait-it is beginniag to come back te me. It was the niglit my beave entiet -1 went to the station-Il rernembereti that 1 hati le! t something liere--somle- thing important-that I muet comne back for. I came back-Walt! Diti I corne back, or was that aIl a dream?' H E passeti bis lianti over lis eyes, lis voice quivering witli weak- ness anti agitation. Thee, really alarmeti, wisieti that Agnes would returu. It seemeti to lier tliat this sutiden complote recov- ery o! Laurie's lest memory miglit presage a orisis-possibly a dangerous one. IShe hati board o! people comn- ing to tliemselves just before the*end. 'But tiirectly she moved, lis biand graspeti lier wrist. \"Tlieo,\" lie saiti, la a liesitatiiig troubleti toue, \"is it part of my tireatil that someone was murdereti?\" 1t was a terrible moment for lier 'His eyes were full o! a wilti appeal, lis fingers tlrobbed on lier wrtýst. \" 'For, Goti's salie,\" lie addteti piteous- ly, \"tell me. I am s0 afraiti o! the cloud comlng bnck over my brala I want te geýt cloar.\" Tleo liesitateti ne longer. It seemeti te lier that. âny truth mnuet be better tlian this horrible uncer- tainty fer hlm. \"You are thinking O! Lisbetli Bain ton,\" she said quletly, thougli lier hieart was tlirobblng wlth anxioty. 'iShe came te a sadt enti juat about that Urne.\" \"Tliat's it!\" lie exclaimed, \"Liz Balnton, o! course. Murdored-st.b beti on the canal path. Anti the linife -tie linife waa here-put batik! Pienella was there. Diti sho know? G{ad elle seen or board somethlng?\" Again lie presseti bis brow, distracteti witl the effort te regain full posses- sion anti control o! his brain. \"I thînli,\" Tleo went on, \"1that Pen saw you front bier wlndow and Went tiewn te meet yeu. Youi came back for lier phlotograph, Laurie deax.\" \"That's it!\" lie exclaimeti eagerly. \"I came back fer lier pliotegrapi. And then-wbat liappened ator that?. Go anti fetel Fent, Tho Tell lier I muet see, lier atonce!\" \"'TI ring for -soeene te corne te Yeu firat,\" sbte saiti, \"because mother asked ine net te leave you alone.\" Lýaure, wlio ladl close ie rsyes ln order te cencentate -its cenfuseti thoughts, matie no fui,Lhe. p, iioî anti when rte be.z was an.iwereu, Theo directeti that Lhe nurse shouiu be sent for, and thac either Missi Agnes or iMrs. Priîahain shoulci be founti, if possible. As it happeneti, they ail three av'- riveti on the scene within a moment or two, for the housemaid ran down, in a scareci way to say that Miss Tlieu looketi frîghLened to tieath, and she believeti 1VL'. Laurie hati passeti away in lis sleep. Quick,1y anti siientlY, with anxious, questioning giances at Tlieo, tliey hur- ried to the betisitie, andi as thie nurse bient over hini, and ivirs. Pridham, sýinli- ing into a chair, let lier hanti rest on his, Laurie openeti his eyes again. *Motheir, clear, l'm se giati you'va come,\" hie said, faintly but naturally; '1 expect you've been worrying abou, me. But l'in ail riglit now.\" It was. t9o mucli for lMrs. Pridham. Ail the agony of love anti suffering which elle hati helti in check only by doing the utmost violence to hee feelings, weiued up froi hier heart w~ lier lips, as site crieti out. \"My boy!\"' anti then lier face worketi anti sIc broke into a passion o! tears. 'lHush!\" saiti the nurse reprovingiy, \"You ought te laugli, net cry, lMrs. Pritiham. i aiways rejoice wlien a patient turns thie corner. Why, we shahl have hlm up anti about ln no time now. What w'ill Dr. Fraser say, 1 Wontier! \" She, bustled about, anti, mixing seume restorative, helti it to has lips, tailking meanwhuîe to gîve *Mrs. Priti- haut timne to recover herseif anti to prevent Laurie from being too upset at the slglit of his mother's emnotion. Agnes, gently moving to Mrs. Priti- ham's sitie, whispereti: \"Be brave, mother! Remember how criticai It is!\" anti persuatiet iher to movo away where lier sobs were not so painfully evitient to Laurie. L AURIE tirank obediently t h lier to prop hlm up witli a piilow. Thee gliieti out of tlie rom, ana ran straiglit tiownstalrs andi te the iibrary. Her father, slttlng, as hliedt been accustometi to do latterly, thinklng, with lis head on is hanti, seeing her flusheti face, sprang te bis feet. \"Not-?\" lie questioneti. And Theo, witli a catch la lier volce, cauglit hlma Up quickly. \"lYes, Laurle's iimself agaîn. Hes tallting qulte rationally. H1e woke up from is, sleop with his mîmd clear. Oh, father, ring up Dr. Fraser and tel! hlmn to corne at once.\" iFor ber father hati taken a step backwards, as though le would repu and fali, anti she realizeti tlie danger that good news mnay be. Instinct tolti h'ei' tiat to do somnetliing, te lielp ln somns way, would bei a safety valve. She was rJglt. Mr. 'Pridham, bis rulddY face purpile, anti his lianas trernbling, selzei lte telophone and rang UP the doctor. Andi thon oehe\u003e, ln lier tura, gave way. Site sat down ln lier fatler's chiair andi, lettlng lier face fail on lier claspeti lands, cried lier heart out. Thie first glirnpse of ligît la the irn- penetrable darknees lied beon toc muci for ail .0f them. There le no moment Whou a mental atrain cornes se near te sne.pping the fine lga. monts of the brain as tlie reactioaarY one when the intolerablo. bur-nla just been oasedl Mrs. J\u003eridhaxn came down to her lus- bandi before long, for tie nurse, depre The -FI1FTIIWHLE andRrec\u0026 JSchools and Colleges WESTBOURNE SCHOOL FOR GI1RL S 278 Bloor Street West, Toronto, Canada School re-opens Monday, Sept. 14th, 1914. A residential and day school, Weil appointed, well managed and convenient. Number of resident pupis llmited to twen- ty-eight. Students prepared for University Examinations. Spe- cial.ists In eaci departmnent. Af- fIllated wltli the Toronto Con- servatory of Music. F. McGilIU- vray Knowles, R.C.A., Art Dlrec- tor. For announicement and in- formation address the Principal, MISS M. OURLETTE, B.A. TORONTO Conservatoîy of Music A. S. VOGT, Mus. Doc., Musical Direci or. REOJ\u003eENS TUESDAY, SEPIEMBER lit. A national institution, unrivalled in Canada as regards the distinction of its faculty and the superior character of its buildings and general equipmnt. Send for YEAR BOOK and LOCAL CENTRE SYLLABUS of 1914-15 and pamphlet descriptive of the Women's Residence. Coaservstory SchooI of Expression Special Calendar. F. H. Kirkpatrîck, PII.D., Principal. Publie Reading. Oratory. Physical and Voeal Culture, Dranatic. Art and Literae. tiffe. Ridley Col egerà St. Catharines, 'Ont. RESIDENTIAL SCHOOL FOR BOYS The School has won Matricula- tion Schoiarshlps in four out of the last five years. Three were won in June, 1913. Separate buildings and special attention to boys under fourteen. Reopens Wednesday, Sept. 9, 1914. REV. J. 0. MILLER, IA.,D.C.L., Principal. ?8thnnFORTY.EIGHTH YEAR - ÇT A Church Residentialand L..tD5yShool for Girls. JetrqaEuU-i MatriculIat ion Course. UleÏnent'ar' Work, flomestic arts, musie and »C44101 Painting. Paxsrnmn': The Right itev. the lord flishop of Toronto. PRINcIPL- MISS WALSH VIC-P-if-IAI MISS NATION Wykelian Mal, College St., Toronto Junior Dey Sebool, 433 Avenue Rond. Head Mistress, Miss R. E~. Churchard, (Righer certificate National Froebel Union,) Reopens Sept. 1Oth, for Resident Pupils and 10 A. M., Sept. lith, for classes. STA M ERIN G overcome positively. Our natural m.thodi permanently restore natural speech. Gadu. ate pupils everywhere. Write for free ad- vice and literature. TUE ÂRNOTT INSTITUTE, Bertin, Cmu MMEE 11001 ON MOTOPJNGi AstwOr TAcKwG Expains bow we assist Yeu in ~ ~ the Auto Business as Repairnian, Chauffeur. siennan or Auto M.- ebsuician. with DY¶\u003e NE1W Goodsalares. Our eloymenr plan telis how. Sewareot littors Let usteli youthe namesof annuel iurstudents md friWhs ook todc.",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. SCHOOLS AND COLLE GES IN'LT'1'AfAnd lid Ontario Conservatory of Music and *j*'Ij~~\u003c*** Art, Whitby, Canada, Stands For Effi- 'Oe'L'A RUA O ci ent and Cultured Young Womnanhood The' new $25,000 Gymnaslum, wlth swim- Smlng pool, etc., together wlth a large and \u003e-attractive campus, affords facililes for Scl- entifle Physlcal Ed ucation unequalied in any L A D IE S Ladies' School ln this country. The strength mente are equally weII provided for. Send for new Illustrated Calendar to TORONTO Premie BoYs' School of Cana Founded 18-09 by SIR JOHN COLBORNE. GOVERNOR it 0F UPPF.R CANADA. AUTUMN TERM BEGINS THURSDAY, SEPT. lOth, at 10 a.m.- BOARDERS RETURN ON THE 9th. SeiradPrepsr*tory Seboola in searme huîldinàg. Fifty acres playîag en\u0026 atiiletie fields, witlx \"ik. gyuaaaium and fu aquipmeat. Detâched, infirmar\u003e'. with resident nurse. Sommer Camp et Lake Timagami. conductud b3j thea Pihy.icl Instruetor of the. Colilge. SUCCESSES 1913-Honours (Matrieulatic) 31, Paso Matriculation 10. Royal Militai\u003e' Collage Passes 3. Ail particulars on application te A sRNOLI\u003e MORPHY. Busai. H. W. AUDEN. M.A., Principal Heaid Master - J. TYSUN WILLIAMS, B.A Emmanuel College, Cambridge. Tia well-kaown barding ocheoi for boyse1is ultiBted boUt 100 miles from 0otri, th, G.T.P.., , . bufdingf- the Upr anis pn,ý,sTatoi7y i.buol are bmautfiily elttteu, jup.to.iiat, sanitary And B'7Upyu a,, p-red for R i NI C, \u003clothe~ Ulniversitto. ajud suglnea. Life by a.noffciensaff of Masters, -oti\u003e' Fmut . r tg1i h nv-uU5 IA iIESIDIENTIALQ AND ODYSHOLFRBY I Modem Royaloo builing cnancrelsie te crs NCODA OS TAE.CaSsaesaladIdd and att enl DATESDA SENT ON PAS8EO.O ensutu Set mber th.Frcmenes apt.1: 11 Schoolov D.~ B.ROO U CEI MANAD (Oxon.) D,.adm mter il Wilam Baron \u0026 Son UWTE Inventors and Makera of PRICES: To'carly 21toms- £67 46 4 \" --£77 .4 6 4\u0026 - £88 \" 8 «' . £102 F.O.B. Liver'pool or London. Transpuing Machines Borrowash, Derby, England cated anythIng more being said to or by Laurie until the doctor shoulci have seen him. Only Agnes remained wjth lier bro- ther, praying inwardly, her quiet face a reassurance to hlm whenever lie feit the dizzy vagueness returning. 8he yielded lier place to Dr. Fraser wlien Ile arrived, and went away tw lier own room, where one corner formed a littie oratory for lier devo- tions, and spent the next liour on lier hnees there. \"This is a great improvement, Nurse!\" said the doctor clieerfully. \"lWe shall have him convalescent be. £ ;-e long.\" \"The way to get me quite well,\" Laurie remarked, \"is to let me have a long talli withl you, Fraser, .quite by ourselves.\" 'ICertanlY,\" Fraser answered, \"as soon as you are a bit strongler. Weii give you a toulc.\" 111 don't want ta watt ýfor strength,\" Laurie replied flrmi\u003e'. \"I want pence or mind; that will be my best toniC. We wll have aur talk ta-morrow, please. l'il oniy asit one question ta- niglit. Where is Miss Leach?\" Tlie doctor saw that any attempt at prevarication would be a mistake. \"I1 understand,\" lie answered, \"that she lias gone wltli an old schoOi- friend, abraad.\" \"'Wliere?\" \"I have no idea.\" \"Was she oblîged ta go?\" \"No; slie went of lier own free will, wlthout consulting anyone.\" Laurie nodded. -We must find lier aud get her baek,\" lie murmured resolutel\u003e'. \"I want ta set riglit anythlng that lias gone wrong.\" CH-APTER XXV. We place a silver wreath on twenty- five, marking percliance the lining to a passing chaud. \"THIS t the most extraordinary\"- I MrS. Pridliam. repeated the word with prohonged empliasis-\"the most extra-ordinar\u003e' and amazng thing 1 ever heard! I.sten to this, Selina!\" Mrs. Pridlim simply turued lier eyes away fram the White Sale List whicli she was studying aud, wlthout layhng it aside, signlified in this way thiat she was willng ta give him lier attention, provlded lis communication was a brief one. 1 It's a letter from Hassail. He says: 'Wliat 1 have ta tell you is only another convincing proof ta me of the Almighty's direct Intervention in humýan affairs, an answer ta prayer. reveallflg liaw we are guided in aur desire ta help others wlio are in trou- ble. Wheu I left you wlth the pro- mise that you and yaurs would ils remembered in my prayers, I llttle thouglit that :I lilli already the sien- der tliread whlch. was taý deliVer us aut of aur maze of perplexit' My exchange w1tli Butler, to do lis mare strenuaus wark, ln Bristol, while lie faund comparative rest lun my quiet littîs pariali, was merely an act af friendshlp whidh was arranged sud- deni\u003e' for his benefit. He left me a lhst of lis poor parîshianers wliom lie commended ta my special notice and, wlth it, a mema attadlied tehlng their particular needs. 1 read, through this list ou the niglit 1 arrIved, and yau n understaiid my surprise wlien.ai- most the first naine tînt met my eyes was Mrs. George Bainton. ln grent sorrow owlng ta the murder of \"Mrs. George Baintaul\" The Sale List ftuttered ta the floor from Mrs. ýPridham's bauds. Site came from the 'window wliere she was standing, and leant over her husband's ahaulder, ta read the letter, while lie cantluued alaud, atter clearing his tlioat lm- preslVely«: '-is it not somethiug mare than mere coincideuce that I shouid have came here uuexpectedly fram the pince wliere Lisboth Bain- tan met lier. death, ta be entrusted, wltli the spiritual consolation of lier berenved mather? God led me here for His own, purpose, the unconsciaus Instrument of His own wihl, ns you w'iil uderstand fuily wb.en 1 tell yau mare. 1 went this morniug tO vlit Mrs. George Bainton and faud, lier - living lu poor cirdumstnce, suport-",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. ed by her son, a Young man of twenty- ilve Who works at the Docks. She was extremeîy reticent at first, until I told, ber that I had met ber daughtêer and had officiated at the funerai service, to which. her son came., Sbe is a wonderfuîîy self-con- trolled Womlan, and only shed a few tears When speaking Of her grief, reproaching berseif for baving allowed the girl to leave home and go away te look after the old grandmotber. She said, .1t seemed to be our duty at the time;' butoit was a lonely place for a young girl t elvn n n I i baemelfor letting ber go.\", Then es spoke together of the mys- tery surroundîng the case, antd I aske4d ber If Lisbeth bad any lover o, admirer Who mlgbt have been jealou,, 0f sucb a bandsomne girl. The mother sald: \"M, we always kept ourselves to Our$-lves, and Li, did nlot care for tosort of Young men she met, living aswe do bere. I neyer encourageci Tfly Sor to bring any 0f bis mates to te buse thej're rather a roughl lot dOwnl at the Docks, andI we've' knOwni bette, (lays, s0 I didn't wish n'y daugbter to associate witb people of that sorti,\" 1 expressed my sur- P)rise again that sucb a good-lookin,,- girl shoultI bave bad no0 suiltable adrÀirer$, andI tben Mrs. Bainton ýadý fInltted reluctantly tbat tbere had been 011e mnaua sallor-wbo bad become 1'ery frienciîy witb ber son, a year or 90 befor, ,oMing home 'witb bim tmvra res to tea. %be said sbe oudrather flot mention bis naine, addlng: \"He lused to pay Liz compli. 'flents, a an saîlor miIgbt do. Hle'd taravelled au lo, andI w as very enter- tabun, u we did flot tbink mach ab ot hlm Uf 1 the day be came to 8erY soOdby Then be spoke out foe r htora to the girl, be- fore rl7 Son and mue, said he loved ,t adWould work bard to make a 900d h ac 0for ber wben be came Sfsbe'~ wait for hlm. Liz tolId ti he haD't any tbougbts of get- f Xndarrie , and tbey parted quite e1. b next day a ring came lt gst to ber; blue fogtment on t no~ 3 od who Sent It. She hed Was MY sou's friend, but got e by that tlme, Se she could pu It lIrt-and sbe asked me ta aht I ftway. 0 've got It Stil\" After aeked lrs. j3alnton to describe bullin Zhe sald be was a big, eyec d4lrtî dark and .black- 0 alw ckln hdsort of .iolly fellow verlay bhis Joke and was \" I\u0026vish1 te bis friends' se ber son forb Aer-1,1 glvlng drinks and sO 'ýl1a \"hobel leved berso ha a ther ~tem somewhere, taken the c~ group) witb the rest of r Oe'- Who were going out East. bea S r to jet me ses It, but at asked lUddnlytook alarin, and fl n o t to mention wbat s ber 1oD, aýs ber son bad forbidden Iot ' eak of IL HRe sald, \"Wa 'Vt auIt\"Y tuilkIng about our prI- liý ýI', \"sP'iallY about my poor 1.et18 ee-ms to point cou- tll1'vely, la my mind, to the toll ]otive for the crime. Votu andus Chlle f eubought that Wwltke flnd the conneet- theaytOthsallor-love Wbo weut girlgeE8, f sending try canbe no0 blroturnfed to this coun- eolMe ,Wed ber ta the place iras livIng 'Report gives it a gEtemýa admirer- r A ...eo you flnd the ele- carnein 8aroused, If tbe two Ii ýed contact. a 'l this communication te eýe8 fyll )'n-ekowng the dis- ý y t r a l u i y f o r e d b y y o u a n dI a l Ile ou Shaffer has rested ot Y ilOs hch GotI lu His joy disPel, brlnging the llgbt A11r 4Ines gladuess to you 'again. d re11eIbrances to your by aghtors, YQurs very 8111- Dut ri ainJOHN HASSALL.\" bd folded the letter and b ek ,to lts envelope; his taOd an ho was uniable \"tbis n'Ife found words sher fIrst tboughts-\"And ta, thlnk aur boy par 11 this wleked crime! Horatîo, you must set to w-ork at once to fintI that sailor and bring it home to bim. Spare no0 expense.\" HIe rose impatiently. \"I'm nlot lika- ly to count tbe cost in clearing our Dame from the smallest suspicion- but bow are tbey to bring it home IL tbe rigbt man? The police have scoured the country for any clue. Hie must bave gone straight away after selling the knife, or surely someone would bave seen hlm andI known bo was bere.\" \"IOT necessarily. Such men can 46N be very cunning. Tbe police must begin aIl over again. Blut there are the girls coming across the lawn. We won't say anything about this to tbem.\" \"Wby not? We bave no reason to be secret about it. Tbe more it' taîkeci about, the better for us, Selina.\" Mr. Pridbam was turning over the rest of bis correspondence abstractedly, now he gave an exclama- tion and tore open anotber lottirn Hie x ife walked away to the window, to Intercept their daugbters, before tbey broke in upon their tete-a-tete. Then sbe heard a loud, excited \"Hallo !\" and looked back to cee, Mr. Pridbam elated, witb flushed face. \"It neyer rains but it pours! It's come at last-wbat I've tolletI and moiletI to get-and now it ceoins lke Dead Sea Fruit, bitter to the tacte.\" \"Wbat bas come, Horatio?\" \"The title we've wanted. Tbis le an intimation that I can bave a baronetcy by the paying for It. And 110w I can't accept---\" '10an't accept-and wby not, I should like te know?\" Mrs. Pri.dbam was ber own Imperlous self again. 'ýCan't accept, indeed! Wbat are you talking about, Horatio?\" 'SHow can 1 accept a title wlth this trouble still banging over us-Laurle In bis state-and no clear proof that be's an innocent man. We're not ln the position at present te put our- selves forward In the puýblic oye!\" \"Rubbisbý! you will accept the title at once, Horatlo, and lot'everyone cee, that we are nlot mere nobodies, te be sligbted andI ignored. It wlll be the best proof ta tbe world tbat there li nae cloud ban glng over our namne. Notbing succeeds lke succees! AndI you'll find there will only be sym- patby and consideration for Sir Ho. ratio and Lady Pridbam In thelr son's long Illness-witbout any reference ta outside events. Trust me-I know!\"' 'Il belleve you do, oId lady!\" Tben , witb a cbuckle, he corrected himself . 'IMy lady, I should say-and, as usual, your ladyship gets ber way.\" With a sinile 'of trium-ph, Mrs. PriI- bain stepped out on ta the terrace \"~Gls!\" she, calletI to Thea and Agnes, slowly croseIng tbe iawn, \"corne and eonLratulate your fatber. He's got bis baronetcy, as we expectedV' CHAPTER XXVI. -Two,, plus six, makes eigbt, and ID the occult world eight Is an unde- sirable number-two circles unlted that together forin an Impasse. LAlURIE was slttlng up lu a n aria- L- cair heu r.Wraser arrlved next day. \"I've had a most wayward and un- manageable patient,\" said the -nurse with a smlle; 'Ihl slmpîy wouldn't stay lu bed. InsIsted on gotting up and says lie must go :baok ta duty at the end of the week.\" \"When ons bas bast a whole sIlce out of one's life,\" saltI Laurie sab- ýerly, one wants to make Up for It as soon as possible. r feel a malingorer as It le. I wonder what the Colonel thinks about me by this turne!\"I \"He knows of your lns,\"saitI Plraser. \"lie can hardly court-enar- tilyou as a deserter.\" \"Thoro e îsnô excuse for me reaily,\" Laurlo observed, \"but froin hie lettors ta My father ho fl golng to let me off. 1 had nuo right, you soe, ta run mnyself to the last moment. 1 ougbt ta have gone up by the ton-fty- three. 'Pheli none of this would have happened.?' The nurse had I luleed pattlng hie pllows andi arranglng various acces- caories of camfort within hb4s reach; andI took her departure now, leaviug the tw- to thoir talk. 'That's true,\" remarked Fraser, The Pick of the BuIb Wod Ail our bulbs are grown for us espec-* ally and are personally selected by the James Carter \u0026 Co. experts. Thorougb tests, both before exporta- tien, and at the Carter establishment at Raynes Park, London, assure sound, bealthy bulbs of the very bighest quality. Our Tulips and Narcissus are exceptionally hardy and Weil suited to the Canadian climate. are unequalled for bowl or bed cul- ture. The Carter catalogue and handbook. \"Bulbs\"-illustrates and describes the choicest variet es of Tulips, Narcissus, Daffodils, Crocus, and znany others. it lists ail well known favorites and many exclusive kinds flot to be had elsewhere. Complimentary copy on request. Write for it to-day. CARTERS TESTED BEEDS INC. 133B King St. East Toronti, Electric Service Means comfort, conve nience, economy, and aafety. The home that is completely equipped with electri- cal devices is a happy one. Ail the drudgery of housekeeping is eliminated by electricity. You can wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep cool in summer and warm in winter, by means of electrical apparatus designed especially to relieve you of un- necessary and fatiguing labor. At aur showrooms ail these devices are ready for your inspection. Competent demonstrators will operate and explain themn for you. The Toronto Electric Light Co., Limited rA VOUR SERVICE\" 12 Adae St. E. Teléphone Adelaide 404 THE INDEPENDENT ORDER 0F FOREISTERS FURNISHES A COMPLETE SYSTEM 0 F INSURANCE Policies inued by the Society are for the protection of your Family and cannot be bought, sold or pledged. Benefits are payable to the Beneficiary in case of death, or to the member in case of hi5 total clisabifly, or to the Memn ber on attaining seventy years of age. POliÎCoe isuud from $500 to $500 TOTAL BENEFITS PAID, 42 MILLION DOLLARS For fuwr h\u0026 mfom an d literature appIl te FRED J. DARCU, S.S.' E.G. STEVESON, 8.C.R. Teimple Buidi;» TORONTO TI M HOME D8ANK 0FCANADA NOTICE OF QUARTERLY DIVIDEND. Nçotice io hereby given that a DIvidend at the rate of SEVEN PER CENT (7%\u003e FER ANNUM upon the paid-up Capital Stoeâk of this Blank has been declared for the THREE MONTHS ending the 3sit of Âugust, 1914, and that the mare wiUi be payable at the 1-ea office and Branches on and after Tuesday the Tht of Septen.. b\u003eer, 1914. The Transfer Books wiUl be closed from the l7th to the 3sit Of kAUgu,3t, 1914, both days inclusive.- Toronto, ,July 22nd, 1914. ~Y rue 0 the Board, JAMEýS MASOS, A General Manq ~r",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. Brains have a higher market value today than at any other y,~ ~ \\ '~~ î tme in the history of the world. The man wiîth ideas-the man who can think quickly and accurately-can command his own price. Brainworkers should realize the vital importance of the food they eat and drink. r _ _____ Unless body and brain be properly noorished, it is impossible to do the best work. A bottle of O'KEEFE'S PILSENER LAGER is a boule of fiquid food an-d strength for ail workers. It restores the flagging energy and refreshes the whole s stem. Order a Cas from your dealer and have a botule Ïor dininer to-day.\\J AIl O'Keefe beers are brewed oniy from pure barley malt, choicest ~hops and filtered water. CLÂSSIFIED ADVERTISING PATENTS. A WORKING MODEL should be bult before your patents are applled for. Our modern machine shop and tools are at your service. We are the only manu- facturlnig attorneys In the worid. Get Our adylce regardlng your'invention. ARl advice frec. The Patent Selling and ManufacturIng Agency, 206 Simncoe St., Toronto. WRITE for Our 112 page Blue Book en Patents. Tells how to invent and dispose of patents. Tradernarks regis- tered ail countries. Robb \u0026 Robb, 287- 290 Southem Bldg., Washington, D.C. EDUCATIONA L E ARN MORE MONEY-Fit yourseif for better pay by Improving your educa- tion. We teach you in your spare time at home. Courses lu t-Comnmercial Course (Bookkeeping, Arithmetic, Pen- manship, Business Correspondence, Comi- mercial Law), Shorthand and Typewrit- ing, Beginner's Course, Joumnallsm, Spe- cial Engflsh, Elementary Art, Mechanical Drawing, Architectural Drawing, Eiec- trical Course, Engineering (Stationary, Traction, Gasoline, Marine, Locomotive, Automo~bile), Matriculation, Civil Service, Teachers' Examinations, or any subjeet. Ask for what you need. Canadian Cor- respondence College, Limited, Dept. KW, Toronto, Canada. BAKERS' OVENS. PRINTING. HI IITING CARD)S.-Ladie5' or Gentie- TUBBARD, PATENT PORTABLE Ovens 'men'S. printed te order-latest styles; JL-Plans supplled; latest machinerY, fifty cents Per hundred, post-paid.* Frank lowest prices: catalogue free. Warren H. Barnard, Printer, 36 Dundas Street, Manufacturiflg Ce., 782 Klng West, To- Toronto. ronto. _______-___. MALE HELP WANTED. STAMS AN COIS. UUNDREDS CANADIAN GOVERN- '~MENT JOBS open te Canadian Citi- p\u003eACKAGE free to collectera for 2 cents zens. Big pay. Vacations. Life jobs. potg;aise effer hundred different Commen education sufficient. Write im- fpeinstae ; ctlge gs y medlatelY for free list of Positions now cents. We buy stamps. 'Marks Stamp avii. F'ranklin Institute. Det Ce., Toronto. 17.RcetrN.. HO0TEL rDiaECTOIRY KiNG EDWARD HOTEL. QUEEN'S MOTEL. MONTREAL, Toronto, Canada. $2.50 to $4.00 American Plan. -Flreproof- 300 Rooms. Accommodation for 750 guests. $1.60 uop. THÉ NEW FREEMAN'8 HOTEL American and Europeasflas (European Plan.) One Huindred and Flfty Roomi. MOSSOP MOTEL Single rooms, without bath, $1.50 and (Llmlted) $2.00 per day; rooms with bath, $2.00 per TORONTO, ONTARIO0. day and upwards. St. James and Notre Damne Sts., Montreal. Eu ropean Plan. AbsoluteIy Firepr0oo. __________________ Booms with or wlthout bath from, $1.50 TE TECUMSEH WOTEI and up per day. Londoni, Canada. PAL.ER IOUSEAmericaxi Plan. $3.00 per day and up. PALMERHOUSEAh mres with runnlng hot and colc TORONTO - - CANADA. water. aise telephones. Grill roomn oper H. V. O'Conn ,or, Proprietor. 8 te 12 Pa. Rates--$2.00 to $3.00. Geo. H-. OINelII, Proprietor. ITHEFORCE 0F MIND The action of the mid in the cause and cure of many disorders is considered in this book from new and scientific standlpolflts. -Thoughtful, eumneat, and fullY ln- formed.\"-Tbe Scotsman, Edinburgb. \"There can be no doubt that the re- forme advocated are much needed.'- Nature. London. \"Fltted to prove a stimulus to thought upon a subject of mudh Im- portance to the medical Proession.\"- Scottisb Medical and Surgicsl Journal. .'An exceedingly able treatise on. a mnuch neglecteti subJect.\"-The Queen, London. tention. and can not be without its in- fluence on medical Practtse.\"-Llver- pool DaiIy Post. \"The \u0026uithor bas in thbis new and atriking work greatly develo\u003eed bis theory as te the tremendous imPort- ance of the mental factor' ln the causatiori andi the ouÉrlng Of diseases.\" -Cburch FtiuU' NeWBP\u0026Per- \"la the foroibly writtenl WOOl4 Dr. Schofield emphasizes and IllustrateS the part played la the causation and cure of disea.ses. --Londonl Times. Norman Richardson, 12 East Wellington Street TorsontO IN ANSWERING ADVERTISEMENTS MENTION \"THE CANADIAN COURIER.\" \"but I suppose you had a good r, son for missing that train?\" \"I1 bad a reason, but it was one love, not duty,\" Laurie repl-ied. arn going to be absolutely frank w you, and tell you the truth, the w]' truth and nothing but the truth!l\" His cheeks were flushed and eyes over-bright. The doctor feit pulse and shook hds head. 'II think we mut Put it Off tili morrow. you must take it easy tii you get your strength up a litt] \"Look here, doctor, 1 daresay are right in the main, but for the 'ment you must give me my way. brain won't rest-it has been asl, too long-and I shall neyer get n, until the whole thing is threshed I have questioned MY Peopie, though none of themn ,wanted to me anything, I have gleaned a f rom one and a bit from another, there appears to be nothing but 12( hess muddle and trouble. S0 l'il you ail I can remember and let see what you can make Of It. y( give nie your word Of honour to bo it ail to Yourself?.\" -of course-on the understaltl that there is no direct hnfringenien the law.\" T HERE is none. This Is Thappelled. I started for ten-fif!ty-three up, with thi tention o! going straight back H-ounslow. At the station I reil bered that I bai, left somnething hind-8. photograph o! Miss Leaci whomn I hai just becomfe Privatelý gaged. She had written on lt, dld not care to think it ight found. The car bai. jugt turned of the gates, but I thought 1IriJ catch it if I ran. When I re3a the corner, it was a long way al I decided to take the short cut; calculated I had just time to r home and get on to Woklng for train there. qI ran Most of the waY, Only ing down a little when I came the canal. Just after I passed vening Rise, by the trees that hang the canal, I saw somneollI the path that Ieads down to it. had his back to me and seejile be waitiflg for me, to pass, as 110 leaning againt a tree, quite '-a( less. I recognized hlm at Once, ever. It was Mauleverer I swear to that. It struck mie thi had reached the top of the P2 minute hefore 1 came into, sght seen me coming, and had. retreat order to deliberately avoid me. seemed a little queei', and 1 wOn' whether lt hadi.n connectiofi a certain episode Of a few day fore. The episode was this. up a letter In the avenue elle and as It had no beglnuing, a slgned only by an iilt4a, I C0u tell to, whom it belonged. P0B5i thought to one o! the serval Put It In My pocket, hardly likd destroy it, and yet not wi5)'\" make it public propertY becS11 the prIVate nature Of the '0' 1 had forgOtteli it frte1 when I pulled it Out, by lt hour later, on the lawn. TheO it Up and read out the elgi 'Yours tili death, L.' It was a thing to do, but she's oly ai and I stopiped her at once an1 it away from, ber. ToM lily Mauleverer claimed it and It 00(. to me that 11e must be plaYhl'# a double game ýbecailse 11e had a good deal o! preferenco for i ter, and I knew that My motbe que prpared to alOw the0n engaged. I probablY50~ somethIiig of what I t11oug11I was very short with Me.A wondered, when I oaw 11iRL the canal path, whethdlr 11e meeting anlyone. i passed 0 cagie to the bridge where, e sorbed and bu red, 1 dld IlOt Bý until yoU suddeiily stepPed 0l the shadow. \"Thon you told me about tbl der of Liz Balnton. -do you rememnber?-'ît 1 able, for she was as oda handïsome.' Those wrsSr particularly, for 1 tho1ight dlastardly crime it must have strike down an innocent, girl. Then you de ror and iI was fiIed with",
         "CANADIAN COURIER. knew that sucb a wound could be made by tbe Chinese knife banging 1.p in our hall, and I was startied and sbocked, not knowing wbat to think. Anyhow it fiashed into my mmid that if It was known I had passed aiong the road at, that time, 1 sbould ho questioned. I might bave to say 1 bad seen Mauleverer. So I asked you net to mention baving seon Me. Wbon I got here the bouse was aitl shut up, but I have a key of the hIttie door at the bottom o! tbe steps leadlng, to the billiard-room. \"oI O)Pened it quietly and went along tthe hall, where I looked at once to see if the knife was in its place. It was there right enough; I could just 'le it in the moonîight. I took it down and it dîdn't look as if it bad beuq used. 1 was putting it back When 1 beard a sîigbt sound, and, looklng round, saw Miss Leach watcbing. me. She said she had seen Me fromt ber window when I skirted the corner of tbe bouse and, conclud- liig 1 had cerne back for ber photo- grapbl, had run down te let me in qulty. It werried me that she abouîd bave seen me at ail. I was afrald tbat it would lead te my re- turn becorning known, and I was tbln'klng 0f Mauleverer. \"I fetchedj tbe photo and got away 85qlllcbjy as Possalbe, tebbing ber to close the door softly and net te, men- tiO\" bavîng seen me. \"THîEN I reaîized that I must not Icross the bridge again-where 1 58-aw People moving about witb llht M ad that it would take me Îiemnutes more te go round by the Oerway te Woking., \"ran tbrough, the pineland until Il s~~5e threugh tbe trees the crO188roads wuere 1 could mako a \"gtralgille to Woking; then I made for th, edge of the clearing and toek a flydnig leap down into, tbe road. 8-at 1s the las t thing I rememnbor. 8Ohlethilng caught my foot as I Jullled, I suppose 1 came clown ou tuy be'ad Wlth MY wrist bent under lnàWhat de yeu ma\u003ce ef ait thatt\" -r 'sejp~,\" said Fraser, \"as you 11, ite determined te pursue tue 'r t t te end, it is ne good boa t- blit xfe bush. Mauleverer nas s BstrWay front home-se has bis r.ct No 0 ne 8-Ppears te bave con- t1 eepe 'tu the aiffair at ail, ai- ~th8t tbeye havel thought it strange Ildte ail b go away just in tbe Th t f al hesummer gaieties bore. ba b.en a geod deal of gossip utM8 Leach and ber sudden de- cont I got about that she bad edOwnstairs that night and bad OVerb08-rd by one of the under- 91tB loe. People have even coa80 far as te say she may bave 'tteod the crime.\" Da, maIe aueclamation of keon roOel ow ean tbey tbink It re- DSleîWbat wouid be the ealY,\" tbe doctor answered. YO1 d y!, eChoed Laurie, \"then-- Sà l~ma\", Fraser, that they Dogr~' anYthing te do witb that 8ed aifraid that bas been sur- re8 y bwh ave I net been r liS Ue Of Your c ondition,\"l Nit y0-d!,Laurie's face was drawn ýV a].This last revelation was Cla hlg te hlm. \"I shah bhave els Penell,11 ho said, \"whatever ul h e S eUst flot be allewed te t ors t - S a e o! suspicion. to ng i8 te find ber. I wilî Wy., oI't!\" said the dector ort*re 1OU don't beave this room Ve , ays Yt,1i I know It; and ayl ýeto\" bot town a!ter that.\" rtg ' sid Laurle earnestby, __ý% O vered band on Frasor's Lb Ju et'e well-get me well- t u p510 that I can go and se :taltIls It's the only thing \u002601 e me sane. Miss Leach tI9tO b, MY wl!e, you under- a i cO d isappearance of bers, e s 1 Unthînkabie. I bave à r f' it, It's fer my saI\u003ce she c SJlï ', id I shail neyer rost ý0 ;dld iii, and got ber eut o! ItL (%Ya 5Ae get me fit te travel as 1 tak can. I don't mmnd whatc a-f long as I don't break Iý.«r have set things right.\", i weru do my best,\" r~raser t] said, \"if you'il foiiow my orders for the next forty-eigbt heurs. Teil me one thing, Pridham-did you know Lisbeth Bainton at ail?\" \"Not at ail. I knew her by sight because I met ber on the road near the bridge once or twice and theuglit how handsome she was and one day. when I was driving Mauleverer in the, car to the station, we passed ber and I asked hlimn if he knew who she was. He said, 'I believe she's a girl cailed Bainton-Liz Bainton,' that was ail.\" \"Rigbt,\" said Fraser, \"well, my im- pression is that someone who was jealous of Mauleverer revenged hlm- self on the girl. And I agree with you that the mûre light that is thrown on the whole business, the botter. Now, get back to bed, there's a good fellow, and try to give your mind a rest. FG3 write you a prescription and you must take all the nourishment you can.\" Laurie gave an affirmative and Dr. Fraser_ summonlng the nurse, went away. Laurie sat meditating for a long time until at last tbe nurse, anxieus lest bis mind sbouid have clauded ovor again, asked bimt whether be would like ber te read to bim, and what he was tbinking about. \"'I amn tbinking,\" he said, \"that the straigbt course is always tbe best in the long run. I ought nover to have loft it. In future, I shall take a straight and a strong course and fight the difficulties as tbey conte. AnY- thing is better than figbting tbe air!\"* CHAPTER XXVII.. Twenty and seventy may be far apart as May and December, but drop the o In eacb case, which counts as notbing, and there you bave twenty- seven united, altbough that might represent midsummer aliied to mad- ness. S ALLIE MAULEVERER was ln ber element. She bad ef t bomne in a tit of perverse temper, flnding everytbing had gone wrong witb ber plans; Laurie, wbo was to lead her te the altar, after the usual preliina.il8reà of handsome marriage settlements, sbo'wers of diamonds and pearîs ani ail the otber accompanyiisg glorifica- tion of a bride, Laurie was to ail sucb intents and pu.rposes non est. And Tubby, wbo, might bave provided some amelioration by bringing a smart friend or two front London to, enliven the fiatness of country if e, ]aad also tbought weil to vanish into spaco. Two dinnors, vis-a-vis with Lord Bris- main, declded Saille that site was \u003cto use ber own expression) fed-up with it. A long-suffering bousomaid packed ber Young mistress' trunks next morn- ing, and the Honourable Sarab Maule- verer travelled to town. She foliowed swlftly on the heels of a telegrapb boy who had brought the yeîiow envelfpe to, Bruton Street wbere Lady Adeliza Mountjoy \u003ca wîdowed sister of tbe de- ceased Lady Brismain) read ber niece's concise announcement, \"Arriv- ing before luncb. Sallue.\" 'Ils anytblng the matter? Brismain got the bout or Theodor married te a charwoman ?\" ber, ladyshlp enquired witb rather sardonlc humour. Saille llgbtly touched the witbered cbeek wlith her red lips. \"I was bored to doatb and couldn't endure Cbevenlng a moment longer-\" \"And wanted soute new ciothes, wblch you knew I should be' fool enougb to, pay for!\" \"Yeu always are a kind, oid dear. We'1l go shopping together this after- noon.\" Sallie drew off her gloves and applied herself witbout furtber delaY to the demolishxnent of oysters. Lady Adeliza was rlcb and easy-going9. Salll's itantrums and impertinences amused ber. She bad no cldren, and the handsome girl was an attractive addition to ber luxurlou§ bouse. For ruibby she had no use, and nover en- couragedi bis visits. Sbe thought hlm extravagant and 1dle. He took no pains to please ber, and calledý her x selfish nid cat. WIle lunch progressed, Lady Ade- Iza told ber niece she was aîready ýreiparIng for departure, first te Lau- anne and on te Aix-les-Bains for a ourse e! the waters. \u003cTo be Continued.) Dlsceverede-Jnks: \"Wbat sort ef a hap lo Johnson?\" Binks: \"Weil, if yen civir see two men n a corner, and one looka bored te death, he ether ls Johnsoa. \"-Puck. Làet me talk to you about -~ Nerve Troubles. lez~ Our nerves are like an intricate network of telegraph wires. They are controlJed and nourishcd by a portion of the brain kn\u003c wn as the nerve centres. The condition of the nerve centres depends upon the condition of the bodily health. When the bodily health is lowered the nerves suifer in sympathy. Then it is that we are tor- mented with \"nerves, \" headaches, neuralgia, nervous debility. In i-uch cases there is - nothinq to equal 'Wincarnis,' th,. 'Wine of Life.' Win carnis ' is a powerful nerve food which acts directiy upon the nerve centres and gives themn new life and new vitality. The resuit is wonderful. Will you try it? Blegin to get well FREE Send for a liberal free trial boule of 'Wincarnis.' Enclose six cents scamps for postage. COLEMAN \u0026 Cýo., Ltd., Wincarnis Wor\u003cs, Norwich, England. YoL can obtain regular supplies from ail leauing Stores, Cherms and Wine Mlerchants, Recommended, by over 10,000 Doctors Representative for the Dominion o! Canada: Mr. Frank S. Biali, P. 0. Box 577, Toronto. Phono No. Main 2875. Telegrams, \"Onit,,\" Te- ronto. c Thlsie. t Sowsig plans aad Syses f unared o ttrct b ose o ~~Ol5t hom dioer ferotno othehme ane~ pieeo!matensfr a conieyeeu a pfit s and rayt lt place, inals ardcr NT porae aoues. ee' poit n Trhe Soncluds aook tmer teu thofitdor, widos, glass atent plaîste board. or lath and piaster, intenior trim and finish. Stairways, points, nails, loeks, hardware and complete instructions for erecting. immediate shipment. Bouses from two to twelve rooms-and from 8147 to $5.000. The Sovereigu Systemt mens a saving of oue-third on the cost of building. Send'to-day for Catalogue IL givtag prices and all particulars. 71 S\"EUEM CMUUSM COMPAY tJ.fted ne EZfreka $3çeS 1317 C. P. R. Buildin, Torouto, Ont",
         "\u0026very jy4rIi VTigorouslY good-and keenly deiejous. Thirst-quenching and refreshingo The national beverage-mîand. yours. Demand the genuine bY full name- Nicknames encourage substitution. Whenever yse an Arrow ÂTLANTÂ, GA. tnkof Coca - Cola."
      ],
